crime: 262 : 21.688741721854303
prison: 138 : 11.42384105960265
murder: 140 : 11.589403973509933
cartel: 42 : 3.47682119205298
jail: 84 : 6.95364238410596
smuggling: 19 : 1.5728476821192054
deport: 91 : 7.533112582781457
criminals: 221 : 18.294701986754966
deported: 61 : 5.049668874172186
murderer: 12 : 0.9933774834437087
murderers: 24 : 1.9867549668874174
rapist: 12 : 0.9933774834437087
gang: 42 : 3.47682119205298
rapists: 16 : 1.3245033112582782
ms13: 21 : 1.73841059602649
incarcerated: 5 : 0.4139072847682119
smuggle: 7 : 0.5794701986754967
dealer: 10 : 0.8278145695364238
kingpin: 1 : 0.08278145695364239
comments with slurs: 
All Vile Lib Dem socialist Communists Who Hate Capitalism Freedom and America Feel The Defense of 12 Million Gang Members Millions of Child Molesters PEDOPHILES ROBBERS ILLEGALS RAPISTS KILLERS and Shariah Islam Tists who Kill Gays Transgenders Lesbians their own daughters wives and all women who disobey Maxine Waters BELOVED Shariah Law IS THIER HIGHEST AND MOST IMPORTANT DUTY. FACT !

Arthur Fejfar Trump called the Asylum seekers drug dealers murderers and rapists... they said they took your spot on the line? So what do you do for a living? 🤔

As a Brit you don't know how lucky you are to have Trump who puts America first not like the pathetic left wing snowflake Democrats who put illegals rapists murderers and all scum of the earth first You should thank the Lord for Trump.

BUILD the wall to keep the millions and trillions of rapists and drug dealers from pouring in.

Betsy Hammond you may be right, but that wall has to be built. Our country is being invaded by drug runners, murders, rapists, human traffickers and diseases. These illegals don't care what they have to do to anyone to get it. There are things you could do though to help with some of the causes you mentioned.  Get involved and be proactive. There are a lot of states that have gotten off their butts because of the awareness this has brought to our homeless and Veterans. They are opening shelters and outreach centers people can take advantage of and get themselves back up on their feet. Be an active participant not reactive!

Buck Strunk totally agree. Trump however urged his base to vote for him in the simplest terms: rapists and murderers are coming across the border—vote for me, I’ll build a big wall. Try and get some perspective. 30,000 Americans are injured or killed by gun violence committed by other Americans in this country every year. A $20,000,000,000 wall will not protect you from people who want to pick fruit and vegetables.

George Washington's State of the Union Address was a letter FOR THE PEOPLE OF AMERICA....and it was the FOUNDATION of The State of the Union Address...until Democrat President Woodrow Wilson made it a PR STUNT for politicians to gather and pat each other on the back!  Is Nancy Pelosi's "dissing" really a GIFT IN DISGUISE?  President Donald Trump has three choices.  1. He can start a twitter campaign calling out Nancy Pelosi for this, and we get another expensive boring "Dog and Pony show" none of us look forward to.  2. He could take the "Dog and Pony Show" out of Washington, D.C. and go back to what President George Washington did. Actually report to the legal and law abiding American's, call out the division, call out for term limits, call out for real reform in immigration via a demanding for the Visa Programs, Refugee status, having a wall/fence/barrier put in place and sharing that before he was elected, Democrats were willing to invest over 30 BILLION for a wall/fence/barrier for the protection, much like on their own private properties to protect themselves and their family, the legal and law abiding "American Family."  3. He goes ahead with the State of the Union...BUT, he walks in to the room this is held empty, for a "one on one" talk with the legal and law abiding American citizens that last 5-10 minutes at the most.  He walks in and doesn't even go to the podium. He sits down in a chair where the Democrats are not present, and tells the cameraman to pan around that room, showing the emptiness. He then addresses us.  He address the fact can be shown we need TERM LIMITS (What more American's want even more than a wall/fence/barrier) on Congress to get back to those actually doing their job, nothing more and nothing less, and it has become crystal clear, through mostly Lobbyism/Lobbists Congress cannot do their real job any more. Then talk about Senator Ted Cruz's attempt to pass a Bill to Law for TERM LIMITS on both The House and The Senate to get back to their assigned, through the Constitution of the United States, jobs!  He reminds us it is WE THE PEOPLE are their bosses. We foot the bills/pay the bills that they make, and way too many bills are being given to us that they have no right, per their Constitutional Oath, and we have to let our voices be heard.  (Traveling to DC has proven to not be a motivator for Congress...but we hold the real purse-strings, and the BIGGEST MOVE we could make is show we don't need the IRS, the real LIFEBLOOD of theft for politicians on us. Just look at the Socialist and Communist leaders in many states stealing tax dollars by finding ways to tax everything. EVEN WATER!!!!) DOWNSIZE THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT (This shut down is showing we don't need HALF of what we are paying for Federally!) PASS TERM LIMITS ON CONGRESS AND JUDGES! GET RID OF TENURE! FORCE OUR TRUE REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS TO LIVE IN THEIR HOME STATE NOT WASHINGTON! BUILD THE WALL/FENCE/BARRIER! ENFORCE VISA'S, REFUGEE AND OTHER TIME LIMITED NON-CITIZENSHIP AGREEMENTS! BRING BACK THE DEATH PENALTY TO DAY OF CONVICTION EXECUTIONS FOR CONVICTED MURDERERS, RAPISTS, MOLESTERS, PEDOPHILES, KIDNAPPERS, TERRORISTS, THOSE THAT AID THESE AND THOSE THAT FALSELY ACCUSE THESE WHETHER THEY ARE LEGAL CITIZENS OR ILLEGAL ALIENS!

How many trillions have been spent on wars, and now socialists want to open the boarders and invite the war here. My small community was pummelled with rapists and murderers because LEGAL immigrants came from WAR TORN COUNTRIES and bring the hate and violence with them. WHO SCREENED THESE PEOPLE?!?!

Illegals cost us money!   Food stamps, stealing, rapists, coming in and being pregnant and having their children and they don’t pay for medical bills etc there are so many things people don’t even understand but Americans need to open their eyes!

It's so easy for those who don't live on the border to not want a wall, to say we dont need it. They dont live on the border they dont have to deal with drug smugglers, rapists or human traffickers breaking into their homes. If you dont want a wall a DARE YOU to move to the border and leave your doors open!!! I guarantee you'll be singing a different tune in just a short few days. You dont care for american citizens safety then you're not an american!!!  Daddy president put the crying tantrum toddlers in a corner and now they're pissed of about it. Libtards Sucked on Obamas tits for too long and got coddled!!!

James McFarlane You can certainly have him. Any respect I might have had for him vanished the day he referred to Hispanics as murders and rapists. As if we in the US have only law abiding citizens.

Julia Whatman Put them in Mexico for a few days with the bad aliens, rapists, have a few rocks thrown at them.....

Keep it up mr president! The right Choices aren't always popular! Your protecting us from drugs, drug dealers, rapists, killers/ cop killers. Keep it up, keep making America great again. I believe your doing a  great job.

Spot on! Walls do not work! Build better security within the country...tell that MORONIC POTUS to stop his fear mongering! He is getting the people all riled up! Look within! Your rapists & killers are right now Americans...living right under your noses! They are NOT coming in from under developed countries! These dear Souls is,okay want a better life!!

Stop belittling Blacks and Latinos like a lot of us aren’t professionals or educated and only do menial jobs. Not true! Remember, we had a President, Obama. We’re not in the slavery days! Remember those days when y’all beat, hung and raped us at a whim, for nothing as usual, just cruel. Stop crying and acting like y’all are so innocent and helpless with your mass murders and serial killers and rapists.

There is no need for a multi billion dollar border wall. There is no need to force the separation of all families at the border.  There is no need to deny unfortunate refugees the opportunity to apply for asylum.  Illegal border crossings are at a 46 year low.  The situation at our southern border is not as dire as Trump's hysterical tweets suggest. Illegal immigration is not an existential crisis. We are in no danger of losing our country.   The Trump Administration has intentionally adopted a policy of cruelty towards immigrants, and they rationalize their policies by relying on unsubstantiated claims that they pose a threat.  Day after day Trump and his allies resort to fearmongering, scapegoating, and demonizing.  Folks at the southern border have been maligned as rapists, murderers, drug dealers, gang members, and criminals who have been infiltrated by terrorists, and are threatening to spread infectious diseases, while they steal jobs from hard working Americans and simultaneously sponge off the social welfare system because they are so lazy.    Scant evidence has been offered to back these claims up, but when your goal is simply to dehumanize people you can't let hard data get in the way.     Early estimates had put the cost of Trump's wet dream border wall at $25 billion, and that's before any unforeseen cost overruns.    The whole thing strikes me as a terrible waste of resources that is sure to excite reactionaries, but does nothing to solve the underlying issues that compel people to immigrate to the US via any available means.    If the US spends billions on a wall, what have we got when it's done?  Just a wall.  That's it.    It won't improve conditions in the regions in the world where people are suffering.  It won't stop the people living in those regions from attempting to enter the US.  It won't reverse the demographic changes underway in America that have so many entitled Caucasians decrying how minorities are destroying the fabric of society.  Why should we persecute people for losing the birthplace lottery?   Why should anything as universal as wanting better opportunities for yourself and your family be considered criminal?  Instead of building walls to divide us, I would prefer inviting those less fortunate to share in the promise America can offer.

Democrat want’s to be like communist that they care nothing but their on way. They are working only to cater illegal and big drug dealer. Those are the people are in their list. So the Democrat voters  they elected them Demorats congressman just to punch them and laugh at the voters. Unless they all cheat.

Glen Butler meth dealer Gus

Instead to put Joaquín "El Chapo" Guzmán (The drugs dealer in prison for life time and cost the tax payer paid for his accommodation for life time, I have a good idea, Why not Joaquín "El Chapo" Guzmán paid to pay for the wall with a lots of extra money for his freedom

Police in Aurora, Illinois, have released the names of the five Henry Pratt Co. employees who were killed in Friday's shooting: • Clayton Parks of Elgin, Illinois. He was a human resources manager. • Trevor Wehner of DeKalb, Illinois. He was a human resources intern and a student at Northern Illinois University  • Russell Beyer of Yorkville, Illinois. He was a mold operator. • Vicente Juarez of Oswego, Illinois. He was a stock room attendant and fork lift operator. • Josh Pinkard of Oswego, Illinois. He was a plant manager.  Related Article: These are the victims of the mass shooting in Aurora, Illinois The gunman, Gary Martin, 45, shot several of the men at a meeting during which he was being fired, Aurora Police Chief Kristen Ziman said Saturday. At least one of the slain men was found on another level in the building, she said. Martin was not supposed to own a gun because of a 1995 aggravated assault conviction in Mississippi, she said. But he obtained one in Illinois in 2014. In January of that year, he applied for a firearms owner identification card, she said. In March 2014, he applied to buy a gun from a dealer in Aurora. After a waiting period and passing a background check that did not involve fingerprinting, he bought the gun, she said. Later that month, he applied for a concealed carry permit, and a fingerprint check led authorities to discover the Mississippi conviction, Ziman said. The permit was rejected, and Illinois State Police sent him a letter demanding he voluntarily surrender the weapon, but he did not, the chief said. Investigators are trying to determine why he didn't surrender the weapon and whether law enforcement followed up with him to confiscate the gun. "He was not supposed to be in possession of a firearm," Ziman said.

The Democrats are so full of crap. My niece was the victim of an illegal. He had been deported 3 times prior to shooting her in the face with a stolen police officer’s gun and killed her. He was a drug dealer to boot.  He sold heroin and cocaine. Each time he was deported he was back within days. He wasn’t here to seek the good life and he ultimately damaged my family, almost beyond repair. There is a border crisis. It is not a manufactured crisis. It is the Democrats who are having a tantrum. I am furious! Mr. President DO NOT BACK DOWN!!! 🤬

The person who sold him the beer didn't hold a gun to his head and force him to drink too much. The car dealer didn't force him at gunpoint to drive drunk. It's simply called TAKING RESPONSIBILITY FOR YOUR ACTIONS!! No one forced them to kill these people - they did this by themselves. So, before you shoot your mouth off, be sure your brain is loaded!! Call us when you get some common sense. What an idiot. Ain't got the brains God gave an ant!!

Tony Perez are you upset because your drug dealer got deported

Too busy golfing to notice grieving families in Illinois now?  “Police in Aurora, Illinois, have released the names of the five Henry Pratt Co. employees who were killed in Friday's shooting: • Clayton Parks of Elgin, Illinois. He was a human resources manager. • Trevor Wehner of DeKalb, Illinois. He was a human resources intern and a student at Northern Illinois University  • Russell Beyer of Yorkville, Illinois. He was a mold operator. • Vicente Juarez of Oswego, Illinois. He was a stock room attendant and fork lift operator. • Josh Pinkard of Oswego, Illinois. He was a plant manager.  Related Article: These are the victims of the mass shooting in Aurora, Illinois The gunman, Gary Martin, 45, shot several of the men at a meeting during which he was being fired, Aurora Police Chief Kristen Ziman said Saturday. At least one of the slain men was found on another level in the building, she said. Martin was not supposed to own a gun because of a 1995 aggravated assault conviction in Mississippi, she said. But he obtained one in Illinois in 2014. In January of that year, he applied for a firearms owner identification card, she said. In March 2014, he applied to buy a gun from a dealer in Aurora. After a waiting period and passing a background check that did not involve fingerprinting, he bought the gun, she said. Later that month, he applied for a concealed carry permit, and a fingerprint check led authorities to discover the Mississippi conviction, Ziman said. The permit was rejected, and Illinois State Police sent him a letter demanding he voluntarily surrender the weapon, but he did not, the chief said. Investigators are trying to determine why he didn't surrender the weapon and whether law enforcement followed up with him to confiscate the gun. "He was not supposed to be in possession of a firearm," Ziman said.”

WAR IS WONDERFUL WITH JESUS ON OUR SIDE! U.S. State Department approves $12 billion in military sales to Qatar, $8.2bn to Saudi Arabia, $50b to Israel and $1.4bn to Taiwan. America is the world's #1 arms dealer and has a military budget of $600 bn to Russia's $70bn!

Was he a drug dealer or gang member?

"An anguished question from a Trump supporter: "Why do liberals think Trump supporters are stupid?" The serious answer: Here’s what we really think about Trump supporters - the rich, the poor, the malignant and the innocently well-meaning, the ones who think and the ones who don't... That when you saw a man who had owned a fraudulent University, intent on scamming poor people, you thought "Fine." That when you saw a man who had made it his business practice to stiff his creditors, you said, "Okay." That when you heard him proudly brag about his own history of sexual abuse, you said, "No problem." That when he made up stories about seeing muslim-Americans in the thousands cheering the destruction of the World Trade Center, you said, "Not an issue." That when you saw him brag that he could shoot a man on Fifth Avenue and you wouldn't care, you chirped, "He sure knows me." That when you heard him illustrate his own character by telling that cute story about the elderly guest bleeding on the floor at his country club, the story about how he turned his back and how it was all an imposition on him, you said, "That's cool!" That when you saw him mock the disabled, you thought it was the funniest thing you ever saw. That when you heard him brag that he doesn't read books, you said, "Well, who has time?" That when the Central Park Five were compensated as innocent men convicted of a crime they didn't commit, and he angrily said that they should still be in prison, you said, "That makes sense." That when you heard him tell his supporters to beat up protesters and that he would hire attorneys, you thought, "Yes!" That when you heard him tell one rally to confiscate a man's coat before throwing him out into the freezing cold, you said, "What a great guy!" That you have watched the parade of neo-Nazis and white supremacists with whom he curries favor, while refusing to condemn outright Nazis, and you have said, "Thumbs up!" That you hear him unable to talk to foreign dignitaries without insulting their countries and demanding that they praise his electoral win, you said, "That's the way I want my President to be." That you have watched him remove expertise from all layers of government in favor of people who make money off of eliminating protections in the industries they're supposed to be regulating and you have said, "What a genius!" That you have heard him continue to profit from his businesses, in part by leveraging his position as President, to the point of overcharging the Secret Service for space in the properties he owns, and you have said, "That's smart!" That you have heard him say that it was difficult to help Puerto Rico because it was the middle of water and you have said, "That makes sense." That you have seen him start fights with every country from Canada to New Zealand while praising Russia and quote, "falling in love" with the dictator of North Korea, and you have said, "That's statesmanship!" That Trump separated children from their families and put them in cages, managed to lose track of 1500 kids. has opened a tent city incarceration camp in the desert in Texas - he explains that they’re just “animals” - and you say, “well, ok then.” That you have witnessed all the thousand and one other manifestations of corruption and low moral character and outright animalistic rudeness and contempt for you, the working American voter, and you still show up grinning and wearing your MAGA hats and threatening to beat up anybody who says otherwise. What you don't get, Trump supporters in 2019, is that succumbing to frustration and thinking of you as stupid may be wrong and unhelpful, but it's also...hear me...charitable. Because if you're NOT stupid, we must turn to other explanations, and most of them are less flattering." ~ A friend of a friend of a friend, perfectly expressing my thoughts on this.

"Borders" a.k.a the Mexican border.  Because there are so many Mexicans committing atrocious acts like mass shootings every other week *cough* that's all you white folks *cough*, illegal Mexicans don't even contribute to 1% of the total crime in the US, that 99% is done by Americans. Soooo why the need for a border wall??

**BREAKIN' NEWS** Mueller opens investigation into source of special sauce used on Big Macs infiltrated into The White House by President Donald J. Trump associates. Unnamed sources close to the investigation are rumored to have heard of some talk from 3rd person hearsay gossip that Russian agents with a French connection are involved in the alleged conspiracy. While there is no evidence of an actual crime, prosecutors moved forward based on the seriousness of the charges.

100 US citizens are the victims of violent crime at the hands of illegals every day  If one of your loved ones was a victim, perhaps you would reconsider your position

5 Americans killed in Aurora, Ill yesterday by an American.  This was one of many mass shootings by fellow Ameicans.  Border Security, Yes!  Everyone wants Border Security. But one illegal immigrants crime doesn't justify the expense of building a Wall that experts say can't serve the purpose for which it is  being built.

A Weak and Rambling President Declares a Fake National Emergency By John CassidyFebruary 15 “President Trump’s fictitious border crisis is a central element of the political narrative he has constructed for his white-nationalist base, and it’s one he can’t easily back away from.  On Friday morning, Donald Trump walked up to a lectern in the White House Rose Garden to make an announcement... a desperate effort to put the best possible face on the humiliating defeat that he suffered on Capitol Hill over funding for his border wall. “We are going to be signing today, and registering, a national emergency,” he said. “And it’s a great thing to do because we have an invasion of drugs, an invasion of gangs, an invasion of people, and it’s unacceptable.”  He didn’t leave it at that; he doesn’t know the concept. Instead, he sought to justify his action by trotting out some of his old lies about undocumented immigrants, and some he’s added to his repertoire more recently. “We have far more people trying to get into the country today than probably we’ve ever had before.” (The number of interdictions at the southern border is running at roughly half the level it was a decade ago.) The crime and drug problem in El Paso is “a hundred per cent” better since the construction of a border barrier. (El Paso has long had one of the lowest crime rates of any city in the country.) Federal prisons are full of illegal immigrants. (Even setting aside people being held for immigration offenses, undocumented immigrants make up a tiny proportion of the federal-prison population.)  Trump’s description of the situation at the border is almost entirely fictitious, of course, but in one sense it is real. It’s a central element of the political narrative he has constructed for his white-nationalist base over the past three and a half years, and, as he helpfully sought to explain, it’s one he can’t easily back away from at this stage. “I ran on a very simple slogan: ‘Make America Great Again,’ ” he said. “If you’re going to have drugs pouring across the border, if you’re going to have human traffickers pouring across the border in areas where we have no protection, in areas where we don’t have a barrier, then it’s very hard to make America great again.”  In this carefully concocted narrative, the wall isn’t a mere stretch of concrete or steel fencing stretching along the border; it’s a symbol of national sovereignty and regeneration. But, if it’s so important, why didn’t Trump get it built during his first two years in office, when the Republicans controlled both houses of Congress? Trump’s failure to get his own party to support what was arguably his signature campaign pledge demonstrates that he is fundamentally a weak and isolated President. But, of course, he can’t admit that publicly, either. Instead, he said, “It would have been great to have done it earlier. But I was a little new to the job, a little new to the profession. And we had a little disappointment for the first year and a half. People that should have stepped up did not step up. But we’re stepping up now.” Take that, Paul Ryan!  This official unveiling of the former House Speaker as Trump’s 2020 whipping boy didn’t come as a surprise. Neither did the declaration of a national emergency. Trump has been threatening to make this move for months, and Mitch McConnell, the Majority Leader in the Senate, had announced his intentions from the Senate floor on Thursday afternoon. Earlier on Thursday, according to a tick-tock by the Washington Post, Trump was still threatening to veto the bipartisan spending deal that allotted $1.375 billion to border barriers. In order to get him to sign the bill and keep the government open, McConnell agreed to support the declaration of an emergency and encouraged other Republicans to support it.  Here was yet another example of how the G.O.P. leadership’s Faustian pact with Trump has driven them to enable his more authoritarian tendencies. During his Rose Garden address, Trump freely conceded that his emergency decree will immediately be challenged in the lower courts, and quite likely get snagged there. But citing what happened to his travel ban, he said he was hopeful of prevailing in the Supreme Court—an outcome that can’t be ruled out given its conservative tilt.  If this happens, Trump will have succeeded in undermining the principle that the President proposes and the Congress disposes, which is contained in Article I of the Constitution. And, as Democrats and Republicans were quick to point out, he will have set a precedent. In a statement issued on Friday afternoon, Thom Tillis, a Republican senator from North Carolina, invoked the prospect of “President Elizabeth Warren declaring a national emergency to shut down banks and take over the nation’s financial institutions.”  Trump doesn’t care about precedent, of course. After he had finished his peroration, CNN’s Jim Acosta, who is possibly his least favorite reporter, asked him to explain the disconnect between his description of what’s happening at the border and data from his own government that shows border crossings “at a near record low” and “undocumented immigrants committing crimes at lower levels than native Americans.” Trump dodged the question and called CNN “fake news.” The next questioner, Playboy’s Brian Karem, followed up Acosta’s question and asked Trump to say where he gets his figures. “I get my numbers from a lot of sources, like Homeland Security, primarily,” Trump replied. “And the numbers that I have from Homeland Security are a disaster.” Another of the reporters asked to what degree outside conservative voices had influenced Trump’s thinking on the national emergency. Rather than dismissing the question as impertinent, he said, “Look, Sean Hannity has been a terrific supporter of what I do. . . . Rush Limbaugh, I think he’s a great guy. Here’s a guy who could speak for three hours without a phone call. Try doing that sometime.” Turning to Ann Coulter, who has excoriated the President on Twitter this week for agreeing to a budget deal that won’t fund the wall, Trump recalled that in 2016 she had predicted he would win the election. “So I like her,” he said. “But she’s off the reservation.”  Arguably, the most revealing exchange came when Peter Alexander, of NBC News, asked Trump to admit that the spending deal he was to sign later in the day gave him less money for his wall than he could have got before the government shutdown. Of course, Trump never admits anything. He insisted that he’d got “billions and billions of dollars for other things—port of entries, lots of different things” from Congress. But, when it came to the wall, he went on, “they skimped.” Then he added, “So I did—I was successful in that sense, but I want to do it faster. I could do the wall over a longer period of time. I didn’t need to do this, but I’d rather do it much faster.”  It will be interesting to see what the courts make of Trump’s admission that, when it came time to declare a national emergency, he “didn’t need to do this.” At the least, it was good to get it on the record from his own lips. Inside the Reagan Administration there used to be a saying: “Let Reagan be Reagan.” In the Trump Administration such a statement would be entirely redundant. The President lets it all hang out: the incoherence, the fabrications, the mendacity, the raging but delicate ego, the attention-deficit disorder, and, occasionally, the revealing shards of self-illumination. He just can’t help himself.

A Weak and Rambling President Declares a Fake National Emergency By John CassidyFebruary 15 “President Trump’s fictitious border crisis is a central element of the political narrative he has constructed for his white-nationalist base, and it’s one he can’t easily back away from.  On Friday morning, Donald Trump walked up to a lectern in the White House Rose Garden to make an announcement... a desperate effort to put the best possible face on the humiliating defeat that he suffered on Capitol Hill over funding for his border wall. “We are going to be signing today, and registering, a national emergency,” he said. “And it’s a great thing to do because we have an invasion of drugs, an invasion of gangs, an invasion of people, and it’s unacceptable.”  He didn’t leave it at that; he doesn’t know the concept. Instead, he sought to justify his action by trotting out some of his old lies about undocumented immigrants, and some he’s added to his repertoire more recently. “We have far more people trying to get into the country today than probably we’ve ever had before.” (The number of interdictions at the southern border is running at roughly half the level it was a decade ago.) The crime and drug problem in El Paso is “a hundred per cent” better since the construction of a border barrier. (El Paso has long had one of the lowest crime rates of any city in the country.) Federal prisons are full of illegal immigrants. (Even setting aside people being held for immigration offenses, undocumented immigrants make up a tiny proportion of the federal-prison population.)  Trump’s description of the situation at the border is almost entirely fictitious, of course, but in one sense it is real. It’s a central element of the political narrative he has constructed for his white-nationalist base over the past three and a half years, and, as he helpfully sought to explain, it’s one he can’t easily back away from at this stage. “I ran on a very simple slogan: ‘Make America Great Again,’ ” he said. “If you’re going to have drugs pouring across the border, if you’re going to have human traffickers pouring across the border in areas where we have no protection, in areas where we don’t have a barrier, then it’s very hard to make America great again.”  In this carefully concocted narrative, the wall isn’t a mere stretch of concrete or steel fencing stretching along the border; it’s a symbol of national sovereignty and regeneration. But, if it’s so important, why didn’t Trump get it built during his first two years in office, when the Republicans controlled both houses of Congress? Trump’s failure to get his own party to support what was arguably his signature campaign pledge demonstrates that he is fundamentally a weak and isolated President. But, of course, he can’t admit that publicly, either. Instead, he said, “It would have been great to have done it earlier. But I was a little new to the job, a little new to the profession. And we had a little disappointment for the first year and a half. People that should have stepped up did not step up. But we’re stepping up now.” Take that, Paul Ryan!  This official unveiling of the former House Speaker as Trump’s 2020 whipping boy didn’t come as a surprise. Neither did the declaration of a national emergency. Trump has been threatening to make this move for months, and Mitch McConnell, the Majority Leader in the Senate, had announced his intentions from the Senate floor on Thursday afternoon. Earlier on Thursday, according to a tick-tock by the Washington Post, Trump was still threatening to veto the bipartisan spending deal that allotted $1.375 billion to border barriers. In order to get him to sign the bill and keep the government open, McConnell agreed to support the declaration of an emergency and encouraged other Republicans to support it.  Here was yet another example of how the G.O.P. leadership’s Faustian pact with Trump has driven them to enable his more authoritarian tendencies. During his Rose Garden address, Trump freely conceded that his emergency decree will immediately be challenged in the lower courts, and quite likely get snagged there. But citing what happened to his travel ban, he said he was hopeful of prevailing in the Supreme Court—an outcome that can’t be ruled out given its conservative tilt.  If this happens, Trump will have succeeded in undermining the principle that the President proposes and the Congress disposes, which is contained in Article I of the Constitution. And, as Democrats and Republicans were quick to point out, he will have set a precedent. In a statement issued on Friday afternoon, Thom Tillis, a Republican senator from North Carolina, invoked the prospect of “President Elizabeth Warren declaring a national emergency to shut down banks and take over the nation’s financial institutions.”  Trump doesn’t care about precedent, of course. After he had finished his peroration, CNN’s Jim Acosta, who is possibly his least favorite reporter, asked him to explain the disconnect between his description of what’s happening at the border and data from his own government that shows border crossings “at a near record low” and “undocumented immigrants committing crimes at lower levels than native Americans.” Trump dodged the question and called CNN “fake news.” The next questioner, Playboy’s Brian Karem, followed up Acosta’s question and asked Trump to say where he gets his figures. “I get my numbers from a lot of sources, like Homeland Security, primarily,” Trump replied. “And the numbers that I have from Homeland Security are a disaster.” Another of the reporters asked to what degree outside conservative voices had influenced Trump’s thinking on the national emergency. Rather than dismissing the question as impertinent, he said, “Look, Sean Hannity has been a terrific supporter of what I do. . . . Rush Limbaugh, I think he’s a great guy. Here’s a guy who could speak for three hours without a phone call. Try doing that sometime.” Turning to Ann Coulter, who has excoriated the President on Twitter this week for agreeing to a budget deal that won’t fund the wall, Trump recalled that in 2016 she had predicted he would win the election. “So I like her,” he said. “But she’s off the reservation.”  Arguably, the most revealing exchange came when Peter Alexander, of NBC News, asked Trump to admit that the spending deal he was to sign later in the day gave him less money for his wall than he could have got before the government shutdown. Of course, Trump never admits anything. He insisted that he’d got “billions and billions of dollars for other things—port of entries, lots of different things” from Congress. But, when it came to the wall, he went on, “they skimped.” Then he added, “So I did—I was successful in that sense, but I want to do it faster. I could do the wall over a longer period of time. I didn’t need to do this, but I’d rather do it much faster.”  It will be interesting to see what the courts make of Trump’s admission that, when it came time to declare a national emergency, he “didn’t need to do this.” At the least, it was good to get it on the record from his own lips. Inside the Reagan Administration there used to be a saying: “Let Reagan be Reagan.” In the Trump Administration such a statement would be entirely redundant. The President lets it all hang out: the incoherence, the fabrications, the mendacity, the raging but delicate ego, the attention-deficit disorder, and, occasionally, the revealing shards of self-illumination. He just can’t help himself.

A american killed my cousin we need to build a wall around him I guess smh you people are puppets..most of the crime committed in this country past and present has been committed by Americans especially white..I'm just stating facts guys not racial at all

According to Nancy Pelosi's own speech, "only 2,500 ILLEGALS came across the boarder last week." According to her own speech about a week ago, each illegal "only costs the US Tax payers $70,000 a year." So lets break this down into "factual" numbers according to Ms. Pelosi. Those 2,500 illegals will costs the American Tax Payers $175,000,000.00 (that is 175 MILLION) in the next year. If the 2,500 is an average week then that is 130,000 a year in ILLEGALS. It will cost the American Tax payers over 9.1 BILLION DOLLARS a year to support them! This is only to feed, house, educate and give them health care. If any of them commit a crime and is arrested, then the figure goes up because then US Citizens PAY to DEFEND them! These figures come from the Nancy Pelosi's speeches to convince US Citizens that there is no crisis at the board. REALLY??? Democrats use them to SLAM Trump but neglect to give the full picture! Wake up America and BUILT THE WALL!

According to Texas Department of Public Safety (DPS), 251,000 criminal aliens have been booked into local Texas jails between June 1, 2011 and April 30, 2018, according to DHS status indicators. These criminal aliens were charged with MORE THAN 663,000 criminal offenses.  Just in TEXAS ALONE:  > 1,351 homicides;  > 7,156 sexual assaults;  > 9,938 weapons charges;  > 79,049 assaults;  > 18,685 burglaries;  > 79,900 drug charges;  > 815 kidnappings;  > 44,882 thefts;  > 4,292 robberies  https://www.justice.gov/opa/pr/departments-justice-and-homeland-security-release-quarterly-alien-incarceration-report  Anyone who opposes the wall is giving warrant and sanction to mass murder, rape, violent crime and human trafficking - and there is just no way for them to spin themselves out of it.

Actually you are a illegal immigrant from Europe and this land was mexico for thousands of years and mexicans lived here for thousands of years and are native to this land so this land belongs to mexicans more than anyone else. All white people are illegal immigrants from Europe that came here for spiritual refuge and we are all illegal immigrants living here on mexico's land that we stole from them, all mexicans deserve to live here more than anyone else. We should let in all mexicans at the border and build them freedom towers in san diego where they all can live and eat free with buffets of maha prasadam not fast food so they eat as healthy as possible to prevent diseases. We should be focused on the welfare of the immigrants not using our borders as way to keep immigrants out that want to live here, all non violent immigrants at the border should be let in and put on welfare and the fact you want to keep them out to cut their welfare money is a crime.

Adam Somerville   Trump 2020. Absolutely. 20 years for treason, 20 years for obstructing justice and election fraud.  Not to worry,  With proper therapeutic intervention you will some day come to terms with the realization of having betrayed your country at the ballot box, handing it over to a Russian crime syndicate headed by a mentally and emotionally damaged New York City gangster.

Ah, why is it that every time I discuss anything. Every right winger brings up "black on black crime in chicago". Do you even know the circumstances leading up to the massive crime in that area? Do you know the history? Because it starts with right wing policies. Since gun control measures in Chicage, crime has seen a steady decrease yearly. So we started there. What's your point? Is a wall going to keep you safe, definitely not. Not when the major terrorists in this nation are home-grown of the white right wing variety.

Ah, why is it that every time I discuss anything. Every right winger brings up "black on black crime in chicago". Do you even know the circumstances leading up to the massive crime in that area? Do you know the history? Because it starts with right wing policies. Since gun control measures in Chicage, crime has seen a steady decrease yearly. So we started there. What's your point? Is a wall going to keep you safe, definitely not. Not when the major terrorists in this nation are home-grown of the white right wing variety.

Ah, why is it that every time I discuss anything. Every right winger brings up "black on black crime in chicago". Do you even know the circumstances leading up to the massive crime in that area? Do you know the history? Because it starts with right wing policies. Since gun control measures in Chicage, crime has seen a steady decrease yearly. So we started there. What's your point? Is a wall going to keep you safe, definitely not. Not when the major terrorists in this nation are home-grown of the white right wing variety.

Alejandro Sanchez and the mass shooters happened in liberal democrats state's with gun control and high crime rates

Almost 4 million jobs created since election.  More Americans are now employed than ever recorded before in our history.  We have created more than 400,000 manufacturing jobs since my election.  Manufacturing jobs growing at the fastest rate in more than THREE DECADES.  Economic growth last quarter hit 4.2 percent.  New unemployment claims recently hit a 49-year low.  Median household income has hit highest level ever recorded.  African-American unemployment has recently achieved the lowest rate ever recorded.  Hispanic-American unemployment is at the lowest rate ever recorded.  Asian-American unemployment recently achieved the lowest rate ever recorded.  Women’s unemployment recently reached the lowest rate in 65 years.  Youth unemployment has recently hit the lowest rate in nearly half a century.  Lowest unemployment rate ever recorded for Americans without a high school diploma.  Under Trump's Administration, veterans’ unemployment recently reached its lowest rate in nearly 20 years.  Almost 3.9 million Americans have been lifted off food stamps since the election.  The Pledge to America’s Workers has resulted in employers committing to train more than 4 million Americans. We are committed to VOCATIONAL education.  95 percent of U.S. manufacturers are optimistic about the future—the highest ever.  Retail sales surged last month, up another 6 percent over last year.  Signed the biggest package of tax cuts and reforms in history. After tax cuts, over $300 billion poured back in to the U.S. in the first quarter alone.  As a result of our tax bill, small businesses will have the lowest top marginal tax rate in more than 80 years.  Helped win U.S. bid for the 2028 Summer Olympics in Los Angeles.  Helped win U.S.-Mexico-Canada’s united bid for 2026 World Cup.  Opened ANWR and approved Keystone XL and Dakota Access Pipelines.  Record number of regulations eliminated.  Enacted regulatory relief for community banks and credit unions.  Obamacare individual mandate penalty GONE.  Trump Administration is providing more affordable healthcare options for Americans through association health plans and short-term duration plans.  Last month, the FDA approved more affordable generic drugs than ever before in history. And thanks to our efforts, many drug companies are freezing or reversing planned price increases.  We reformed the Medicare program to stop hospitals from overcharging low-income seniors on their drugs—saving seniors hundreds of millions of dollars this year alone.  Signed Right-To-Try legislation.  Secured $6 billion in NEW funding to fight the opioid epidemic.  We have reduced high-dose opioid prescriptions by 16 percent during my first year in office.  Signed VA Choice Act and VA Accountability Act, expanded VA telehealth services, walk-in-clinics, and same-day urgent primary and mental health care.  Increased our coal exports by 60 percent; U.S. oil production recently reached all-time high.  United States is a net natural gas exporter for the first time since 1957.  Withdrew the United States from the job-killing Paris Climate Accord.  Cancelled the illegal, anti-coal, so-called Clean Power Plan.  Secured record $700 billion in military funding; $716 billion next year.  NATO allies are spending $69 billion more on defense since 2016.  Process has begun to make the Space Force the 6th branch of the Armed Forces.  Confirmed more circuit court judges than any other new administration.  Confirmed Supreme Court Justice Neil Gorsuch and nominated Judge Brett Kavanaugh.  Withdrew from the horrible, one-sided Iran Deal.  Moved U.S. Embassy to Jerusalem.  Protecting Americans from terrorists with the Travel Ban, upheld by Supreme Court.  Issued Executive Order to keep open Guantanamo Bay.  Concluded a historic U.S.-Mexico Trade Deal to replace NAFTA. And negotiations with Canada are underway as we speak.  Reached a breakthrough agreement with the E.U. to increase U.S. exports.  Imposed tariffs on foreign steel and aluminum to protect our national security.  Imposed tariffs on China in response to China’s forced technology transfer, intellectual property theft, and their chronically abusive trade practices.  Net exports are on track to increase by $59 billion this year.  Improved vetting and screening for refugees, and switched focus to overseas resettlement.  We have begun BUILDING THE WALL. Republicans want STRONG BORDERS and NO CRIME. ~The White House

Also needs to be a crime to hire,medical treat through government funding, welfare for illegals are a crime. Deport themselves and a charge to country of origin for any incarceration or money spent and if not our boarders will close to said country by default of over 30% abuse till payed in full

Also needs to be a crime to hire,medical treat through government funding, welfare for illegals are a crime. Deport themselves and a charge to country of origin for any incarceration or money spent and if not our boarders will close to said country by default of over 30% abuse till payed in full

Although the Trump administration has called immigration at the southern U.S. border a “crisis” that has a deleterious effect on public safety, unauthorized border crossings are currently the lowest they have been in decades and studies have consistently disproved links between immigration and crime. Further most of the families who crossed during enforcement of Trump’s “zero tolerance” policy were charged with misdemeanors.https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/have-undocumented-killed-63000-us-9-11/

America is at a HUGE RISK of terrorism because of the #TrumpShutdown . We do not need a wall-we already HAVE ► 654 miles of border fencing. The Rio Grande is along the border-you can't fence that. Most of the property is owned by individuals STILL fighting Obama era eminent domain claims to keep their land from being seized. THERE IS NO PLAN for a wall. Trump/GOP can fund the government, keep us safe, and put Americans back to work while they figure out what they even want to do!! Trump says it's concrete, then it's steel slats, etc. You need PLANS before you ask for billions of dollars, ffs!  MORE FACTS-----  ►Most undocumented immigrants don’t “sneak” across the border.  The majority of immigrants in the USA without authorization first entered the country legally, and then overstayed their visas. The Center for Migration Studies said in a 2017 report that crossing the border is not the way “the large majority of persons now becoming undocumented.” It reported that two-thirds of undocumented immigrants entered the U.S. legally and then simply overstayed their visas. If you legitimately are concerned about the issue of undocumented immigrants, as opposed to just exacerbating and exploiting fearmongering for political gain, then this is where you would focus — not the border.  ►Drugs entering the USA across the southern border are most often hidden in legal shipments.  Trump has suggested that the flow of heroin into the United States would be stanched by his border wall. He’s right that 90 percent of heroin enters through the southern border. However, according to the Drug Enforcement Agency, “illicit drugs are smuggled into the United States in concealed compartments within passenger vehicles or commingled with legitimate goods on tractor trailers.”  In other words, a wall wouldn’t stop most heroin from entering the country. And arguably, resources spent on the wall would divert from other enforcement mechanisms, such as more officers and technology at ports of entry to scan vehicles for drugs.    It’s also noteworthy that in ramping up prosecution of migrants trying to enter the United States, the Trump administration actually reduced prosecution of drug traffickers. Last June saw the fewest such prosecutions in two decades.    ►Illegal border crossings are down. Significantly.  In 2000, 1.6 million people were apprehended trying to cross the southern border into the United States. In 2001, 1.3 million were apprehended. In 2018? Less than 400,000. That’s not just a decline. It’s a significant decline.  ►The counties along the southern border are among the safest in the United States.  According to data from the Wilson Center, as summarized by The Washington Post, “The crime rates in U.S. border counties are lower than the average for similarly sized inland counties, with two exceptions out of 23 total.”  ►The White House is lying about terrorists crossing the southern border.  In an interview on Fox News this weekend, White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders insisted that “nearly 4,000 known or suspected terrorists come into our country illegally, and we know that our most vulnerable point of entry is at our southern border.” Sanders' careful wording suggests she knew she was more than bending the truth. Fox News anchor Chris Wallace fact-checked Sanders: “Do you know where those 4,000 people come, where they are captured? Airports.”  “The state department says there hasn’t been any terrorists found coming across the southern border,” Wallace stated. But Sanders kept pressing the lie, because Trump’s anti-immigrant agenda relies on fact-less fearmongering.  ►Migrant caravans aren’t “sneaking” across the border, either.  If you care about facts, it’s important to distinguish between illegal border crossings and migrants lawfully presenting themselves at southern ports of entry in order to apply for asylum. The simple fact is that large groups of very visible migrants, such as the main so-called migrant caravan of people fleeing violence in Central America, are obviously not trying to “sneak” across the U.S. border. They’re coming to the border to apply for asylum, which was a completely transparent and lawful process until Trump started changing the rules.    ►Conservative political figures and think tanks think Trump’s wall is pointless.  What apparently began as a memory device to help the undisciplined Trump remember what to thunder about during campaign appearances has turned into a central bone the president won’t let go of. But there’s a reason Trump couldn’t get funding for his wall during the past two years of his presidency when his own party completely controlled both houses of Congress: They didn’t want it. The New York Times reports that leading anti-immigration activists are concerned Trump’s focus on the “relatively ineffectual” wall is distracting from other strategies they would like prioritized.  ►There are already 654 miles of border fencing.  The U.S.-Mexico border is 1,933 miles long. Of that, 34 percent already has a wall or a fence — in particular, parts along the areas of the border that are most easily accessed by people traveling by car or on foot. That’s right, there’s already a wall along 654 miles of the U.S. border. What’s the rest? Huge mountains and rivers and vast stretches of land that are privately owned, which the United States would have to seize through eminent domain if Trump got his way. Mind you, those areas aren’t completely open — they’re actively patrolled using sensors and drones and other technology, the sorts of things experts say actually work.  The U.S.-Mexico border is 1,933 miles long. Of that, 34 percent already has a wall or a fence — in particular, parts along the areas of the border that are most easily accessed by people traveling by car or on foot. That’s right, there’s already a wall along 654 miles of the U.S. border. What’s the rest? Huge mountains and rivers and vast stretches of land that are privately owned, which the United States would have to seize through eminent domain if Trump got his way. Mind you, those areas aren’t completely open — they’re actively patrolled using sensors and drones and other technology, the sorts of things experts say actually work.

America needs to stand United to be strong and safe. The Dems have created one plan after another to divide and conquer us. The more we fight with each other over things that they have brought up or to attention, the less we are United. Our laws need to be plainly defined and strictly enforced. Corrupt  officials, law enforcement, etc, should be held accountable at the highest punishment bc they have no respect for the very laws they swore to uphold. People should fear the consequences of crime. Our nation should promote safety and peace due all those who uphold the laws that keep it that way.

Americans kill way more and produce more crime than any other country in the world. We are number 1 in incarceration of criminals. Safe my ass Mexico is just poor and they want to come here for the benefits 95 percent of the immigrants who cross illegally are just trying to survive and 5 percent are what yall are complaining about but like I said U. S has way more criminals

An illegal alien bastard murdered my godson.  May all MS-13 animals rot in hell.  I stand with the President.  BUILD THE WALL...and crime will fall.

And let’s take all the garbage and backed up toilet stuff from the national parks and throw it on the white house lawn and mitch mcconnells lawn in front of his house.  If dumpster is willing to continue the shutdown for years then ‘border security’ can’t be much of an ‘emergency’ now can it? A repulsican congress saw no ‘emergency’ for 2 years, now it’s an emergency?  No.   And we'll ignore the fact that Don the Con hasn't even spent the money he's already been given on border security. And that 90% of the drugs come in through the ports, sneaked in through official entry points at harbors and airports and the majority of undocumented immigrants arrive by plane, not hiking across the desert. And we’ll ignoring the fact that native-born Americans commit crime at higher rates. And ‘border security’ has held for over 200 years. The Wall is a scam and this SOB scum needs to be removed.  2018 12 terrorist list Southern border crossings  41 terrorist list Northern border crossings Build a Northern Border Wall and Canada will pay for it.  Your ‘terrorists’ are already here you deranged idiot.    Oklahoma City bombers – white male US citizen Colombine school massacre – white male US citizens Chardon school massacre – white male US citizen Isle Vista massacre – white male US citizen Charleston Church massacre – white male US citizen Las Vegas massacre- white male US citizen Sandy Hook massacre – white male US citizen Aurora Theatre – white male US citizen Casa Adobe shooter – white male US citizen Pulse Nightclub massacre – white male US citizen Austin bomber – white male US citizen Parkland School massacre – white male US citizen Santa Fe School massacre – white male US citizen Jacksonville Gamer shooter – white male US citizen MAGA mail bomber – white male US citizen

And yet, he hasn’t done anything for the Americans who continue to be shot and killed by other Americans at an alarming rate. What a joke. This crime is not indicative of immigrants.

Ange Richmond ... No... The percentage of crime by immigrants is lower compared to percentage of Americans.

Any crime committed by an illegal immigrant is a crime that could have been avoided if our borders were secure and our immigration laws were enforced.

Any crime committed by an illegal immigrant is a crime that could have been avoided if our borders were secure and our immigration laws were enforced.

Anyone opposing a legal and controlled immigration is out for more voters. There is absolutely no other explanation! America is a country of immigrants? Yes. Either immigrants had to bring assets, have a job waiting, have a sponsor, or a needed profession. Other family members often came over years later, when dad had worked and built a nest for the family. On top there was no welfare system before 1935. I can only say San Antonio can not bear any more welfare recipients. Schools districts are going broke, crime is through the roof and homeless people everywhere. Take care of your own first, before saving the rest of the world!

Arturo Elroy Mañana you need some common Sense if we stop drugs and illegals from coming into America crime will go down. Fact is real border security and wall where needed would pay for itself in 2?years! If you are capable these facts are easy to find.

Ashton Thompson Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Austin Baker he’s using the death to push for his border wall which he INCLUDES in the headline.   EXCEPT a wall will do nothing for illegal immigration. They overstay their visas or come in with forged documents. The ACTUAL drugs and crime come through vehicles through legal ports of entry.   He’s not asking you to pay for immigration suppression but an entire waste of money that’s more symbolic of America than it is an effective tools

Austin Wheeler I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat, and your state will fair better.  Also, go back to school and educate yourself on state and federal issues.  You must have skipped government classes.

BLAME THE TRAITOR DEMOCRATS FOR FIRST FAVORING AND PROTECTING ALL ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS WITH A SANCTUARY STATE LAW. NOW ALL ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS CAN COMFORTABLY DO A CRIME. EASILY GET FREE KICK BACK TIME WITH FREE ROOM AND BOARD BED INCLUDED AND GET REWARDED WITH NOT BEING DEPORTED. WE LOVE YOU LAURA TRUMP ❤ SORRY FOR YOUR PRECIOUS LOST MARY ANN ALL ANGEL'S FAMILIES.

Ben Ali, TUNISIA is the argument of American crime towards Tunisia and the people of the whole world Mr Trump, The American dignity arises on the repair of the situation in Tunisia and the destruction of the terrorist device ENNAHDHA which was implanted by Hillary Clinton

Bill Hoeler  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat, and your state will fair better.  Also, go back to school and educate yourself on state and federal issues.  You must have skipped government classes.

Bill Johnson   You should be saying make America sane again.  Not to worry,  With proper therapeutic intervention you will some day come to terms with the realization of having betrayed your country at the ballot box, handing it over to a Russian crime syndicate headed by a mentally and emotionally damaged New York City gangster.

Bob Cunha name a wall that has worked?  Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Brent Robinson   NATIONAL EMERGENCY 🚨 NATIONAL EMERGENCY 🚨 NATIONAL EMERGENCY 🚨  Don’t let that traitor stop you from protecting America .   BUILD THE WALL AND CRIME WILL FALL !

Brian Buckley  Yea and put the Clinton crime family behind it..

Buck Strunk yes. We have. Now see what is happening... 😶 Crime overall

Build the Wall Crime Will Fall..... More or less most countries have walls to protect their borders..... I cannot understand Demoncrats's objection to the wall to protect their own country.... What is their hidden agenda?

Build the wall ! We in Germany know what it means to have 1 , 5 Million strange people in the country , coming in during the last three years .Crime  , raping and knife attacs are growing up suddently !!Greetings from Hamburg !

Build the wall and in same time sand all illegal immigrants back where they come from. You will see difference in over economy. Unemployment O, school classrooms half full, jails half empty, court rooms need to be open two days a week. Waiting to go see Dr half as long. Over economy booming because government and States have surplus money. Crime cut 90% this is just small picture what is illegals immigrants doing to America and American Citizens.

Build the wall nd less crime

Build the wall!!! Keep our borders secure just like every other country does. Once again the Democrats would rather have illegal immigrants and any other crime ,if need be , just to disagree with President Trump. Stand strong!!

Build the wall. It is a necessity if we want our children, their children and the future generations to have a chance at a drug free life. It will also help contain human trafficking. There will always be crime, yet this will have a crippling impact on crime. Linda, Texas

Build the wall. It is a necessity if we want our children, their children and the future generations to have a chance at a drug free life. It will also help contain human trafficking. There will always be crime, yet this will have a crippling impact on crime. Linda, Texas

CM Garner please do Americans crime statistics also! Thanks!

Charlesetta Brown its waaaaay more than one plus them being here is a crime itself. Hence the name ILLEGAL

Charlesetta Brown r u crazy one crime ? Open yoyr eyes . There is crime by the hour from these illegals. Not to mention these drugs are kids are getting from them. You people need to wake up

Charlesetta Brown r u crazy one crime ? Open yoyr eyes . There is crime by the hour from these illegals. Not to mention these drugs are kids are getting from them. You people need to wake up

Charlesetta Brown there are tons of crimes by illegals that go unreported by media. And, you make the point for us supporters. We have enough home grown criminals to deal with, without opening the border for criminals from other countries. We have far too much crime as it is, and do not need more. So, your argument just worked against you. Thanks for playing, we'll see next week on the wall has begun

Chloe Lexington what crimes did they commit? Name one crime did the Trump family committed.

Chris Holman seriously?? Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Chris Young so you can feel safe from the brown people?  The crime is happening already with Americans.

Chuck Martin  Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

CliffandKim Ferrell   Not to worry,  With proper therapeutic intervention you will some day come to terms with the realization of having betrayed your country at the ballot box, handing it over to a Russian crime syndicate headed by a mentally and emotionally damaged New York City gangster.

Colorado’s crime rate is growing faster than most of the country. We are a sanctuary state. We are paying a high price. We need security. DENVER (CBS4) – Colorado taxpayers paid more than $522 million to imprison illegal immigrants convicted of crimes over the past 20 years, according to a CBS4 investigation.

Crime has no color. Hate and resentment only bring more turmoil. Trust in God. Not in a wall or Trump.

Crime rates are higher for Americans than for immigrants. Fix gun control.

Curtis Rice lol - these comments are great. No one can even pull a BreitBart article above crime based on demographic.

DACA is disappointing. First: We've had 7 amnesty programs since 1986. If ANYONE was had the opportunity at amnesty and didn't take it - then it should be off the table for them (for kids, I'd give it 2). Second: Anyone that has been here 5 years or less does not have ties to this country - they still have ties to their former country - deport them! So you are dealing with people from 2000-2013. Then ALL DACA applicants must be vetted - if they have committted ANY other crime - they are deported. Third: They should NEVER gain citizenship, a green card to allow them to stay maybe, but not citizenship. Breaking the  law should never be rewarded like that. Fourth: They should be ineligible for welfare. Fifth: Their ability to stay should not be the reason for parents, siblings, aunts, uncles to stay....it should not be a means to chain migration. We, as a country, need to send a strong message to the rest of the world - we welcome LEGAL immigrants, but if you come illegally you WILL BE deported!

Daniel Antonio Thomas  well how does that stand for crime committed by Your own people? Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Daniel Antonio Thomas  well how does that stand for crime committed by Your own people? Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Death sneaking into our nation? Even scientists are disciplined  if they dare mention  that disease crosses our border as easily as illegals from all over the world. Disease. Ebola. Banned words.   GenerationalDynamics.com  DOES report   1/20/2019  Ebola outbreak in DR Congo now spreading exponentially faster Local DRC population giving little cooperation to health officials ...........The number of Ebola cases recorded each day in the Democratic Republic of Congo (DRC) has doubled, indicating that it may spread to other regions and other countries. That it will soon travel to Uganda, Rwanda, Burundi, and even South Sudan. The epidemic was originally centered in Beni, with a population of 232,000. But it has spread to Butamben, with a population of over a million, a densely populated trade city near the Uganda border. Further south along the highway from Butembo are the million-plus population cities Goma and Bukusu. The World Health Organization (WHO) has been focusing its efforts on preventing a spread to the latter two cities, since “all bets are off” for stopping the epidemic if it reaches there"""" ................................................................................................,,,,,,,,,,,,,,.. For them to report even this much is unusual. Drudge is the only outlet covering it.  And Ebola does not care if you are black, white, pink, brown, rich, poor, Muslim, Christian, Jew, Hindu, male, female, both, legal, illegal.,......We all die just as easily as those in Africa. IF it spreads, there is going to be an exodus out of Africa. The easiest nation in the world for disappearing? USA. No Borders. No Punishment for breaking in nation.NO punishment for overstaying Visas.  Usually rewarded with citizenship Look at the Dreamers. They have tormented every Republican member in Congress, but they still turn back flips to legalize the  Democrat Activists. And they are not kids. Half are over 30. Few in military. Few graduated college. 40% have gang ties. they can have  3 misdemeanors. ( You try that). Crime rate is 1 1/2 times that of USA Born kids. Legal Immigrants get mixed in with illegal, so truth can be hidden. Legal Immigrants. Law abiding for most part. Good People,  Meaning No Disrespect to anyone, Would  be possible for Don Jr. to replace the Kushners as Senior advisors? Throw  the conservatives a bone? Everyone likes and respects him for standing up for his dad.  Their hearts seem to beat for the same team.  These are scary times. This is HUGE news. It will be reported very little.

Do not believe one word of what N. P. and C. S. say.  . If you open the government, They will tell you to take a flying leap.    Stick to your guns.  Why don’t they acknowledge that you are asking for 5.7 billion to build a Wall but it is costing 150 billion a year to support the illegals.   Even without counting the crime, drugs, diseases, terrorist, etc, that is coming across our southern border.    It’s a “No Brainer”  for a reasonable thinking person. Why are they putting illegals needs over American citizens needs..  They took an Oath to uphold the Constitution of The United States of Americat but they seem to be violating that sacred Oath By not protecting and taking care of American citizens over illegals.

Edgar D. GutierrezTexas is the only state to track crime specifically among illegal immigrants let's use them as an example:  Between January 2011- January 2019 there have been 10 school shootings in the state of Texas. Of those 10 shootings 15 people have died and 28 have been injured.   Now let's look at crime amongst illegal immigrants in Texas. "Between June 1, 2011 and January 31, 2019, 189,000 illegal aliens were charged with more than 295,000 criminal offenses. DPS criminal history records reflect those criminal charges have thus far resulted in over 120,000 convictions including 238 HOMICIDE convictions; 13,662 assault convictions; 3,158 burglary convictions; 17,930 drug convictions; 175 kidnapping convictions; 7,100 theft convictions; 11,336 obstructing police convictions; 1,013 robbery convictions; 1,710 sexual assault convictions; 1,153 sexual offense convictions; and 1,282 weapon convictions."  That's just one state.

Edgar D. GutierrezTexas is the only state to track crime specifically among illegal immigrants let's use them as an example:  Between January 2011- January 2019 there have been 10 school shootings in the state of Texas. Of those 10 shootings 15 people have died and 28 have been injured.   Now let's look at crime amongst illegal immigrants in Texas. "Between June 1, 2011 and January 31, 2019, 189,000 illegal aliens were charged with more than 295,000 criminal offenses. DPS criminal history records reflect those criminal charges have thus far resulted in over 120,000 convictions including 238 HOMICIDE convictions; 13,662 assault convictions; 3,158 burglary convictions; 17,930 drug convictions; 175 kidnapping convictions; 7,100 theft convictions; 11,336 obstructing police convictions; 1,013 robbery convictions; 1,710 sexual assault convictions; 1,153 sexual offense convictions; and 1,282 weapon convictions."  That's just one state.

Emily Neal I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat, and your state will fair better.  Also, go back to school and educate yourself on state and federal issues.  You must have skipped government classes.

Enough of illegals sneeking in bringing drugs, diseases and crime!  BUILD THE WALL!

Every sanctuary city should be held accountable for these crimes. If it comes to light that an illegal was released instead of reported, then commits any crime, victims should be allowed to sue for damages.

Except you've turned down every safe border policy because it doesn't fund your ineffective wall.  Some your border security policies are great, but your wall will not stop significant amounts of drugs or illegals. Immigrants, and especially deportable immigrants, are our lowest violent crime and drug population.  I am with you, however, on making the lives of our border patrol agents easier. So are the democrats who have met every single one of your demands in compromise, even offering to give you some money for the wall.  I don't want to pay even a cent for it. You said "Mexico will pay for the wall". Keep that promise and you can have the colossal waste of resources you so desperately desire.  Meanwhile, reopen the government that you shut down Mr. President. Those families are actually suffering. They have actually had their job stolen. You said you would "proudly* do this. I am asking you, desperately, for families, for single men and women, for US children and elderly who depend on support networks to survive, for veterans, for those with significant medical conditions: please reopen the government. You are hurting these people. They are your people Mr. President.

Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE...

Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....

Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on, our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE...

Florence Tedesco Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

For more than a century, innumerable studies have confirmed two simple yet powerful truths about the relationship between immigration and crime: immigrants are less likely to commit serious crimes or be behind bars than the native-born, and high rates of immigration are associated with lower rates of violent crime and property crime. This holds true for both legal immigrants and the unauthorized, regardless of their country of origin or level of education. In other words, the overwhelming majority of immigrants are not “criminals” by any commonly accepted definition of the term. For this reason, harsh immigration policies are not effective in fighting crime. Unfortunately, immigration policy is frequently shaped more by fear and stereotype than by empirical evidence. As a result, immigrants have the stigma of “criminality” ascribed to them by an ever-evolving assortment of laws and immigration-enforcement mechanisms. Put differently, immigrants are being defined more and more as threats. Whole new classes of “felonies” have been created which apply only to immigrants, deportation has become a punishment for even minor offenses, and policies aimed at trying to end unauthorized immigration have been made more punitive rather than more rational and practical. In short, immigrants themselves are being criminalized.

For more than a century, innumerable studies have confirmed two simple yet powerful truths about the relationship between immigration and crime: immigrants are less likely to commit serious crimes or be behind bars than the native-born, and high rates of immigration are associated with lower rates of violent crime and property crime. This holds true for both legal immigrants and the unauthorized, regardless of their country of origin or level of education. In other words, the overwhelming majority of immigrants are not “criminals” by any commonly accepted definition of the term. For this reason, harsh immigration policies are not effective in fighting crime. Unfortunately, immigration policy is frequently shaped more by fear and stereotype than by empirical evidence. As a result, immigrants have the stigma of “criminality” ascribed to them by an ever-evolving assortment of laws and immigration-enforcement mechanisms. Put differently, immigrants are being defined more and more as threats. Whole new classes of “felonies” have been created which apply only to immigrants, deportation has become a punishment for even minor offenses, and policies aimed at trying to end unauthorized immigration have been made more punitive rather than more rational and practical. In short, immigrants themselves are being criminalized.

For more than a century, innumerable studies have confirmed two simple yet powerful truths about the relationship between immigration and crime: immigrants are less likely to commit serious crimes or be behind bars than the native-born, and high rates of immigration are associated with lower rates of violent crime and property crime. This holds true for both legal immigrants and the unauthorized, regardless of their country of origin or level of education. In other words, the overwhelming majority of immigrants are not “criminals” by any commonly accepted definition of the term. For this reason, harsh immigration policies are not effective in fighting crime. Unfortunately, immigration policy is frequently shaped more by fear and stereotype than by empirical evidence. As a result, immigrants have the stigma of “criminality” ascribed to them by an ever-evolving assortment of laws and immigration-enforcement mechanisms. Put differently, immigrants are being defined more and more as threats. Whole new classes of “felonies” have been created which apply only to immigrants, deportation has become a punishment for even minor offenses, and policies aimed at trying to end unauthorized immigration have been made more punitive rather than more rational and practical. In short, immigrants themselves are being criminalized.

For more than a century, innumerable studies have confirmed two simple yet powerful truths about the relationship between immigration and crime: immigrants are less likely to commit serious crimes or be behind bars than the native-born, and high rates of immigration are associated with lower rates of violent crime and property crime. This holds true for both legal immigrants and the unauthorized, regardless of their country of origin or level of education. In other words, the overwhelming majority of immigrants are not “criminals” by any commonly accepted definition of the term. For this reason, harsh immigration policies are not effective in fighting crime. Unfortunately, immigration policy is frequently shaped more by fear and stereotype than by empirical evidence. As a result, immigrants have the stigma of “criminality” ascribed to them by an ever-evolving assortment of laws and immigration-enforcement mechanisms. Put differently, immigrants are being defined more and more as threats. Whole new classes of “felonies” have been created which apply only to immigrants, deportation has become a punishment for even minor offenses, and policies aimed at trying to end unauthorized immigration have been made more punitive rather than more rational and practical. In short, immigrants themselves are being criminalized.

Four killed in Reno and Gardnerville, NV. Illegal alien arrested for the crime

Funny you should mention El Paso...isn;t that the city with some kind of wall that was put up on the grounds it would way lower crime rates...but the city was already among the safest in the country and its wall didn't lower crimes rates...?

Gail Bailey Adams  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat, and your state will fair better.  Also, go back to school and educate yourself on state and federal issues.  You must have skipped government classes.

Gary Kane , right! COME HERE IDIOT to FEEL what it's like to Live in a sanctuary City!  Only a matter of time before they are your neighbors! When your Children are being taught in TRAILERS!n LAS VEGAS! CRIME , DISEASE! Come see! until it hits home and YOU Suffer NOTHING WILL change!

Gus Keller Um, it's a public phone number, doesn't make us snitches. We actually don't know anyone here illegally. We have helped people achieve legal status over the years. Not a snitch, just believe "Don't do the crime, if you can't do the time." - From the Wife.

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda GriffinHenk 12) Border Security and Immigration  ~Secured $1.6 billion for border wall construction in the March 2018 omnibus bill.  ~Construction of a 14-mile section of border wall began near San Diego.  ~Worked to protect American communities from the threat posed by the vile MS-13 gang.  ~ICE’s Homeland Security Investigations division arrested 796 MS-13 members and associates in FY 2017, an 83 percent increase from the prior year.  ~Justice worked with partners in Central America to secure criminal charges against more than 4,000 MS-13 members.  ~Border Patrol agents arrested 228 illegal aliens affiliated with MS-13 in FY 2017.  ~Fighting to stop the scourge of illegal drugs at our border.  ~ICE HSI seized more than 980,000 pounds of narcotics in FY 2017, including 2,370 pounds of fentanyl and 6,967 pounds of heroin.  ~ICE HSI dedicated nearly 630,000 investigative hours towards halting the illegal import of fentanyl.  ~ICE HSI made 11,691 narcotics-related arrests in FY 2017.  ~Stop Opioid Abuse and Reduce Drug Supply and Demand introduced new measures to keep dangerous drugs out the United States.  ~Signed the INTERDICT Act into law, enhancing efforts to detect and intercept synthetic opioids.  ~DOJ secured its first-ever indictments against Chinese fentanyl manufacturers.  ~DOJ launched their Joint Criminal Opioid Darknet Enforcement (J-CODE) team, aimed at disrupting online illicit opioid sales.  ~Released an immigration framework that includes the resources required to secure our borders and close legal loopholes, and repeatedly called on Congress to fix our broken immigration laws.  ~Authorized the deployment of the National Guard to help secure the border.  ~Enhanced vetting of individuals entering the U.S. from countries that don’t meet security standards, helping to ensure individuals who pose a threat to our country are identified before they enter.These procedures were upheld in a June 2018 Supreme Court hearing.  ~ICE removed over 226,000 illegal aliens from the United States in 2017.  ~ICE rescued or identified over 500 human trafficking victims and over 900 child exploitation victims in 2017 alone.  ~In 2017, ICE Enforcement and Removal Operations (ERO) arrested more than 127,000 aliens with criminal convictions or charges, responsible for Over 76,000 with dangerous drug offenses. More than 48,000 with assault offenses. More than 11,000 with weapons offenses. More than 5,000 with sexual assault offenses. More than 2,000 with kidnapping offenses. Over 1,800 with homicide offenses.  ~Created the Victims of Immigration Crime Engagement (VOICE) Office in order to support the victims and families affected by illegal alien crime.  ~More than doubled the number of counties participating in the 287(g) program, which allows jails to detain criminal aliens until they are transferred to ICE custody.

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda GriffinHenk 12) Border Security and Immigration  ~Secured $1.6 billion for border wall construction in the March 2018 omnibus bill.  ~Construction of a 14-mile section of border wall began near San Diego.  ~Worked to protect American communities from the threat posed by the vile MS-13 gang.  ~ICE’s Homeland Security Investigations division arrested 796 MS-13 members and associates in FY 2017, an 83 percent increase from the prior year.  ~Justice worked with partners in Central America to secure criminal charges against more than 4,000 MS-13 members.  ~Border Patrol agents arrested 228 illegal aliens affiliated with MS-13 in FY 2017.  ~Fighting to stop the scourge of illegal drugs at our border.  ~ICE HSI seized more than 980,000 pounds of narcotics in FY 2017, including 2,370 pounds of fentanyl and 6,967 pounds of heroin.  ~ICE HSI dedicated nearly 630,000 investigative hours towards halting the illegal import of fentanyl.  ~ICE HSI made 11,691 narcotics-related arrests in FY 2017.  ~Stop Opioid Abuse and Reduce Drug Supply and Demand introduced new measures to keep dangerous drugs out the United States.  ~Signed the INTERDICT Act into law, enhancing efforts to detect and intercept synthetic opioids.  ~DOJ secured its first-ever indictments against Chinese fentanyl manufacturers.  ~DOJ launched their Joint Criminal Opioid Darknet Enforcement (J-CODE) team, aimed at disrupting online illicit opioid sales.  ~Released an immigration framework that includes the resources required to secure our borders and close legal loopholes, and repeatedly called on Congress to fix our broken immigration laws.  ~Authorized the deployment of the National Guard to help secure the border.  ~Enhanced vetting of individuals entering the U.S. from countries that don’t meet security standards, helping to ensure individuals who pose a threat to our country are identified before they enter.These procedures were upheld in a June 2018 Supreme Court hearing.  ~ICE removed over 226,000 illegal aliens from the United States in 2017.  ~ICE rescued or identified over 500 human trafficking victims and over 900 child exploitation victims in 2017 alone.  ~In 2017, ICE Enforcement and Removal Operations (ERO) arrested more than 127,000 aliens with criminal convictions or charges, responsible for Over 76,000 with dangerous drug offenses. More than 48,000 with assault offenses. More than 11,000 with weapons offenses. More than 5,000 with sexual assault offenses. More than 2,000 with kidnapping offenses. Over 1,800 with homicide offenses.  ~Created the Victims of Immigration Crime Engagement (VOICE) Office in order to support the victims and families affected by illegal alien crime.  ~More than doubled the number of counties participating in the 287(g) program, which allows jails to detain criminal aliens until they are transferred to ICE custody.

Here's an idea. You have almost 200 military bases around the world. Close down 5 of them, and use that money for the wall.   You have almost 13,000 military aircraft. With much more being ordered to build. Don't build 5 of them, and use that money towards the wall.  You're worth $10 billion, so you say. Alot of which is assets for useless things like golf and country clubs. Sell 5 billion worth of it, and use the money for the damn wall. This should be enough. Plaster your name on it every 5 miles, and then shut up about it.  Once you do that, you can then finally focus on the real dangers facing Americans. Like say, drunk driving. Which literally kill hundreds of people a DAY. Immigrants, including illegals, have literally among the lowest crime rates of anybody. You got to look at that, and look for what's really wrong and then work to fix it. Scapegoating on illegals, for 'real Americans', which there's no such thing, is stupid. But what do you expect on Planet Stupid.

Here‘s just some of the crimes committed by illegals in a six month period in Texas,  take into account this doesn’t include all the crimes where the illegal perp wasn’t caught and only includes those that were already in a database.  It is DISGUSTING the level of crime you demofilth have allowed in this country.  You are a bunch of damn traitors.      https://www.dps.texas.gov/administration/crime_records/pages/txcriminalalienstatistics.htm

How can people just not view west coast drug crime and neverending homeless people with drug psychosis as a direct relation with that border

How did these immigrants get here? Probably at a port of entry. El Paso's crime level has increased since a wall was put up.

How hypocritical of Democrats who want to take guns from people because some are used to commit violent crime, but at the same time advocate free passage across our borders by many who have used them.

However the crime rate is lower by illegal immigrants than by legal citizens.

I HAVE REACHED THE EXALTED POSITION OF A HATE MONGER [According to Facebook].  Basically, Facebook Deems That Any of My Posts [In the Parlance of Terms and Conditions Are in ANY WAY UNFLATTERING with Regard to Illegal Aliens / Other Citizens] Are to Be Considered as HATE SPEECH AND WILL NOT BE POSTED.  The Offending Posts Are Shaded in Grey and Will Be Destroyed When I Leave the Web Page on Which the Post Was Entered.  This Flies in the Name of Logic as Many of My Posts ARE COMPRISED OF LINKS to Documentation Available in the Public Records [e.g. []- DOJ ... There Are over 56,000 ILLEGAL ALIENS in the Federal Prison System So Why Should We Let More in ??; []- DOJ ... It Is a Crime to Emote That the President and Members of Congress Should Be SUBJECT TO PHYSICAL HARM].  Animal Farm Rears It’s Ugly Head ... ONLY LIBERALS KNOW THE TRUTH OF POLITICAL MATTERS !! =+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+= MY FILE || csfe2015\ facebook\ f_share\ family\ cour10ay\ 2016\ CE0803_A.wpd

I agree Build The WALL send gun choppers down to patrol our Border and warning shots to stay away from our Borders. Call up their President and Mexican President and start charging fines. Change the Tampered Language Obama , Clinton’s, Pelosi, Schumer changed to make it open Border to allow Mexican, Middle-Easterners and Central Americans Ect. All to enter the U.S.A. Stop allowing so many in , or to come here at all Crime is rampant ! Rape then murder, it’s appalling! We are only one Country get them out of our Government they are tearing our Country to pieces. Be more like Poland . No  strangers are allowed to mass invade and come in on their families and citizens to do them harm by diseases, rape, murder, illegally/ or other wise unvetted. Traitors speaking against us the American people we will not give up our guns to protect ourselves with, we will not submit to or obey an ideology that goes against our Christian Beliefs they should be deported out our Country . No to Sharia Law it is incompatible with the Constitution of the U.S.A. Mc Carran-Walters Act 1952. Thomas Jefferson V. Muslim Pirates.1800s.

I believe in legal immigration but not illegal immigration.  If this continue this country will become a cesspool.  We have enough crime from our own citizens. We don’t need criminals from other countries

I demand IT - I am TAXPAYER.                                                                 - I have been in dozens of cities and have SEEN with my own eyes the DETERIORATION, CRIME, LITTER of waterways highways and neighborhoods, , ,etc., etc.,                                        I HAVE TO CONCEAL Carry in Cities where I grew up that were Safe but are not ANYMORE  THANK YOU FOR ALL YOU ARE DOING PRESIDENT TRUMP!

I do not see anything wrong by securing our borders.  Entering LEGALLY was and is always an option.  God bless you MR. President.  Hold your grounds in Making America Great Again.  Looking at Europe's current crime crisis from illegal immigration only praying that wall will be built and built soon.

I don't understand what the issue with the wall is, it's a win win scenario… we create construction jobs while it's being built, dissuade illegal immigration and by doing so help raise the wages of normal American people, because ANY supply of people who are willing to work for less than the average American will bring the wages down… so what if produce has to get a bit more expensive if we don't have to deal with the other negatives that come with illegal immigration: crime, drugs, etc.

I figure any American would want security. If anyone wants to come to this country than good let them in. However, do it the right way through a border to be screened. No telling how many people are coming through that are criminals. I feel anyone should be able to come to this country, but why would you want people just coming in waves that have the potential to bring more crime to your city.

I get all my news from Kremlin State TV, Rump’s Real News, Alex Jones, Fox and Friends, and The National Enquirer. Good to know I'm well informed.  So I know that if you want to buy a box of cereal, you have to have a voter ID and that Donald gave our soldiers a 10% pay raise. Mexican drug smugglers throw sacks of drugs over the fence and our people get hit on the head with 60 pounds of stuff.  I know the deep state has access to weather weapons capable of not only creating tornadoes but also moving them around, on demand.  I know that the government is using chemicals in order to turn people gay, using a mysterious "gay bomb" devised by the Pentagon. I know that no one died at Sandy Hook Elementary School because the Uniform Crime Reports showed no murders in Newtown for 2012 and the “victims” were child actors.  https://www.cnbc.com/2018/09/14/alex-jones-5-most-disturbing-ridiculous-conspiracy-theories.htmlAlex Jones' 5 most disturbing and ridiculous conspiracy theoriescnbc.com

I have dedicated & made sacrifices for this country or my county since 1974. Today I am proudly on furlough as my wife & I are sacrificing to support President Trump's efforts to secure the border, one of the main promises upon which we voted him in. The border was relatively secure when my parents (since naturalized & successful business people before retiring) immigrated here during dangerous times before President LBJ created welfare programs. It was a real struggle. If they didn't work--they didn't eat. If they didn't eat, they would die. Period. I say "relatively" because southern border immigrants were humble & respectful workers from mostly Mexico--not massive groups from Central & South America making demands of governments who lured them with give-away programs during Democrat terms.  In recent years while on helicopter patrol between Rivera & Falfurrias I have seen up to 40+ illegal immigrants burst out running from under one mesquite tree.  Unheard of in my previous decades of law enforcement.  Where were Schumer & Pelosi crying in 2013 when I was furloughed two weeks from my Corpus Christi federal job under Obama? And for what cause--to figure out who was going to pay for a national security barrier?  Hell no, but instead to force hard-working Judeo-Christian taxpayers to pay for the socialist issues of Abortion, Planned Parenthood, and the self-destructive pyramid-scheme called Obamacare. THAT shutdown was the real "tantrum," to use Schumer's word from last night's rebuttal. In 2013 I--a former Democrat--was screwed by Democrats because they won their shutdown tantrum.  They created the shutdown, now they can't stand it when their own weapon is used against them.   President Trump, please do not succumb to the emotional screamers. Anyone with my military aircrew survival training can recognize self-serving propaganda tactics of Exaggerate/Fabricate/Saturate.  All manners of border security ARE vital. Anyone with my law enforcement experience knows that you protect your home with multiple layers, not just locked doors, not just a dog, not just a fence, not just security lights, not just cameras, not just a loud alarm, but with a totality of layers which exponentially increases the deterrence factor in a burglar's mind.  Anyone with my CBP experience knows from direct experience that this crisis is real, and unmanageable without enforcement.  President Trump, you are right about the military or federal, long range Predator drones with Radar domes & VADER pods such as the ones we used to launch from Corpus Christi. Fantastic surveillance, being able to detect smugglers/crossers, groups, vehicles & vessels from 20,000 feet day or night.  Yet these or other advanced airborne or ground sensors mean nothing without obstacles, barriers, or boots-on-the-ground to stop or apprehend them. For every effective barrier that is put in place or extended, our limited agents can more efficiently concentrate their efforts in other problem areas.   Great speech last night by President Trump, in the courageous lineage of Presidents John F. Kennedy (Cuban missile crisis) & Ronald Reagan (Libya, Berlin Wall, "The bombing starts in 10 minutes!")  Making America Safe & Strong again.  I know everyone can't share my experiences & direct observations in life where I can speak first hand about these issues, but I feel sorry for people who instead repeat blind rhetoric, without analyzing facts.  Like those who believe the reporters and politicians who, BEFORE THE SPEECH, were saying that it would contain lies. The word for that is "Prejudice" (Pre-Judging).  And worse, from politicians who supported strong borders when someone else was president.  Partisan haters, putting party before national defense.  I remember occasionally having intermediate supervisors like that in county sheriff politics, who if it was not THEIR idea, it was shot down, regardless of how much money it saved or how effectively crime would be decreased.  You cannot impeach a president for hatred or dislike or disagreement, you need articulable crime(s).  Cut the Democrat funds using our tax money for Planned Parenthood to find the money for strong borders.  Show me any other strong, successful nation on earth that has open borders without monstrous taxation?

I strongly feel that if Govenors / Senators /  Congressmen & Attorney Generals keep protecting criminals or Illegal immigrants that cause harm & crime to the people of the USA & keep protecting harboring the repeat offenders & aiding & abetting " " Sanctuary Cities or " illegals " regardless of nationality & the criminals & committing treason against the people of the USA... That the people of that State should file a Federal Class Action lawsuit & start a go fund me account to pay for it...  ;) just a thought... ;)   SHARE IT YOU AGREE OR IF YOU FEEL FROGGY...

I support securing our border and strongly enforcing immigration laws. An undocumented immigrant does not have the legal right to be in this country, so if they commit a crime and are here illegally,  I consider that a failure of the federal goverment and our immigration system

I support you 100% get the drugs off the streets ! Yes crime rate is going up for the Americans because drug dealers are getting it into their hands and they are going crazy and committing crime. We need more focus on mental health as well .

I support you 100% get the drugs off the streets ! Yes crime rate is going up for the Americans because drug dealers are getting it into their hands and they are going crazy and committing crime. We need more focus on mental health as well .

I want immigrants to come here legally we have drugs and crime overflowing from the border build the wall

I was in Isreal last year. They put a wall up from Syria and crime went down 80 percent, especially terrorism. We have some misguided people in office.  Time to change their dance card.  They've been wined n danced too long.

ILLEGAL isn't a RACE..ITS CRIMINAL.  The people who claim its inhuman-where are they with American Vets? Homeless citizens? THIS Border Security is about trying to destroy Pres Trump..and to allow more illegals into the US... IRONICALLY the DEms want BACKGROUND CHECKS for US CItizens BUT not for illegals?? Besides increasing disease, crime, human traffiking, drugs AND hundreds of thousands of illegals without skills/education/money or the ability to be independent... and these illegals want to be on the welfare of American taxpayers-----CAN the DEMS give us reason WHY we should have open borders???

IM SO SORRY FOR ALL THE PEOPLE WHO HAS LOST THEIR LOVE ONES IN THE HANDS OF A CRIMINALS.  BUT, WE CANNOT BUILD A WALL AROUND ALL THE AMERICANS CITIZENS WHO COMMIT A CRIME AND KILLED OUR LOVE ONES TOO, SO, A WALL, IS NOT THE ANSWER TO THIS PROBLEM.

If President Trump only knew of this... murder... just down the road from the Winter White House...  Hoping to impress upon Governor Ron DeSantis that the FDLE and FBI should "get on this". Murderers walking free because of incompetent Officers and wealthy backers.   Executive Summary:  Palm Beach County family seeks redress, fair justice, and relief after being denied U.S. and State of Florida Constitutional rights under color of law related to and concerning the homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER.  Specifically, in the face of overwhelming relevant, material, and competent evidence, to date all State and Local Authorities have refused to initiate a criminal investigation into and regarding the opiate caused death of NIA LEE ANKNER. Although the surviving family has provided competent and substantial evidence of a homicide; there has been no related criminal investigation initiated nor conducted by any authorized Florida law enforcement entity, being wholly contrary to and violative of Art. I, § 2, and Art. I, § 16(b) Fla. Const. (1998), and § 839.13, § 839.20, § 843.0855, and § 843.14, Fla. Stat.  Due to incompetence of Town of Palm Beach investigating Law Enforcement Officers at the crime scene, and the subsequent and continuing obstruction of justice by supervising Town of Palm Beach Officers; the Florida Department of Law Enforcement, (“FDLE”), Palm Beach Sheriff's Office (“PBSO”), Town of Palm Beach Police Department (“PBPD”), Florida State Attorney’s Office 15th Judicial District (“15th SAO”), and the Palm Beach County Medical Examiner’s Office (“PBME”) have all refused to conduct a homicide investigation, as required by Law.  NIA LEE ANKNER’s surviving family has information and evidence providing probable cause to charge and arrest one KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY for 1st Degree Capital Murder.   In August of 2017, KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY and other person’s yet unknown, in the County of Palm Beach, and against the statute, peace, and dignity of the State of Florida, did unlawfully from a premeditated design to effect the death of a human being, and caused the death of a human being, NIA LEE ANKNER, through the unlawful distribution of opium or any compound, derivative or preparation of opium and/or fentanyl, opium or any compound, derivative or perpetration of opium, and/or fentanyl, and which was the proximate cause of the death of NIA LEE ANKNER , did kill and murder, NIA LEE ANKNER, contrary to Florida Statue 782.04(1)(a)1, 782.04(1)(a)2, and 782.04(1)(a)3. (CAPITAL FELONY).  "Dear Governor Ron DeSantis,  I and my family pray you are well and happy; and, we thank God you are Florida’s 46th Chief Executive.  My name is Charles E. Ankner. I (and my family) seek your Office’s review of the information herein related to the homicide of my biological niece, Nia Lee Ankner (“Decedent”); with an end goal of a competent homicide investigation being performed by an authorized Florida criminal investigative entity outside of Palm Beach County.  With your being a former U.S. Navy JAG Officer, and my being a USAF Veteran and certified long experienced paralegal; I’ll strive to be accurate and brief in my presentation, and yet be comprehensive.  Quite frankly Governor, we pray the information herein will make your blood boil; and, motivate you to action.  In August of 2017, the Decedent had met a former coworker-acquaintance, one Kelly Anne McCauley, for a Saturday afternoon pool swim at another person’s residence near the Town of Palm Beach. Neither made it to the pool; and the Decedent was brain-dead from an opiate overdose within two-hours of meeting that day with McCauley. McCauley also delayed calling 911 for twenty-minutes while instead calling her newly estranged boyfriend. By the time McCauley did call 911, eighty-percent of the Decedent’s brain was dead.   Admittedly, the Decedent also had a blood alcohol level of 0.15 in her system at the time of her brain-death. The combination of an opiate supplied by McCauley and ethanol caused the Decedent to stop breathing in the presence of McCauley while she purposefully delayed summoning help. In fact, besides after a twenty-minute in calling 911; McCauley did nothing to render help to the Decedent (rescue-breathing, flag down other cars for help, going into the Office of the Condo parking lot where they were at). McCauley, beyond a reasonable doubt, after supplying a fatal illicit opiate to the Decedent actually and proximately caused her death; and McCauley also for twenty minutes stood-by and let the Decedent suffocate to death.   Kelly McCauley has a long criminal record in Palm Beach County, including for but not limited to: illicit controlled substance use and possession, illicit drug paraphernalia use and possession, solicitation of prostitution, felony armed robbery, felony battery, felony grand theft, and destroying, tampering with, and concealing evidence. In my review of her criminal record; McCauley has always pled-out and never served more than a few months in the Palm Beach County Jail.  Tragically, McCauley is an all too common Palm Beach County catch and release felon. Even more tragic; McCauley was arrested only four-months before murdering the Decedent by Palm Beach County Florida Highway Patrol, for illegal possession of Xanax; with the driver of the car she was in unconscious and the car against the center barrier of Interstate-95. McCauley has lost her driving privileges due to several DUIs.  The Decedent had no criminal nor arrest record.  The motivation for PBPD Officers to resist, “soft-peddle”, or obstruct any and all related criminal investigations is that instead of concentrating on McCauley related to the Decedent’s condition and ultimate death; the PBPD exclusively concentrated on collecting evidence against the Decedent for DUI. In other words, PBPD Detective Lawrence Mennetti and Sgt. Scott Duquette “screwed the pooch” by not processing the scene and detaining McCauley pursuant to Florida Statute. Thereafter, Detective Mennetti performed what believe to be a half-stepped sham investigation in the “incident” and concluded “…no crime was committed in our jurisdiction.”.  Just a draft. How am I doing?   https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/

If President Trump only knew of this... murder... just down the road from the Winter White House...  Hoping to impress upon Governor Ron DeSantis that the FDLE and FBI should "get on this". Murderers walking free because of incompetent Officers and wealthy backers.   Executive Summary:  Palm Beach County family seeks redress, fair justice, and relief after being denied U.S. and State of Florida Constitutional rights under color of law related to and concerning the homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER.  Specifically, in the face of overwhelming relevant, material, and competent evidence, to date all State and Local Authorities have refused to initiate a criminal investigation into and regarding the opiate caused death of NIA LEE ANKNER. Although the surviving family has provided competent and substantial evidence of a homicide; there has been no related criminal investigation initiated nor conducted by any authorized Florida law enforcement entity, being wholly contrary to and violative of Art. I, § 2, and Art. I, § 16(b) Fla. Const. (1998), and § 839.13, § 839.20, § 843.0855, and § 843.14, Fla. Stat.  Due to incompetence of Town of Palm Beach investigating Law Enforcement Officers at the crime scene, and the subsequent and continuing obstruction of justice by supervising Town of Palm Beach Officers; the Florida Department of Law Enforcement, (“FDLE”), Palm Beach Sheriff's Office (“PBSO”), Town of Palm Beach Police Department (“PBPD”), Florida State Attorney’s Office 15th Judicial District (“15th SAO”), and the Palm Beach County Medical Examiner’s Office (“PBME”) have all refused to conduct a homicide investigation, as required by Law.  NIA LEE ANKNER’s surviving family has information and evidence providing probable cause to charge and arrest one KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY for 1st Degree Capital Murder.   In August of 2017, KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY and other person’s yet unknown, in the County of Palm Beach, and against the statute, peace, and dignity of the State of Florida, did unlawfully from a premeditated design to effect the death of a human being, and caused the death of a human being, NIA LEE ANKNER, through the unlawful distribution of opium or any compound, derivative or preparation of opium and/or fentanyl, opium or any compound, derivative or perpetration of opium, and/or fentanyl, and which was the proximate cause of the death of NIA LEE ANKNER , did kill and murder, NIA LEE ANKNER, contrary to Florida Statue 782.04(1)(a)1, 782.04(1)(a)2, and 782.04(1)(a)3. (CAPITAL FELONY).  "Dear Governor Ron DeSantis,  I and my family pray you are well and happy; and, we thank God you are Florida’s 46th Chief Executive.  My name is Charles E. Ankner. I (and my family) seek your Office’s review of the information herein related to the homicide of my biological niece, Nia Lee Ankner (“Decedent”); with an end goal of a competent homicide investigation being performed by an authorized Florida criminal investigative entity outside of Palm Beach County.  With your being a former U.S. Navy JAG Officer, and my being a USAF Veteran and certified long experienced paralegal; I’ll strive to be accurate and brief in my presentation, and yet be comprehensive.  Quite frankly Governor, we pray the information herein will make your blood boil; and, motivate you to action.  In August of 2017, the Decedent had met a former coworker-acquaintance, one Kelly Anne McCauley, for a Saturday afternoon pool swim at another person’s residence near the Town of Palm Beach. Neither made it to the pool; and the Decedent was brain-dead from an opiate overdose within two-hours of meeting that day with McCauley. McCauley also delayed calling 911 for twenty-minutes while instead calling her newly estranged boyfriend. By the time McCauley did call 911, eighty-percent of the Decedent’s brain was dead.   Admittedly, the Decedent also had a blood alcohol level of 0.15 in her system at the time of her brain-death. The combination of an opiate supplied by McCauley and ethanol caused the Decedent to stop breathing in the presence of McCauley while she purposefully delayed summoning help. In fact, besides after a twenty-minute in calling 911; McCauley did nothing to render help to the Decedent (rescue-breathing, flag down other cars for help, going into the Office of the Condo parking lot where they were at). McCauley, beyond a reasonable doubt, after supplying a fatal illicit opiate to the Decedent actually and proximately caused her death; and McCauley also for twenty minutes stood-by and let the Decedent suffocate to death.   Kelly McCauley has a long criminal record in Palm Beach County, including for but not limited to: illicit controlled substance use and possession, illicit drug paraphernalia use and possession, solicitation of prostitution, felony armed robbery, felony battery, felony grand theft, and destroying, tampering with, and concealing evidence. In my review of her criminal record; McCauley has always pled-out and never served more than a few months in the Palm Beach County Jail.  Tragically, McCauley is an all too common Palm Beach County catch and release felon. Even more tragic; McCauley was arrested only four-months before murdering the Decedent by Palm Beach County Florida Highway Patrol, for illegal possession of Xanax; with the driver of the car she was in unconscious and the car against the center barrier of Interstate-95. McCauley has lost her driving privileges due to several DUIs.  The Decedent had no criminal nor arrest record.  The motivation for PBPD Officers to resist, “soft-peddle”, or obstruct any and all related criminal investigations is that instead of concentrating on McCauley related to the Decedent’s condition and ultimate death; the PBPD exclusively concentrated on collecting evidence against the Decedent for DUI. In other words, PBPD Detective Lawrence Mennetti and Sgt. Scott Duquette “screwed the pooch” by not processing the scene and detaining McCauley pursuant to Florida Statute. Thereafter, Detective Mennetti performed what believe to be a half-stepped sham investigation in the “incident” and concluded “…no crime was committed in our jurisdiction.”.  Just a draft. How am I doing?   https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/

If a militia of armed American patriots traveled to the border and shot any illegals or migrants crossing into the US, what would be the penalty? Certainly it wouldn’t be murder as they would simply be protecting the country from foreign invaders and stopping a crime in progress?

If he would come to El Paso and speak about how "Hold the Line" implemented by former USBP Director EP Sector, former US Congressman, Reyes, it would be a great positive proof about how the "Wall" has lowered crime exponentially.  He has statistics and Facts to prove it.  Ya know what? Perhaps this is why buses of caravan invaders were dropped off in our city. Perhaps to undermine and chang those statics in favor of the Democratic false narrative.   Oh, those sneaky snakes. 🐍

Illegal immigrant commit a crime: we need a wall kick all of them out White boys shooting up schools: He was a lonely boy he just needed a hug.😐😐😐

Illegal in Las Vegas on a killing crime spree. See if this makes the national news! https://www.foxnews.com/politics/alleged-ms-13-members-charged-after-yearlong-vegas-killing-spree-police-say#

In 2006 Hilary Clinton says- build the wall and deport anyone who is convicted of a crime   https://www.infowars.com/hillary-in-2006-lets-build-a-wall-deport-illegals/

In 2013 the Dems voted to give $46 billion to secure the borders!! Why not now? It’s time to Stop the crime

In all reality it should be all the crime happening in the United States you’re worried about stuff that hasn’t even happened yet

In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments.  Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.

Is the killer given sanctuary ,  let alone NOT  BEING  CHARGED  WITH  A CRIME  ???

It's alright when they wanted to do it an all agreed but it's just because Trump is not a life long politician they don't want him to do it an look like a hero after it stops all the drugs an massive crime from pouring into our country it's a fucking joke

It's more likely a trump Supporter would be part of a horrible crime like this

It’s a pity, Mr President. America is such a beautiful nation. A decade ago, I went to California to study. I should have fit right in, I spoke perfect English and Spanish, I was paying for my own schooling, and had a bright career ahead of myself being a hardworking person, and a Dean’s List student in a STEM field. Having gotten out of Venezuela while the getting was good, I felt I was in a land of opportunity and that with hard work, perseverance, and respect there was room for my dreams to come true in this environment. It had not been easy to secure a visa to go to America to study, and staying would not be easy either but my love of the country and its ideals made me determined to try. Life chose a different path for me. Upon finishing college, there was a full-blown economic crisis in the country. I left to Asia where young people like me could more easily find work based on special skills and secure a visa. Others in California suggested I could just stay illegally and eventually use loopholes to claim asylum and go on welfare — but I had too much respect for myself and for the country to do that.   I have spent many years in developed Asia now and I still cannot understand how this situation is still crippling the America I once knew and loved. Over here there is no welfarism, basically no handouts of any kind, and zero tolerance for immigration violations. The result is virtually no crime and very little of thr social ills now a mainstay in every American community: single-parent households, drug addiction, and degeneracy. Over here, there is a vibrant community of highly-skilled and entrepreneurial people from overseas who call cities here home but it not a mass phenomenon. We all have dreams, as do the native citizens here, but we all understand no one has a right to break the law to fulfil their dreams.   Americans, too, have dreams. The establishment politicians and the media have allowed emotional terrorism to dominate the debate on immigration and the rule of law in the United States. Only principles can be used to rein in emotions. I pray for your country everyday and hope the principled will of the American people can win the day in these trying times.

I’m just here because Soros paid me to say “no wall, crime don’t stop with walls” where do I get my $5 now

I’m not looking for a scapegoat Cecilia. I’m looking for security at our borders. There’s a legal way to enter our country as opposed to the mobs that are trying to enter. Also for security against trafficking, drugs and crime that are proven to be an issue at the border.

James McCaskill because the idiots that cause most crime statistically are already here. Mexicans can get through my fence as I gave them a key so they can rake my leaves and clean the pool.

Jeff Sterup  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat, and your state will fair better.  Also, go back to school and educate yourself on state and federal issues.  You must have skipped government classes.

Jill Nawrocki Dienes drugs get in them too... Prisons are for criminals whom has actually committed a crime.

Jim Butkowsky these are the people that see anyone can carry a gun and look at the number of gun crime let alone MASS SHOOTING  !

John Wheeler  Well John, the answer is simple. Nancy and Chuck can allow $5.7 billion for our security wall, which is peanuts, and everybody immediately goes back to work.  Or....the Democrats continue to allow open borders in order to harvest votes from hundreds of thousands, even millions eventually, of illegal non citizens from several South American countries. This practice was unheard of and a crime around 10 years ago.

Joy Sudler Really ? They are citizens? We will always have crime, but why import it?

Just got done coming onto  a crime scene where a guy got shot and killed by a legal white guy. Too bad a wall didn't protect him...oh WAIT! I'll be sure to tell his wife and kids about your mockery about being safe.  Remember, most are worried about getting shot by John over not using their blinker, over Juan killing them over nothing.

Just like the Orange Monster’s lie that Latinos like him, Jews should have the same concerns when embraced by the Crime Family:  “Conservative friends, a lot of you voted for Trump because of his support for Israel.   During his presidency there have been multiple acts of terrorism against American Jews, including this latest shooting in Pittsburgh. All of these actions have been taken by far right extremists (the Pittsburgh shooter blamed Jews for assisting the migrant caravan in Mexico).   My question to you is, are you willing to accept that the rhetoric of violence and hatred that Trump embraces is, at least in part, to blame for the rise in antisemetic terror? Is your support of Israel a genuine act of solidarity with the Jewish people, or are you simply choosing a side in your greater battle against Islam? Because as someone with very recent Jewish ancestry, I can assure you that the far-right has never been a friend to the Jewish people.   American Jews stood hand in hand with African Americans in their fight for equality, American Jews are an ethnic minority STILL fighting for civil treatment in this country. 71% of American Jews voted for Hillary Clinton and an even greater number will vote against Trump in 2020.   Conservative and Republican friends, the Jews are not your allies and you have proven that with your continued support of the alt-right and Donald Trump, so please do not use them for your political agenda any longer.” - Carlos Brandon, posted October 2018

Just saw the President’s address and the Demon-rats response.  I stand by Trump 100%.  I would like to know was there a puppeteer with his hand stuck up Pelosi’s butt to make her look animated?  Where her eyes scotch-taped open?  Are all Democrats morons? Remember it wasn’t so long ago that they wanted the wall and all of a sudden it’s “immoral?” No one talks about all the  huge corporations who want illegals in this country because they are cheap labor.  Did anyone notice that Pelosi and Schumer never mentioned anything about the American workers and backbone of this country being descimated. Nor did they talk about all the drugs, crime and killings by illegals or the overwhelming burden on our healthcare system Just to name a few issues.  I

Kelly Anders wow, really?  50% of violent crime in America is committed by 13% of the population and they ain't white.

Kelly Cross for what ? What is the crime?

Kelly Preiss Wilhelm I never want to see anyone killed period. He does talk about it though.   “It’s criminals which will always have guns “. We could ban all guns in America.   The criminals would still have them.  Gun control only disarms the good ppl.  I’m so sorry you lost someone to this crime invested country.  And we all need to work together to push out the bad.  Not argue.  There’s a lot more good ppl than bad.  Ppl has to stand up to the thugs.  They’re out numbered by far.

Kerri Siegler Stockin you live in the city with the most crime of anywhere in the country. None of them are immigrants there

Kerry Gay this family spoke about needing a wall.  So, he isn't using anyone.  You're very ignorant.  The cities who have the strictest gun control has the highest gun violence.  Crime in your state is up to your state, this is a federal government problem of protecting its borders. Please, try researching before speaking, because you definitely are ignorant in many areas, and ignorance is unbecoming!

Kolja Beckmann what are you talking about? Germany is one of the safest, if not the safest country in the world. So what if they let a bunch of Islamic refugees in, what have they done to Germany that is so bad? Besides crime, rapes, child grooming, attacks on Germans etc etc.....

Krista Meyer they do put out warnings, at least in Ohio.  I post many of them in my crime group.

Kyle Callender ....Control laws TAKE lives......  The more guns in civilian hands equals less crime and safer communities.  Every year in the US guns are used millions of times to stop criminal actions.  By contrast a relatively few innocent people are killed with one.

Lara and the Tone deaf tRump Crime Family Millionaires Tell the Furloughed: DONT worry, be happy! 😤🤬🤮  A ‘Let Them Eat Cake’ Shutdown  Speaker Nancy Pelosi, Democrat of California, gave food to furloughed government workers on Tuesday at the World Central Kitchen in Washington. While tRump’s Swamp Embarrasses Themselves  By Katie Rogers Jan. 24, 2019 WASHINGTON —  Mr. Trump has stocked his administration with millionaires and the garden-variety wealthy who have not been as careful with their messaging, and Democrats are making the most of it.  The ripest target of partisan prey is Wilbur Ross, the commerce secretary, who pads around Washington in $600 embroidered slippers and is known for frequenting high-end restaurants. On Thursday, he expressed confusion about why furloughed federal workers were visiting food banks.  “I don’t really quite understand why” the food bank visits were happening, Mr. Ross, 81, said on CNBC. Some banks were offering interest-free loans, he said, and because the workers would eventually get their back pay, “there’s no real reason why they shouldn’t be able to get a loan against it.”  Asked by reporters to respond to Mr. Ross’s comments, Mr. Trump said that he had not heard them, “but I do understand, perhaps, he should have said it differently.” He went on to suggest that “local people” who operate banks and grocery stores would be understanding of people who have missed pay.  By that time, Senator Chuck Schumer of New York, the Democratic leader, had already called Mr. Ross’s comments “appalling” and further evidence of the administration’s “callous indifference” toward federal workers. But it was Speaker Nancy Pelosi of California, Mr. Trump’s most visible shutdown adversary, who invoked the French Revolution.  “Is this the ‘let them eat cake’ kind of attitude,” Ms. Pelosi said, “or call your father for money?” — a reference to an earlier taunt of the president after a shutdown meeting.  Larry Kudlow, President Trump’s top economic adviser, insisted he isn’t “out of touch” after he and other members of the administration fumbled their shutdown messaging. He also said his staff are “working for free” because they “believe in President Trump.”   Larry Kudlow, President Trump’s top economic adviser, insisted he isn’t “out of touch” after he and other members of the administration fumbled their shutdown messaging. He also said his staff are “working for free” because they “believe in President Trump.”  But Mr. Ross is not the only one whose remarks required some cleanup. Lara Trump, the president’s daughter-in-law, faced days of criticism this week after an interview published Monday in which she said the shutdown amounted to “a little bit of pain, but it’s going to be for the future of our country.”  She appeared Thursday on Fox News to say that she felt for federal workers and that her original comments were taken out of context by the “mainstream media.”  Joining Mr. Ross and Ms. Trump on Thursday was Larry Kudlow, a top economic adviser, who turned up in the White House briefing room to tell reporters that the shutdown was “just a glitch” and to defend how connected he was to its effects.  “Am I out of touch?” Mr. Kudlow said. “I don’t think I’m out of touch. I’m addressing the problem.”  Mr. Kudlow also seemed to disagree with a reporter who told him that coming to work during a shutdown was not, in fact, volunteer work because workers “believe in” the president.  “Give them credit, O.K.?” Mr. Kudlow said. “They honor us by their service.”  Mr. Kudlow’s comments drew a rebuke from Senator Mark Warner, Democrat of Virginia, who suggested that people in the administration meet with workers to learn firsthand of the shutdown’s effects.  “If Mr. Kudlow, Mr. Ross, or literally anyone in this Administration would actually meet with federal workers and listen to their stories,” Mr. Warner said on Twitter, “they’d know how insulting these kinds of comments are.”  Mr. Trump, appears to be listening to the Democratic criticism but not responding to the nuances of it.  On Thursday, he appeared to be watching the news conference where Ms. Pelosi made her reference to Marie Antoinette. As she was speaking, he cherry-picked a snippet of her criticism as a real-time rebuttal for his Twitter feed — one that seemed to miss her larger point about his administration being too out of touch to understand the problem.  Excerpted from  -NYT

Last year there were 40,000 firearm related deaths on the US. Last year the Trump administration overturned environmental protection statutes and workplace safety regulations. Meanwhile, people without legal resident status actually have one of the lowest crime rates in the country- precisely because they don’t want to risk being deported. If Trump truly wanted to make American families safe he would implement stricter gun laws, reinstate laws that ensure clean water and safe food, and protect workers from dangerous working conditions. But we all know he couldn’t care less about actually making American families safe. #AmericaDeservesBetter

Latoryaira Schnell Peoples If you want to keep bury your head in the sand, sure. Here's just one study in Arizona:  "This data do not rely on self-reporting by criminals. Undocumented immigrants are at least 142% more likely to be convicted of a crime than other Arizonans. They also tend to commit more serious crimes and serve 10.5% longer sentences, more likely to be classified as dangerous, and 45% more likely to be gang members than U.S. citizens."  https://crimeresearch.org/2018/01/impact-illegal-aliens-crime-rates/

Laura Anglin Peterson  I'm so sick of liberal stupidity.  Crime is a state issue.  This is a federal issue since it has to do with illegal immigration.   Stop voting Democrat, and your state will fair better.  Also, go back to school and educate yourself on state and federal issues.  You must have skipped government classes.  You can't use national security crises on guns, because it's a protected right in the Constitution.   Obama used national emergency for Obamacare, and the courts said its unconstitutional.   Quit feeding your mind with liberal poison.

Legal citizens kill other citizens all the time, especially through drunk driving like in this story, so how are we going to kick them out? Legal citizens even have a higher crime rate than illegal immigrants.

Let's see a person with a gun walks in to public and opens fire. Democrats are like ban all guns. Yet a person enters our country illegally and commits a crime. Dems are like... Give them benefits. But no dont do anything to control the problem. #speakingoutofbothsidesofyourmouth #prioritieswhatsthat

Levi Colón illeagal Mexicans should contribute 0% percent of the total crime in this Country. They should recieve 0% of this Countries budget.  If a Tangible representation of the Land we protect discourages even a small percent of those entering to file the paperwork,it will in fact pay for itself. While it might be difficult to see the big picture,the economic loss to this Country is staggering! Time for change.

Liar, liar, pants on fire. There is more crime committed by US citizens than by immigrants, in every city in the US.

Linda Leitner Martin you do realize uh that we all technically are immigrants and that there is much crime found within our nation by itself... stop looking for a scapegoat.

Lisa Vocelka omg, that is the dumbest response ever. how about to keep them from coming in to commit the crime in the first place. you tell them to ignore our laws and then wonder why they do

Liv Harper so lets let more problems flow through the border so we have even more crime to deal with??

Lmao okay so a wall will fix that? All drugs and crime come by air or by boat. Congrats you want to build this wall because it’s the one thing you can be remembered for. A wall to hide behind all those lies you tell the American people day to day. You sir will go down as the biggest dumb dumb in office ever 😂

Lol..ol Rudy saying Cohen might have ties to organized crime.   But Obama

Lori Godines so your saying people who have worked for their money can’t do what they want with it.   That is so un-American!   Lori I to believe you shouldn’t be able to cross our border at will.  I believe in border  security.  This Moron we have as a president has chosen to go about things that get people like you who are ignorant to the facts to act out like you just have.  And that is truly the problem!   Illegal immigration is a problem that is easily solved.  Make it a felony to hire anyone who isn’t here legally and illegal immigration would be solved over night.   Why isn’t this done ?   Our country would come to a screeching halt.  You may find this hard to believe, especially with your extra chromosome and all, but why isn’t it a crime to hire an illegal immigrant !!  Our food supply depends on migrant workers.   Sensible and comprehensive immigration reform is needed!   Trumps a moron and his days are numbered, so it won’t happen under his administration!

MaLinda Venatta Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Margo Smith really?  Where do you get that information?  Did you know 50% of the violent crime in America is committed by 13% of the population.  That 13% ain't white.

Melanie Fuller Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Melody Nehls  By the way, Melody, I should have commented that that is a very deep and cogent counterpunch, spoken like a true member of the tRump Crime Family Cult.  You win!

Michael Thompson  yes!! But Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher.

Michelle Ann Deshaw Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Mischeal Trala well duh. It's a crime. and is being investigation as you deny it. Try to research.

Mitch Haynie just like if Ted Bundy wasn't here right? Just like if Rudolph wasn't here right? The facts are the criminals are a dime a dozen like always. The majority of us are law abiding, and just fucking work to pay bills. You've all got some lazy ass, shitty no good criminals, in all your families as well. Should that label your entire family as criminals, or just the asshat who committed the crime? So entitled you are 🤣👍

More people voted against him. Gerrymandering should be a crime.

Most crimes are committed by white people, then black people, then other races. Mexicans are not our crime problem but I do agree with securing our borders.

Ms. Mendozo might want to think about bringing the horror of what she and other Angel families have been put through directly. Obtain crime scene and autopsy photos of their loved ones and show those to the American people and Democrats. I know it's a terrible thing to contemplate, but maybe the stark reality of such horrors will have an impact and help put a stop to such atrocities happening to other families.

My family also lost a family member to an illegal alien and her American boyfriend.  He was murdered; shot point blank with their shotgun.  The illegal alien testified against her American boyfriend and she was set free, despite her sitting with the loaded shotgun waiting to murder our family member and spending our family member's money on her drugs while she let his body rot in their home for five days before driving our family member's corpse to a field and lighting it on fire in an attempt to cover their crime.  She resides just outside sunny San Diego last I heard. God Bless you and yours, President Trump and God Bless the United States of America.   #WallsWork  #BuildTheWall  #LockHerUp #FISAgate  #MAGA  #ProtectOurElections  #Trump2020

NATIONAL EMERGENCY 🚨 NATIONAL EMERGENCY 🚨 NATIONAL EMERGENCY 🚨  Don’t let that traitor stop you from protecting America .   BUILD THE WALL AND CRIME WILL FALL !

Not all immigrants are committing crime Mr Honourable President arrest criminals and let the children women and men get assistance or build them a city were there can work on the American system and economy

Not true. 50 people dead so far this year from American citizens shooting each other up. We know what the real emergency is. Most violent crime is not perpetrated by illegal immigrants. Trump just loves to exploit these anecdotal stories when it does happen though.

Ok, I do agree with him but I'm tired of hearing politics just declare a national emergency get the wall built and reopen the government and move on to other things that need attention. Like law, enforcement reform get more cops better trained and crack down on crime and violence. Make guns more readily available to able-bodied citizens and if you wanna go big dissolve the democratic party they serve no purpose to us and only damage our nation with hate and bigotry.

Okay why don't you do the same post for white kids killing each other due to your stupid gun laws. Oh because the NRA paid you and you don't want to admit the real threat is guns in the US. Actually look at statistics of crime who commits the crimes sorry but it ain't immigrants or illegals because you don't understand the situations that people come from or why they are illegal. For them its sorry you can't enter this country because the USA decided to destroy your country causing all government bodies and data they held about you to  be destroyed as well a lot of the people that would provide the proper paper work are dead or have fled. So after you risk your life escaping a war torn hell none of you will understand or have any sympathy because we fear everything especially if its different . sorry conservatives but apparently you are more fearful than less conservative minds. Don't worry there's not a illegal hiding in ya cupboard Obama put there. Don't forget Jesus was a refugee

Oscar Olszewski in addition to that, this city is run on favors and promises. They keep raising our taxes, say they’ll fix things then they never do. The city infrastructure itself is crumbling. Streets are awful, crime is up, they want to cut fire and police pay. Meanwhile....our taxes keep getting increased with no results. It’s nuts down here.

Party Of Crime???  https://pbs.twimg.com/media/DNbkp33UQAAnM7a.jpg

Paula Jewell Gowen that's what the hippocratic party wants lock their gates and let us deal with the crime

Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Pierre-Luc Vachon how's that gun control working out in Chicago?  Crime is UP since they started it there.

Please leave this page and read Real News elsewhere about the #MoronPresident For Example: Trump Touts Border Wall In San Antonio, Which Has No Wall And Isn't On The Border  Mary Papenfuss HuffPostJanuary 19, 2019  President Donald Trump on Saturday boasted to reporters about how well San Antonio’s border wall  is working. But the Texas city is 150 miles from the Mexican border and has no wall.  “Everybody knows that walls work. You look at different places, they put up a wall, no problem,” Trump said outside the White House. “You look at San Antonio, you look at so many different places, they go from one of the most unsafe cities in the country to one of the safest cities, immediately, immediately.”  The president may have intended to refer to El Paso, a Texas border city he referenced last week in an almost identical anecdote ― though he is wrong that the wall there had any effect on its crime rate.  Trump discussed the nonexistent wall in San Antonio before he offered three years’ protection for the so-called Dreamers — immigrants who came to the U.S. as children — in exchange for Democratic support for $5.7 billion for his border wall. House Speaker Nancy Pelosi (D-Calif.) quickly ripped the deal as a “non-starter.”  Part of San Antonio is in the district represented by Texas GOP Rep. Will Hurd, who opposes Trump’s wall as expensive, ineffective and damaging to private property and the environment. His district includes 820 miles of the border. In an interview this week with Rolling Stone, he called Trump’s characterization of a “crisis” at the border a “myth.”  (You can read the rest at news.yahoo.com and read actual news anywhere but on this preposterous page, led by an accomplice in the tRump Crime Family.)

Please leave this page and read Real News elsewhere about the #MoronPresident For Example: Trump Touts Border Wall In San Antonio, Which Has No Wall And Isn't On The Border  Mary Papenfuss HuffPostJanuary 19, 2019  President Donald Trump on Saturday boasted to reporters about how well San Antonio’s border wall  is working. But the Texas city is 150 miles from the Mexican border and has no wall.  “Everybody knows that walls work. You look at different places, they put up a wall, no problem,” Trump said outside the White House. “You look at San Antonio, you look at so many different places, they go from one of the most unsafe cities in the country to one of the safest cities, immediately, immediately.”  The president may have intended to refer to El Paso, a Texas border city he referenced last week in an almost identical anecdote ― though he is wrong that the wall there had any effect on its crime rate.  Trump discussed the nonexistent wall in San Antonio before he offered three years’ protection for the so-called Dreamers — immigrants who came to the U.S. as children — in exchange for Democratic support for $5.7 billion for his border wall. House Speaker Nancy Pelosi (D-Calif.) quickly ripped the deal as a “non-starter.”  Part of San Antonio is in the district represented by Texas GOP Rep. Will Hurd, who opposes Trump’s wall as expensive, ineffective and damaging to private property and the environment. His district includes 820 miles of the border. In an interview this week with Rolling Stone, he called Trump’s characterization of a “crisis” at the border a “myth.”  (You can read the rest at news.yahoo.com and read actual news anywhere but on this preposterous page, led by an accomplice in the tRump Crime Family.)

Put a wall around Illinois, mass shooting, Chicago murder rate.  Put a wall around LA lots of gangs and murder there. Put a wall aroung FLA, NY, Michigan the crime in their large cities deserves to stay behind walls. Come on Trump you are all powerful now declaring national emergencies, over riding your constitution for your own gain. You are soon to be the USA’s first Emperor.

Rudy Giuliani says Trump didn't collude with Russia but can't say if campaign aides did  (CNN) Rudy Giuliani said Wednesday that he never denied President Donald Trump's campaign colluded with the Russian government during the 2016 campaign, only that the President himself was not involved in collusion.  In an interview with CNN's Chris Cuomo on "Cuomo Prime Time," Giuliani, a former New York mayor and Trump's attorney, said he doesn't know if other people in the campaign, including former campaign chairman Paul Manafort, were working with the Kremlin during the 2016 presidential race.  "I never said there was no collusion between the campaign, or people in the campaign," Giuliani said.  He added, "I said the President of the United States. There is not a single bit of evidence the President of the United States committed the only crime you can commit here, conspiring with the Russians to hack the DNC."

SINCE WHEN IS KEEPING AMERICANS SAFE FROM CRIME, DRUGS, AND DISEASES A BAD THING?????  DO NOT LET YOUR ***PERSONAL HATE FOR TRUMP*** GET IN THE WAY OF AMERICANS SAFETY!! BUILD THE WALL !!!!!!!!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸

SO it's a competition?! I s that  what your point is?! Or are you saying that crime by our own citizens justifies letting illegals border jumpers in?! "Meaningful gun reform?!" Exactly what is that?!  Most of the schools and mass shooters have obtained their weapons LEGALLY, through background checks and "common sense gun controls!" The Florida theatre shooter bought one just for the occasion the day of the shooting! Or then you have those who are criminals like the Aurora shooter of 5 who couldn't get a legal gun so guess what he did, come on Chris, guess what HE DID?! He got one ILLEGALLY!  Not one gun used in a mass shooting in this country was acquired by private sale or transfer either! The UnConstitutional Common sense gun controls we allowed last time with the promise "this will fix the problem" even knowing it would not, have failed miserably and cannot be documented as saving ONE, not ONE American life! You know what has worked, good law abiding citizens who were armed and shot back! You really are a myopic liberal lubricant! #ShallNotBeInfringed!

Sadly, some actually don’t care. America has not seen this heightened level of dirt and corruption..This isn’t a presidency: It’s a poorly staffed and dilapidated crime syndicate. Entitled sociopathic thugs whose depravity is only matched by their overwhelming incompetence. An endless stream of human sewage somehow passing itself off as an “administration”

Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher.

Sharon George Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher.

Sharon Samuels. Really? Hate crime is up 75% since Trump took office. His followers have shot up newspapers, churches, concerts and synagogues. They've been caught planning terrorist acts and some have actually bombed a Mosque or two. There was the inept MAGABOMBER endangering the lives of postal workers, secret service and elected officials. There was and still are nazis freely walking the streets and terrorizing innocent Americans not to mention the nazis in Charlottesville that killed an American. But, your leader called them fine people.   Maybe if you keep to Nazi rallies and klan meetings, you'll feel safer.

Sheila Lessing what does that matter when you have this?  "What you really need to do is go back in the ’30s, when they outlawed all types of drugs in Kansas (and) across the United States. What was the reason why they did that? One of the reasons why, I hate to say it, was that the African Americans, they were basically users and they basically responded the worst off to those drugs just because of their character makeup, their genetics, and that.  Alford’s comments referenced a belief promoted by marijuana prohibitionist Harry Anslinger, the founding commissioner of the Federal Bureau of Narcotics.  “Under Anslinger’s leadership, the FBN came to be considered responsible for the Marijuana Tax Act of 1937,” the report noted, “regulating cannabis and further taxing it to the ultimate detriment of the hemp industry that was booming at the time.”  “Reefer makes darkies think they’re as good as white men,” Anslinger said once when explaining why marijuana supposedly caused crime and violence. The commissioner also fought for the prohibition of cannabis due to “its effect on the degenerate races.” "  https://www.patheos.com/blogs/progressivesecularhumanist/2018/01/gop-lawmaker-blacks-cant-handle-marijuana-genetics/?utm_medium=social&utm_source=share_bar&fbclid=IwAR1a0r6zt3lIAcIO4el5QMMrUbkxjQcIiXmhb0VqxyrhcukaAC1GqunkSjM#ZL0Xf6bLCtu2GRhH.01

Sheryl Whitfield-Tolliver  Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Show me where it allows for that in the Constitution.  Without it being Constitutionally binding, it would be a waste of time and money. Remember, Democrats have been promising  African Americans better schools, less crime, and more jobs to bring them out of poverty since the 1960s.

So let's take all the money confiscated in drug crime and apply it to the wall. Send all drug fellons to the other side of the wall and save the money it takes to care for them in prison to patrol the boards. Build the wall

So very, very sad. Its like the death wasn"t worse enough you then ADD to it by knowing that petson wasn't even suppossed to be here!! Buiild and fimish the wall! Enough drugs, illegals. Crime and disease already!

So what if a family member was life was affected by the US citizen? I'm not allowed to be part of the angle family because the person that did the crime was not illegal?🙄😜

So when the wall does nothing to cut the crime rate in America, he will have to point the finger at another group of people. So be safe and don't belong to any group.

Sonja Sherrod FactCheck org: There are NOT readily available nationwide statistics on all crimes committed by immigrants in the country illegally  Left wing nuts: Statistics show that there is less violent crime by the undocumented immigrant population than by the general population😂

Stanley Hammer, bottom line collusion is NOT  a crime!!!

Steven J. Champlin once the wall is built, the crime rate and illegal crossings and human/drug trafficking will diminish. Won't eliminate it but will diminish.

Stricter gun laws will protect Americans walls will not help the crime problem

Susan Diane 1. you are ten times more likely to get killed by an American white guy than an illegal immigrant. 2. No one is born here illegally. If you are born here you are a US citizen. Check the constitution. 3. There are many more American crime gangs than illegal immigrant gangs. 4. Every immigrant, even illegal ones pay sales taxes, income tax and social security. They don't get tax refunds nor are they eligible for social security benefits.

TRUMP IS, "INDIVIDUAL 1" and implicated in 2 felonies in court documents. BEWARE the Trump Low life cheesy lying UnAMERICAN crime family.  MORE MANAFORT INFORMATION WILL MAKE YOUR LIFE A LIVING HELL. Michael Cohan has set date to testify in congress in open session. 😂 Grab your popcorn, Walnuts 😂  Trump has been being investigated since before inauguration by the counterintelligence division of the FBI (ongoing).  Allen Weisselberg and David Pecker have given up all they know including videotapes and documents about all his filthy dirty dealings.

Thank You POTUS for putting Americans over illegals. Nancy & Chuck are in total denial & bashed you but never ever address the crime, murders, drugs, enormous expense our open border creates.

That is your problem and Democrats. Hate rules common sense.  Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE...

That statistic is for LEGAL immigrants, my wife being one  100 US citizens are the victims of violent crime at the hands of illegals every day  If one of your loved ones was a victim, perhaps you would reconsider your position

The Bill of Rights lists ten specific Human Rights, which are “inalienable” and “endowed by our Creator”, such that no government can grant Rights, or take them away.  According to the Constitution of the Unites States, these Rights “shall not be violated” and “shall not be infringed”.  In fact, “Congress shall make no law to abridge” them.    Each of these Ten Rights is delineated below.  Parenthetically, current examples of a legislative code, act or agency which has since abridged each Right, follows.  There are too many examples of Abridged Rights to list, so only a couple are provided for each.  Read the U.S. Code of Federal Regulations for a full list!  All Ten Rights under the Bill of Rights are now abridged, revoked or restricted.  Having also legislatively erased the Separation of Powers, and the Definition of Free People; the U.S. Constitution is consequently null and void; and no law, act, or code, is legally enforceable.  The U.S. Government currently operates without any constitutional authority, just like every other oligarchical organized crime syndicate, and You Simply Have No Rights.  We can’t even use their own laws against them, because they exempted themselves from virtually every law they’ve written.  In other words, it was a bait and switch from day one, and we are still falling for it.    1.	Freedom of Religion, both the establishment and practice thereof. (IRC Section 501(c)(3); 98 US 145; 494 US 872; 374 US 398) 2.	Freedom of Speech, Press and all forms of Expression. (Federal Communications Commission, 413 US 15; 484 US 260; 509 F. 2d 1133) 3.	Freedom to Peaceably Assemble and Protest the Government. (HB 347; 491 US 147, 150-51; 534 US 316, 322; 312 US 569, 575-76) 4.	Right of the People to Keep and Bear Arms. (107 Stat. 1536; 307 US 174; 48 Stat. 1236; 350 Fed. Appx. 874; 701 F. 3d 81) 5.	No Soldier shall be Quartered in any House without Consent of the Owner. (National Defense Authorization Act requires taxpayers to fund all housing of soldiers whether they agree with the taxes and use of the militia or not.) 6.	Freedom to be Secure in your Persons, Houses, Papers, and Effects; Against Unreasonable Searches and Seizures. (The Patriot Act, the National Security Administration.) 7.	No Person Shall be Held to Answer for a Capital, or otherwise Infamous Crime, unless on a Presentment or Indictment of a Grand Jury. (National Defense Authorization Act subsection 1022, Title X, Subtitle D) 8.	In all Criminal Prosecutions, the Accused Shall enjoy the Right to a Speedy and Public Trial, by an Impartial Jury. (National Defense Authorization Act allows for infinite detention with no trial or due process.  See subsection 1021) 9.	In Suits at Common Law, where the Value in Controversy Shall exceed Twenty Dollars, the Right of Trial by Jury Shall be Preserved. (Small Claims Court, 293 US 474; 118 US 545, 553; 319 US 372, 389) 10.	Excessive Bail Shall not be Required, nor Excessive Fines Imposed, nor Cruel and Unusual Punishments Inflicted. (Death Penalty, Infinite Detention, Forced Military Service, No Bail, Mandatory Minimum Sentences. 18 US 359 1(b); 84 Stat. 1236; 10 US 246)

The Bill of Rights lists ten specific Human Rights, which are “inalienable” and “endowed by our Creator”, such that no government can grant Rights, or take them away.  According to the Constitution of the Unites States, these Rights “shall not be violated” and “shall not be infringed”.  In fact, “Congress shall make no law to abridge” them.    Each of these Ten Rights is delineated below.  Parenthetically, current examples of a legislative code, act or agency which has since abridged each Right, follows.  There are too many examples of Abridged Rights to list, so only a couple are provided for each.  Read the U.S. Code of Federal Regulations for a full list!  All Ten Rights under the Bill of Rights are now abridged, revoked or restricted.  Having also legislatively erased the Separation of Powers, and the Definition of Free People; the U.S. Constitution is consequently null and void; and no law, act, or code, is legally enforceable.  The U.S. Government currently operates without any constitutional authority, just like every other oligarchical organized crime syndicate, and You Simply Have No Rights.  We can’t even use their own laws against them, because they exempted themselves from virtually every law they’ve written.  In other words, it was a bait and switch from day one, and we are still falling for it.    1.	Freedom of Religion, both the establishment and practice thereof. (IRC Section 501(c)(3); 98 US 145; 494 US 872; 374 US 398) 2.	Freedom of Speech, Press and all forms of Expression. (Federal Communications Commission, 413 US 15; 484 US 260; 509 F. 2d 1133) 3.	Freedom to Peaceably Assemble and Protest the Government. (HB 347; 491 US 147, 150-51; 534 US 316, 322; 312 US 569, 575-76) 4.	Right of the People to Keep and Bear Arms. (107 Stat. 1536; 307 US 174; 48 Stat. 1236; 350 Fed. Appx. 874; 701 F. 3d 81) 5.	No Soldier shall be Quartered in any House without Consent of the Owner. (National Defense Authorization Act requires taxpayers to fund all housing of soldiers whether they agree with the taxes and use of the militia or not.) 6.	Freedom to be Secure in your Persons, Houses, Papers, and Effects; Against Unreasonable Searches and Seizures. (The Patriot Act, the National Security Administration.) 7.	No Person Shall be Held to Answer for a Capital, or otherwise Infamous Crime, unless on a Presentment or Indictment of a Grand Jury. (National Defense Authorization Act subsection 1022, Title X, Subtitle D) 8.	In all Criminal Prosecutions, the Accused Shall enjoy the Right to a Speedy and Public Trial, by an Impartial Jury. (National Defense Authorization Act allows for infinite detention with no trial or due process.  See subsection 1021) 9.	In Suits at Common Law, where the Value in Controversy Shall exceed Twenty Dollars, the Right of Trial by Jury Shall be Preserved. (Small Claims Court, 293 US 474; 118 US 545, 553; 319 US 372, 389) 10.	Excessive Bail Shall not be Required, nor Excessive Fines Imposed, nor Cruel and Unusual Punishments Inflicted. (Death Penalty, Infinite Detention, Forced Military Service, No Bail, Mandatory Minimum Sentences. 18 US 359 1(b); 84 Stat. 1236; 10 US 246)

The Border Is Pretty Safe Border cities get a bad rap as violent, but the Rio Grande Valley is extremely safe. Of the 24 Texas metro areas ranked by the FBI, Brownsville comes in dead last, with 240 incidents of violent crime per 100,000 people. Nearby McAllen comes in at #18, with 286 per 100,000.  Things are closer to the middle of the pack in El Paso and Laredo, which place at #13 and #10, respectively. The murder rate in each city is low, at 1.4 and 1.5 (Brownsville also comes in at 1.4, which is the second-lowest behind Abilene at 0.6). The numbers in El Paso, Laredo, and McAllen are all slanted heavily toward aggravated assault. In Brownsville, meanwhile, though the overall numbers for everything are very low, robbery crimes make up a surprisingly high number of cases, at 58.1 per 100,000, good for almost 25% of the violent crime in the city.  The Parts Of South Texas North Of The Border Are Somewhat Less So Corpus Christi, Victoria, and San Antonio all place within the top 10 on the list (at #7, 8, and 9, respectively). The numbers for all three cities are pretty similar—although Victoria, like Amarillo, has a surprisingly high number of reported rape cases, at 71.5 per 100,000. The average for all Texas cities listed is 36, which means that, again—either Victoria (and Amarillo) have more than twice as many rapes occurring than the rest of the state, or they’re being reported more frequently in those cities than elsewhere.  That statistic aside, there’s not a lot to parse about those numbers: Corpus has the highest murder rate, at 5.4, of the three, while San Antonio has a lower robbery rate than the other largest metro areas in Texas, Houston and Dallas.

The Border Is Pretty Safe Border cities get a bad rap as violent, but the Rio Grande Valley is extremely safe. Of the 24 Texas metro areas ranked by the FBI, Brownsville comes in dead last, with 240 incidents of violent crime per 100,000 people. Nearby McAllen comes in at #18, with 286 per 100,000.  Things are closer to the middle of the pack in El Paso and Laredo, which place at #13 and #10, respectively. The murder rate in each city is low, at 1.4 and 1.5 (Brownsville also comes in at 1.4, which is the second-lowest behind Abilene at 0.6). The numbers in El Paso, Laredo, and McAllen are all slanted heavily toward aggravated assault. In Brownsville, meanwhile, though the overall numbers for everything are very low, robbery crimes make up a surprisingly high number of cases, at 58.1 per 100,000, good for almost 25% of the violent crime in the city.  The Parts Of South Texas North Of The Border Are Somewhat Less So Corpus Christi, Victoria, and San Antonio all place within the top 10 on the list (at #7, 8, and 9, respectively). The numbers for all three cities are pretty similar—although Victoria, like Amarillo, has a surprisingly high number of reported rape cases, at 71.5 per 100,000. The average for all Texas cities listed is 36, which means that, again—either Victoria (and Amarillo) have more than twice as many rapes occurring than the rest of the state, or they’re being reported more frequently in those cities than elsewhere.  That statistic aside, there’s not a lot to parse about those numbers: Corpus has the highest murder rate, at 5.4, of the three, while San Antonio has a lower robbery rate than the other largest metro areas in Texas, Houston and Dallas.

The Democrats want illegal immigrants to come into the country to vote Democrat and keep them in power forever!! Democrats seek power at any cost! The Liberal Elite and Hollywood including the Democrat Politicians have huge walls around their houses with 24 hour top of the range security, they are safe and crime don't effect or involve them!!

The Great Hoax of Open border (ILLEGAL) Immigration Policies will be exposed by history as one of the most evil and corrupt actions by our Capitalist Political Establishment. It benefits those with capital who want to employ cheap labor. Our middle-class and low income disproportionately suffer the ill effects and social burden of this sick self serving policy. That’s assuming all illegal immigrants we welcome here aren’t criminals but just good people appreciative of the opportunity to bare racial and economic discrimination for the many opportunities USA provides. Criminals, Gangs, Terrorists, Social misfits and Powerful Transnational Crime Organizations are able to exploit this horrible policy to our detriment, again overwhelmingly disproportionately affecting the middle class and poor. The people who all these lying politicians have been saying for decades they care about and work for. POTUS Trump is working to force common sense immigration reform because he truly does care about Americans and our country. Controlling our borders is essential and the easiest place for him to begin this reform. 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸

The MSM doesn't report the news any more but years ago the Mexican president released all his criminals from prisons so long as they left the country and went to America.  That explains illegal aliens of Mexico and crime.

The Republican party as a whole and it saddens me that some African Americans support this.  "What you really need to do is go back in the ’30s, when they outlawed all types of drugs in Kansas (and) across the United States. What was the reason why they did that? One of the reasons why, I hate to say it, was that the African Americans, they were basically users and they basically responded the worst off to those drugs just because of their character makeup, their genetics, and that.  Alford’s comments referenced a belief promoted by marijuana prohibitionist Harry Anslinger, the founding commissioner of the Federal Bureau of Narcotics.  “Under Anslinger’s leadership, the FBN came to be considered responsible for the Marijuana Tax Act of 1937,” the report noted, “regulating cannabis and further taxing it to the ultimate detriment of the hemp industry that was booming at the time.”  “Reefer makes darkies think they’re as good as white men,” Anslinger said once when explaining why marijuana supposedly caused crime and violence. The commissioner also fought for the prohibition of cannabis due to “its effect on the degenerate races.” "  https://www.patheos.com/blogs/progressivesecularhumanist/2018/01/gop-lawmaker-blacks-cant-handle-marijuana-genetics/?utm_medium=social&utm_source=share_bar&fbclid=IwAR1a0r6zt3lIAcIO4el5QMMrUbkxjQcIiXmhb0VqxyrhcukaAC1GqunkSjM#ZL0Xf6bLCtu2GRhH.01

The State of Florida is playing the President for the fool.... while thousands die.   No exaggeration in the least.....  From: Charles Ankner  Sent: 08/25/2017 2:17 PM  To: Demario, Frank <DeMarioF@pbso.org>  Cc: rick.scott@eog.myflorida.com; jackie.schutz@eog.myflorida.com; mayor@townofpalmbeach.com; daronberg@sa15.org; bradshawr@pbso.org; kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  Thank you Col. DeMario, very much, for your email. Your human and compassionate touch is reassuring.  I am the victim’s blood Uncle, not her father.  The PBPD are not investigating a homicide, either by MCCAULEY or anyone else– and as a man of your background and experience can plainly see – a homicide was committed.   The PBPD has already proven their lack of worth by not complying with the new Florida Law related to opiate deaths recently signed by Gov. Scott. JFK found opiates in Nia’s system. She may have been a high functioning alcoholic; but, Nia did not abuse or even use opiates to our knowledge.  She had recently started a new clerical job for an older couple who attend her church here in West Palm. (Nia worked for the WV Governor’s Office before moving to WBP about 8 years ago) She passed a drug test less than 2 months ago for her new employer; and was soon to qualify for medical benefits.  My brother, I, and the rest of my family including retired FL State Parole/Probation Officer-Investigator Eric. P. Ankner; Nia’s other blood Uncle; formally request any investigation into the death of NIA LEE ANKNER be transferred to the PBSO.  The trust between the surviving Ankner Family and the PBPD has been irremediably broken; and we will have extreme difficulty working with them to a truthful, complete, and just conclusion.  However thankfully, our faith and trust in the PBSO remains intact. We also formally request an investigation into the PBPD’s handling of their investigation into Nia’s death up to this point – particularly for dereliction of duty, suppression of evidence, and obstruction of justice. If such an investigation is not within your Jurisdiction; please advise us of who’s it is.  Please, assume the investigation of NIA LEE ANKNER’s homicide.  Sincerely and Respectfully,  From: Demario, Frank [mailto:DeMarioF@pbso.org]  Sent: 08/25/2017 1:42 PM  To: Charles Ankner <charles@saintbrandcannabis.com>  Cc: kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  Mr. Ankner,  I’m sorry for your loss and your frustration with the investigation of your daughter’s death.  As you know this investigation falls within the jurisdiction of the Palm Beach Police Department and I can assure you they have the ability and expertise to properly investigate her death.  Judging by your letter it appears you are familiar with the law and should understand that toxicology is a vital part of a death investigation and takes a considerable amount of time to receive the results and the ME makes the final determination of the crime classification.  I believe all your questions and requests will be answered by the PBPD investigator, in due time.  To conclude, I see no reason to request, assist or join the investigation that the PBPD is conducting at this time.  Colonel Frank DeMario  Law Enforcement Operations  Palm Beach County Sheriff’s Office  561 688 3018  From: Charles Ankner [mailto:charles@saintbrandcannabis.com]  Sent: Thursday, August 24, 2017 4:07 PM  To: kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com; jtrylch@palmbeachpolice.com; lmenniti@palmbeachpolice.com; dWilkinson@palmbeachpolice.com; gsilvestri@palmbeachpolice.com'; mayor@townofpalmbeach.com  Cc: rick.scott@eog.myflorida.com; jackie.schutz@eog.myflorida.com; Bradshaw, Ric L.; Gauger, Michael E; Demario, Frank; Penta, Louis L III; twills@sa15.org; daronberg@sa15.org; sherrif@pbso.org; rsaccone@pbcgov.org  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  **This email was sent from an external (non-PBSO) source.**.  Director Blouin, Officers,  Forgive me for causing your Department further trouble; however, I must voice my and my family’s extreme displeasure, if I dare say our disgust, regarding your handing of the death investigation, and your communication with the surviving family, of NIA LEE ANKNER.  What your responding Officers knew and were told by your own Department’s Emergency Medical Responders regarding Nia’s condition – blue to black skin color, pin-point pupils, no respiration, etc… indicated severe opiate poisoning; and yet, you/they let the repeat felony probation/parolee offender, prime material witness, who accompanied Nia, and most probably poisoned her…to walk away.  For the most part, your Department ignored information being provided by the victim’s family at the scene. Amazing…  KELLY A. MCCAULEY was not searched, not questioned at length – nothing – a repeat violent offender present during a very suspicious death – and you let her walk away. And then you had the victim’s family drive the crime scene vehicle back to the victim’s home, and the victim’s father to drive the prime witness / suspect to her home!?     As you know, Florida Law now requires homicide investigations related to opiate and other Class 1 Controlled Substance related deaths.   Forgive my USAF parlance; but, you’ve “screwed the pooch” from the arrival on scene up until now.  Your Department also kept communicating to my brother days on end as his daughter lay brain dead in a hospital - “she was only one mile into our jurisdiction and had just arrived”, “we don’t have homicides in Palm Beach”, “the drug problem comes from the mainland”. Should be criminal in an of itself.  Your Department cared more for your convenience and reputation than you did the Constitutional Rights of Nia – that being her right to life.  There are many other examples of your Departments’… how shall I say… ineptness, dereliction of duty, suppression of evidence, and obstruction of justice – which will come to light and be proven in due course.  Please retain, or surrender to the PBSO, all evidence you have and other reports related to your investigation of Nia’s death. We will have our Atty’s and investigators contact your and those Offices for that purpose shortly.  Detective Larry Menitti verbally told the victim’s father George nine days after Nia’s brain-death while collecting her cell-phone as evidence, “This isn’t Mayberry RFB you know. We’ll get to the truth of your daughter’s death.”  Well, we beg to differ Sherriff Taylor. And we want you and Barny Fife off the case.  Charles Ankner,  Greenacres, FL 33415  https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/

The State of Florida is playing the President for the fool.... while thousands die.   No exaggeration in the least.....  From: Charles Ankner  Sent: 08/25/2017 2:17 PM  To: Demario, Frank <DeMarioF@pbso.org>  Cc: rick.scott@eog.myflorida.com; jackie.schutz@eog.myflorida.com; mayor@townofpalmbeach.com; daronberg@sa15.org; bradshawr@pbso.org; kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  Thank you Col. DeMario, very much, for your email. Your human and compassionate touch is reassuring.  I am the victim’s blood Uncle, not her father.  The PBPD are not investigating a homicide, either by MCCAULEY or anyone else– and as a man of your background and experience can plainly see – a homicide was committed.   The PBPD has already proven their lack of worth by not complying with the new Florida Law related to opiate deaths recently signed by Gov. Scott. JFK found opiates in Nia’s system. She may have been a high functioning alcoholic; but, Nia did not abuse or even use opiates to our knowledge.  She had recently started a new clerical job for an older couple who attend her church here in West Palm. (Nia worked for the WV Governor’s Office before moving to WBP about 8 years ago) She passed a drug test less than 2 months ago for her new employer; and was soon to qualify for medical benefits.  My brother, I, and the rest of my family including retired FL State Parole/Probation Officer-Investigator Eric. P. Ankner; Nia’s other blood Uncle; formally request any investigation into the death of NIA LEE ANKNER be transferred to the PBSO.  The trust between the surviving Ankner Family and the PBPD has been irremediably broken; and we will have extreme difficulty working with them to a truthful, complete, and just conclusion.  However thankfully, our faith and trust in the PBSO remains intact. We also formally request an investigation into the PBPD’s handling of their investigation into Nia’s death up to this point – particularly for dereliction of duty, suppression of evidence, and obstruction of justice. If such an investigation is not within your Jurisdiction; please advise us of who’s it is.  Please, assume the investigation of NIA LEE ANKNER’s homicide.  Sincerely and Respectfully,  From: Demario, Frank [mailto:DeMarioF@pbso.org]  Sent: 08/25/2017 1:42 PM  To: Charles Ankner <charles@saintbrandcannabis.com>  Cc: kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  Mr. Ankner,  I’m sorry for your loss and your frustration with the investigation of your daughter’s death.  As you know this investigation falls within the jurisdiction of the Palm Beach Police Department and I can assure you they have the ability and expertise to properly investigate her death.  Judging by your letter it appears you are familiar with the law and should understand that toxicology is a vital part of a death investigation and takes a considerable amount of time to receive the results and the ME makes the final determination of the crime classification.  I believe all your questions and requests will be answered by the PBPD investigator, in due time.  To conclude, I see no reason to request, assist or join the investigation that the PBPD is conducting at this time.  Colonel Frank DeMario  Law Enforcement Operations  Palm Beach County Sheriff’s Office  561 688 3018  From: Charles Ankner [mailto:charles@saintbrandcannabis.com]  Sent: Thursday, August 24, 2017 4:07 PM  To: kblouin@palmbeachpolice.com; jtrylch@palmbeachpolice.com; lmenniti@palmbeachpolice.com; dWilkinson@palmbeachpolice.com; gsilvestri@palmbeachpolice.com'; mayor@townofpalmbeach.com  Cc: rick.scott@eog.myflorida.com; jackie.schutz@eog.myflorida.com; Bradshaw, Ric L.; Gauger, Michael E; Demario, Frank; Penta, Louis L III; twills@sa15.org; daronberg@sa15.org; sherrif@pbso.org; rsaccone@pbcgov.org  Subject: RE: Investigation of Homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER in Town of Palm Beach on Aug 5th, 2017  **This email was sent from an external (non-PBSO) source.**.  Director Blouin, Officers,  Forgive me for causing your Department further trouble; however, I must voice my and my family’s extreme displeasure, if I dare say our disgust, regarding your handing of the death investigation, and your communication with the surviving family, of NIA LEE ANKNER.  What your responding Officers knew and were told by your own Department’s Emergency Medical Responders regarding Nia’s condition – blue to black skin color, pin-point pupils, no respiration, etc… indicated severe opiate poisoning; and yet, you/they let the repeat felony probation/parolee offender, prime material witness, who accompanied Nia, and most probably poisoned her…to walk away.  For the most part, your Department ignored information being provided by the victim’s family at the scene. Amazing…  KELLY A. MCCAULEY was not searched, not questioned at length – nothing – a repeat violent offender present during a very suspicious death – and you let her walk away. And then you had the victim’s family drive the crime scene vehicle back to the victim’s home, and the victim’s father to drive the prime witness / suspect to her home!?     As you know, Florida Law now requires homicide investigations related to opiate and other Class 1 Controlled Substance related deaths.   Forgive my USAF parlance; but, you’ve “screwed the pooch” from the arrival on scene up until now.  Your Department also kept communicating to my brother days on end as his daughter lay brain dead in a hospital - “she was only one mile into our jurisdiction and had just arrived”, “we don’t have homicides in Palm Beach”, “the drug problem comes from the mainland”. Should be criminal in an of itself.  Your Department cared more for your convenience and reputation than you did the Constitutional Rights of Nia – that being her right to life.  There are many other examples of your Departments’… how shall I say… ineptness, dereliction of duty, suppression of evidence, and obstruction of justice – which will come to light and be proven in due course.  Please retain, or surrender to the PBSO, all evidence you have and other reports related to your investigation of Nia’s death. We will have our Atty’s and investigators contact your and those Offices for that purpose shortly.  Detective Larry Menitti verbally told the victim’s father George nine days after Nia’s brain-death while collecting her cell-phone as evidence, “This isn’t Mayberry RFB you know. We’ll get to the truth of your daughter’s death.”  Well, we beg to differ Sherriff Taylor. And we want you and Barny Fife off the case.  Charles Ankner,  Greenacres, FL 33415  https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/

The Statue of Liberty welcomed every ship bound for Ellis Island, it’s size and position in the harbor shouted Welcome to the United States of America.   Those emigrating  to this country PAID (yes, paid!) to board a ship as a passenger at their port of departure. There was never a guarantee that their paid passage would not end up with one or all of their family members being returned. They were not required to have a passport or visa. However, they were REQUIRED to enter this country LEGALLY. Incoming ships to the port of New York were stopped at a small island off the coast of Staten Island prior to being received at Ellis Island. Inspectors would board the ships to vet passengers who were deemed mentally or physically ill or any who were involved in criminal activity. Those passengers deemed a threat to the well being of our country, were NOT gained entry. The remainder of the passengers were forwarded to Ellis Island where they were processed. Thousands of immigrants arrived daily to Ellis Island and in most cases their processing took only a few hours and then immigrants were released to acquire citizenship (which most did) Those who were cleared to enter the USA were directed to rail transportation in order to connect with their DOCUMENTED SPONSOR. Immigrants waiting to be processed were afforded the opportunity to BUY ( yes buy - not given) food at the Ellis Island commissary after exchanging their currency.  Those who were detained for health reasons were placed in a holding pattern and were given food and drink for free. If a child over the age of 12 was denied entry due to illness, they were sent back to their country of origin ALONE via ship. Those under 12  who were not deemed healthy enough to stay were SENT BACK to their country of origin with one parent. Children and adults requiring any type of medical attention were sometimes held in the infirmary and were CHARGED A FEE (Yes they paid) for any medical services. My great grandparents along with millions of those who emigrated here from various countries did so by LEGAL means and were not afforded a free ride, nor did they expect anything for free except entering a country where all citizens lived freely.  When they arrived, family took care of family. I am proud of my Italian/Irish ancestry. Reopen Port(s) of legal entry similar to Ellis Island and apply those same rules. In addition, those who fail to enter legally through the legal port(s) of entry will be denied citizenship forever and remain deported.  Allow all illegals presently living here to be processed in a similar fashion.  If they have been receiving assistance from the government and have not obtained work,  make a mandatory military service of 2 years minimum to gain immediate citizenship. Any new citizen convicted of a major crime within one year of obtaining a citizenship will be deported. As an employee working at the World Trade Center, I survived two terror attacks. How I remember the flags waving and the “we will never forget” signs, post 9/11. How quickly everyone forgets. I will never forget the numerous funerals I attended, nor the fear I still live with to this day from what I witnessed. Welcome to the United States of America to all those who wish to do so legally and are willing to give back to this country by working and making this great land of immigrants a prosperous and safe place for future generations.   God Bless the USA!!

The Washington Post is the most left wing nut job paper in the country and the supposed data they have conjured up is not based in fact. Sorry for those who point to the Post as a source. Please grasp the truth of this. Any crime by an illegal is way way to many. To make it worse is the idea you would defend the idea that illegals have some right to murder American and get a pass from the rest of us. You are some kind of nut job all by yourself.

The biggest threat to security is him. By shutting down the government he has caused the TSA to become weaker which means threats can come via  airports. Food stamps which people depend on are not getting them which will result in a increase of crime because people get desperate. federal workers are not being payed not knowing what or if they will get paid. If you support trump you have no compassion or foresight to see who your ignorance is effecting. You do realize your country is in trillions of dollars of debt and he wants to spend what you don't have. His grandmother was an illegal immigrant the same thing you say was said to his own family members.

The fact that you have a shut down over a crazy stupid wall that will do nothing to stop illegal immigrants means you are extremely unqualified to be president and you being president is a crime against humanity.

The favorite refrain from the Trump Administration:  “It didn’t happen. But if it did, it wasn’t a crime.”

The hard facts are that illegals commit fewer crimes than legal citizens. Absolutely there is crime but at a much lower rate. As a teenager I lost my license for a short time doing stupid driving. I worked and did deliveries with the company vehicle. If I told my boss that I had lost my license, I might have been fired from a job that I needed. I drove anyway but I was the safest driver on the road.

The only crime in this country is Donald Trump and the idiots who voted for him murder 101 and accessory to murder and you should be held accountable for the murders of the people in this country  Impeachment time.  jail time. and execution time...

The sad truth is that a wall will not keep crime and killers at bay...

There has never been a MORE DISGUSTING PERSON IN AMERICA  THEN THE TRAMP.  YOU HATE AMERICA BECAUSE YOU ARE NOT ALLOWED TO BARROW MONEY FROM AMERICAN BANKS. YOU HAVE BEEN TAKEN TO COURT BECAUSE YOU DON'T PAY PEOPLE THAT WORK FOR YOU. PLUS SOOOO MUCH MORE. I'LL BE DANCING IN THE STREETS WHEN YOU AND YOUR CRIME FAMILY ARE IN ORANGE PRISON SUITS. POS

They might work built around you & yr crime fam. Let's start there and see.... QUIT USING THE TRAGEDY OF SOME FAMILIES WHILE YOU CAUSE TRAGEDY TO OTHER FAMILIES IN YOUR FOOLS GAME - #SOULESSTRUMP

This is an open and public letter to the duly elected president Donald J Trump, from William Sharpe, citizen of the United States of America.  Dear Mr. Pres. you are in a very unique position as president of the United States, whereas only three other presidents have been placed into this position throughout the history of our nation, James Madison, Abraham Lincoln, and John F. Kennedy, two of the three were assassinated as you well know.  James Madison was fighting for the survival of our nation during the war of 1812, Abraham Lincoln was fighting for the survival of our nation, through the Civil war of 1860,  and John F. Kennedy was assassinated before he could fight and save America from the same foes, that the formal two presidents and yourself know so well.  Mr. Pres. you are in a unique position to be in a minority of great presidents and great leaders, and your challenges are no less than the challenges that these president faced, and probably because of technology today your challenges may be greater.  Mr. Pres. we are at the pinnacle as a nation for survival, I don't think anyone needs to tell you this, but I will tell you that a majority of the American people stand behind you,, and are willing to sacrifice all to defend this nation from the tyranny coming from the Democratic party.  Mr. Pres. if we do not stop them here and now, we the American people will be forced into a unCivil War, and that is what these individuals want.  I would ask you to use the power granted to you by the office, to take these individuals involved in the destruction of our nation's Constitution laws our heritage our liberties and freedoms, into custody for trial as domestic terrorist, plotting the overthrow and destruction of the United States of America.  If we the people, common men like myself understand these things to be true and factual, we cannot wait any longer for our nation to be eroded away to be the equal of some substandard nation of crime and larceny.  The American people did not sacrifice their lives in all the battles and wars to defend this Republic to let it be taken away by pedophile, serial killers, rapist.and murderers, and we the people are ready and willing to stand with you and fellow countrymen to stop the destruction of our nation!  If we take these individuals in for trial now, we will have stopped the next violent Civil War in America!  Their public statements and actions prove without a shadow of a doubt that they stand against the American people, and have larceny and ill will in their heart for the will and safety of the American people.  Sincerely citizen William Sharpe of Delaware.

This is disgusting abuse of facts. Illegal immigrants have lower crime rates than Americans. To single out specific cases, is pure manipulation.

Time to create a Border Chief Engineer.  Where are the Engineers in politics???? Be the first President to embrace engineers.  Engineers create our economy, but are consistently ignored as the experts they are.    Time to appoint a Chief, let him answer the Wall updates.   Time for the President to move onto the next project.  If you need anyone to argue the reason to build it, just make a Wall website, with a politician section with all the Democrats saying a Wall is necessary.    In 2020 we don't want to argue the Wall like an Abortion arguement of past elections, we the voters want to say, "The Wall was built, crime, drugs, have gone down in the past year".  We cannot say that if the Wall is not built.

Trump I support this build the wall finish the wall crime will fall!!😎

Trump is staying “relevant” as the wall is the only issue he has to stand on.  Unfortunately people are biting on this.  Child poverty, inequality, high infant death rates, gun crime, corporate greed...These are the burning issues that Trump can neither fix nor wants to address.  Building a wall is easy.

Trump said when he gets into office he will get rid of all the lazy people referring to those on government assistance! Schools are running out of funding which means lunches. SNAP is releasing the last of it’s funds the 19th, after that no more funds. Commods will be done as well. Housing developments aren’t funded so people who are on housing and HUD will be evicted due to non-payment. Prisons aren’t getting food. Not to mention nobody will get PELL right away which means a lot of families will go without. Farmers are seeing an effect by not being able to pay their bills. Medicaid/IHS will be limited as they will use the resources they have.. Families will go hungry enough to start robbing food and riots will start breaking out! Crime rates are going to increase too. All thanks to those of you who voted for Trump! 🤡 Pat yourself on the back... real proud of your President ain’t cha! I’m waiting for the simpsons episode to come true! I’m ready for impeachment!

Trump suborned perjury which is a very serious crime.

Undocumented immigrants literally don’t qualify for federal aid. Period. They do, however, pay taxes that they never see a penny of.  They also have much lower crime statistics than any other group of American citizens.  Feel free to try and prove me wrong. I’ll wait.

Until Prisons are safe of Drugs and Crime then we should support a Wall.  A National Emergency should have been when School Kids were Slaughtered by White men with AR's.. Let that sink in Chump..

Walls are stupid, they dont work. Almost all crime is committed by American citizens. How about gun control if you care about our family? What's that? You cant hear me over the sound of counting the 30 million dollars NRA gave you?

We Americans Want And Need The Wall For Our Own Security  We Can Not And Will Not Risk Our Famlies And Loved Ones Th3 Chance Of Disease Crime Theft Murder Of Inocence Citizens  Paying For All Of These Illegals That Do Not Work And Think That They Can Just Come And Recieve Welfare No No We Work Too Hard To Suport Lazy People Who Want Everything For  Nothing When Our Veterans Put Their Life On The Line To Keep Us Free From An Invasion Of Illegals They Are Still Suffering And We Need To Support Them Build The Wall So High They Can't Get Over It So Low They Can't Get Under It And So Long They Can't Get Around It

We can’t go into Mexico or any other country without a visa we would be thrown out. The point is lawless people don’t give a dam about doing the right thing. They will continue to break the laws and to those opposing the wall when illegal immigrant commits a crime against your love one you might never get the reason for security. So how’s about not locking your homes door or car let’s see what happens to you.

We finally have a president that cares above the people in this world should've been put up long ago we would not have had so much crime

We have criminals on the daily that are citizens including every shooter lately who happens to be a white nazi supremacist that also happens to be extreme supporters of Trump but every once in a while an immigrant commits a crime, big or small, and that's all that matters. Not the REAL crime problem of actual citizens. By no means am I supporting a killer but using it as a political boost is ridiculous.

We have criminals on the daily that are citizens including every shooter lately who happens to be a white nazi supremacist that also happens to be extreme supporters of Trump but every once in a while an immigrant commits a crime, big or small, and that's all that matters. Not the REAL crime problem of actual citizens. By no means am I supporting a killer but using it as a political boost is ridiculous.

We have enough homelessness, drugs, crime, disease.  We need to solve these problems.  Build the wall!

We want border security and our tax dollars to stop paying for all these illegals who come here plop their babies out and expect us to pay for them, they were born while their parents committed a crime, they should be considered illegal as well. We are the ones forced to feed, educate and give til our own go without.

We will gladly put up a wall if it’s around and the whole trump crime family.

Well thats true of any country except for sweden where the majority of crime is committed by immigrants from the middleeast etc. The same thing is happening in france,germany and england sadly.

What about all of the northern States like the one I grew up on that border another country and have no walls?  It sucks that you can't find a job with the skills you have, maybe try learning Spanish or move to a place where speaking Spanish isn't a job requirement... If 45 knows things we don't that make it crisis now that is more important than helping the Americans in California or Puerto Rico then why did it take so long for him to declare an emergency? Why didn't he do so in the first 2 years of his term when he was trying to get this done? It's not an emergency if you wait 2 years... Jim Jenkins - if control laws take lives, that blanket statement would mean you having a driver's license, being married in the government's eyes, or opening a bank account take lives... there are many countries with stricter gun laws that have lower crime rates. That point on gun control laws was also just simple way of showing that if you support a wall because it could save one person's life, then you should also support guns laws as they would save one person's life, or healthcare for all as that saves one life, or a full transition to renewable energy as that saves one life... more wall is a waste of taxpayer funds if it doesn't deal with the majority issues used to manufacture its need as an emergency, namely illegal immigration and drug smuggling.  Lastly saying that relatively few innocent people are killed by a gun is just plain nonsense. Try telling that to one family members that was killed in any number of mass killings in the last few years from Sandy Hook to Las Vegas concert goers... and stricter gun control doesn't mean law abiding citizens cant own guns, it just means they have to jump through a few more hoops. You loved your wife enough to file paperwork with the government declaring it, why cant you do the same with your gun? You wanted to drive bad enough you took a test showing you knew how to do so safely and show back up at the dmv every few years to reregister your license, why wouldn't you also do the same to own gun?

What's more important to the Democrats is to be humanitarian to criminals. How many children suffer when parents are sentenced for crimes. Do we let our humanitarian approach to life remove the penalty for crime.  President Trump desparate times call for desparate measures. Stop the shutdown and play your aces.

When will the liberal voters realize these Democrats are as fake as plastic and could not give two Hoots about anyone but their own egos ...winning politically is all they care about... that means votes getting votes and getting more votes from the dead from the prisoners from the illegals more refugees more refugees more votes... Libs to all illegals: we will give you free housing free money free tax refunds free welfare free healthcare come to us all you who are burdened and we Democrats will do whatever we can to warehouse you in poverty crime and squaller all of you just vote for us ... and guess what the stupid lame & wimp Republicans won't speak up and stop us

Where do you want to spend the money? Spend a little at the front end on a barrier or spend a lot at the back end on bureaucrazy and crime?

Whittley Guidry Garcia  Because a lot of crime is caused by illegal criminals,

Why Liberals just don’t understand these Trump Supporters   A question asked by a Trump supporter: "Why do liberals think Trump supporters are stupid?”  Here's what we really think about Trump supporters - the rich, the poor, the malignant and the innocently well-meaning, the ones who think and the ones who don’t...  That when you saw a man who had owned a fraudulent University, intent on scamming poor people, you thought “Fine."  That when you saw a man who had made it his business practice to stiff his creditors, you said, “Okay."  That when you heard him proudly brag about his own history of sexual abuse, you said, "No problem.”  That when he made up stories about seeing Muslim-Americans in the thousands cheering the destruction of the World Trade Center, you said, "Not an issue.”  That when you saw him brag that he could shoot a man on Fifth Avenue and you wouldn't care, you chirped, "knows me.”  That when you heard him illustrate his own character by telling that cute story about the elderly guest bleeding on the floor at his country club, the story about how he turned his back and how it was all an imposition on him, you said, "That's cool!”  That when you saw him mock the disabled, you thought it was the funniest thing you ever saw.  That when you heard him brag that he doesn't read books, you said, "Well, who has time?”  That when the Central Park Five were compensated as innocent men convicted of a crime they didn't commit, and he angrily said that they should still be in prison, you said, "That makes sense.”  That when you heard him tell his supporters to beat up protesters and that he would hire attorneys, you thought, “Yes!"  That when you heard him tell one rally to confiscate a man's coat before throwing him out into the freezing cold, you said, "What a great guy!”  That you have watched the parade of Neo-Nazis and white supremacists with whom he curries favor, while refusing to condemn outright Nazis, and you have said, "Thumbs up!”  That you hear him unable to talk to foreign dignitaries without insulting their countries and demanding that they praise his electoral win, you said, "That's the way I want my President to be.”  That you have watched him remove expertise from all layers of government in favor of people who make money off of eliminating protections in the industries they're supposed to be regulating and you have said, "What a genius!”  That you have heard him continue to profit from his businesses, in part by leveraging his position as President, to the point of overcharging the Secret Service for space in the properties he owns, and you have said, "That's smart!”  That you have heard him say that it was difficult to help Puerto Rico because it was the middle of water and you have said, "That makes sense.”  That you have seen him start fights with every country from Canada to New Zealand while praising Russia and quote, "falling in love" with the dictator of North Korea, and you have said, "That's statesmanship!”  That Trump separated children from their families and put them in cages, managed to lose track of 1500 kids, has opened a tent city concentration camp in the desert in Texas - he explains that they're just "animals" - and you say, "Well, OK then.”  That you have witnessed all the thousand and one other manifestations of corruption and low moral character and outright animalistic rudeness and contempt for you, the working American voter, and you still show up grinning and wearing your MAGA hats and threatening to beat up anybody who says otherwise.  What you don't get, Trump supporters in 2019, is that succumbing to frustration and thinking of you as stupid may be wrong and unhelpful, but it's also...hear me...charitable. Because if you're NOT stupid, we must turn to other explanations, and most of them are less flattering.  (Author unknown)

Why didn't Trump build a wall two years ago when he had a majority in Congress...Because it was not an emergency. Illegal border crossings and apprehensions have been declining for nearly two decades, according to U.S. Customs and Border Protection, and in 2017 were at their lowest point since 1971. A 2018 study published by the Cato Institute found that undocumented immigrants commit less crime than native-born citizens, and according to the Drug Enforcement Agency (DEA) the majority of illegal drugs coming into the country across the southern border are being smuggled through legal points of entry. In other words, this president has manufactured an immigration crisis for his own political gain.

Would it only be illegal immigrants that would ransack his house? because no Americans would ever commit a crime 🙄 moron

Yep! I'm sick and tired of hearing about how illegal crime rate is getting lower or they commit crimes at a lesser rate then people born here. Here is the deal. The illegal crime rate should be ZERO. That is the only exceptable number. Why? They shouldn't even be here.

Yep! I'm sick and tired of hearing about how illegal crime rate is getting lower or they commit crimes at a lesser rate then people born here. Here is the deal. The illegal crime rate should be ZERO. That is the only exceptable number. Why? They shouldn't even be here.

Yes Texas needs the wall . Stop all the Drugs following  into  our country also all the crime . WE NEED A WALL NANCY .

Yes we want border security and a wall. The people deserve to be safe and not over run with crime, diseases and people who cant add to America.

You are ignoring those killed by home grown white supremacy who killed more Americans than any other group.  Only 1% of crime is committed by illegal Immigrants.  Manipulating the statistics is evil and wrong.

the Democrats have a big heart filled with compassion; they're simply not understanding the millions it's costing us each day - nor the crime coming with a few that enter...

very weak speech, the lines are pretty much drawn by now and minds are made up.the dems want crime and disorder in the country so they can save us.we keep electing those like cortez, romney, pelosi, warren and the muslim whore.good does not always win over evil.

where i came from newfoundland canada last province to join canada dad was in second world war with britain we were not part of canada we don.t have much crime or immigrants too cold for people they like ontario where i came to work and vancouver that is hot  spots for  immigrants and mosques . all the people move to subburb

AND ….. of course you're not doing ANYTHING with murderers and criminals and  here except saying they are very fine people ….. asshole. Daddy forgot to teach you what a heart is? Dunce! People …. white people, have been killing citizens here and a whole lot more than your examples! Timothy killed McVeigh 168 ….. and he was not brown.

Adopt the Texas law! Execute murderers regardless of citizenship.

An American citizen killed 59 and wounded 500 at a Jason Aldean concert. Don't use these type of stories for reasons to build a wall. There are plenty of more valid ones. But this is making it look like the United States doesn't have murderers of their own. This causes people to hate people that look like me.

Arthur Fejfar Trump called the Asylum seekers drug dealers murderers and rapists... they said they took your spot on the line? So what do you do for a living? 🤔

As a Brit you don't know how lucky you are to have Trump who puts America first not like the pathetic left wing snowflake Democrats who put illegals rapists murderers and all scum of the earth first You should thank the Lord for Trump.

Buck Strunk totally agree. Trump however urged his base to vote for him in the simplest terms: rapists and murderers are coming across the border—vote for me, I’ll build a big wall. Try and get some perspective. 30,000 Americans are injured or killed by gun violence committed by other Americans in this country every year. A $20,000,000,000 wall will not protect you from people who want to pick fruit and vegetables.

Cindy Sak Nowak obviously your comprehensive skills are based on Fictional world's where the same cops that you idiots are calling oppressors and murderers all of a sudden become your protectors when law abiding citizens have no guns. Get a clue

Does this mean that when a man from la kills a man in Arizona, la will be walled off to to stop murderers? Wonder how America will look in ten years if that becomes the trend.

George Washington's State of the Union Address was a letter FOR THE PEOPLE OF AMERICA....and it was the FOUNDATION of The State of the Union Address...until Democrat President Woodrow Wilson made it a PR STUNT for politicians to gather and pat each other on the back!  Is Nancy Pelosi's "dissing" really a GIFT IN DISGUISE?  President Donald Trump has three choices.  1. He can start a twitter campaign calling out Nancy Pelosi for this, and we get another expensive boring "Dog and Pony show" none of us look forward to.  2. He could take the "Dog and Pony Show" out of Washington, D.C. and go back to what President George Washington did. Actually report to the legal and law abiding American's, call out the division, call out for term limits, call out for real reform in immigration via a demanding for the Visa Programs, Refugee status, having a wall/fence/barrier put in place and sharing that before he was elected, Democrats were willing to invest over 30 BILLION for a wall/fence/barrier for the protection, much like on their own private properties to protect themselves and their family, the legal and law abiding "American Family."  3. He goes ahead with the State of the Union...BUT, he walks in to the room this is held empty, for a "one on one" talk with the legal and law abiding American citizens that last 5-10 minutes at the most.  He walks in and doesn't even go to the podium. He sits down in a chair where the Democrats are not present, and tells the cameraman to pan around that room, showing the emptiness. He then addresses us.  He address the fact can be shown we need TERM LIMITS (What more American's want even more than a wall/fence/barrier) on Congress to get back to those actually doing their job, nothing more and nothing less, and it has become crystal clear, through mostly Lobbyism/Lobbists Congress cannot do their real job any more. Then talk about Senator Ted Cruz's attempt to pass a Bill to Law for TERM LIMITS on both The House and The Senate to get back to their assigned, through the Constitution of the United States, jobs!  He reminds us it is WE THE PEOPLE are their bosses. We foot the bills/pay the bills that they make, and way too many bills are being given to us that they have no right, per their Constitutional Oath, and we have to let our voices be heard.  (Traveling to DC has proven to not be a motivator for Congress...but we hold the real purse-strings, and the BIGGEST MOVE we could make is show we don't need the IRS, the real LIFEBLOOD of theft for politicians on us. Just look at the Socialist and Communist leaders in many states stealing tax dollars by finding ways to tax everything. EVEN WATER!!!!) DOWNSIZE THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT (This shut down is showing we don't need HALF of what we are paying for Federally!) PASS TERM LIMITS ON CONGRESS AND JUDGES! GET RID OF TENURE! FORCE OUR TRUE REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS TO LIVE IN THEIR HOME STATE NOT WASHINGTON! BUILD THE WALL/FENCE/BARRIER! ENFORCE VISA'S, REFUGEE AND OTHER TIME LIMITED NON-CITIZENSHIP AGREEMENTS! BRING BACK THE DEATH PENALTY TO DAY OF CONVICTION EXECUTIONS FOR CONVICTED MURDERERS, RAPISTS, MOLESTERS, PEDOPHILES, KIDNAPPERS, TERRORISTS, THOSE THAT AID THESE AND THOSE THAT FALSELY ACCUSE THESE WHETHER THEY ARE LEGAL CITIZENS OR ILLEGAL ALIENS!

Hey look, it’s racists who think all immigrants are murderers. That’s Trump’s key demographic.

How many trillions have been spent on wars, and now socialists want to open the boarders and invite the war here. My small community was pummelled with rapists and murderers because LEGAL immigrants came from WAR TORN COUNTRIES and bring the hate and violence with them. WHO SCREENED THESE PEOPLE?!?!

If President Trump only knew of this... murder... just down the road from the Winter White House...  Hoping to impress upon Governor Ron DeSantis that the FDLE and FBI should "get on this". Murderers walking free because of incompetent Officers and wealthy backers.   Executive Summary:  Palm Beach County family seeks redress, fair justice, and relief after being denied U.S. and State of Florida Constitutional rights under color of law related to and concerning the homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER.  Specifically, in the face of overwhelming relevant, material, and competent evidence, to date all State and Local Authorities have refused to initiate a criminal investigation into and regarding the opiate caused death of NIA LEE ANKNER. Although the surviving family has provided competent and substantial evidence of a homicide; there has been no related criminal investigation initiated nor conducted by any authorized Florida law enforcement entity, being wholly contrary to and violative of Art. I, § 2, and Art. I, § 16(b) Fla. Const. (1998), and § 839.13, § 839.20, § 843.0855, and § 843.14, Fla. Stat.  Due to incompetence of Town of Palm Beach investigating Law Enforcement Officers at the crime scene, and the subsequent and continuing obstruction of justice by supervising Town of Palm Beach Officers; the Florida Department of Law Enforcement, (“FDLE”), Palm Beach Sheriff's Office (“PBSO”), Town of Palm Beach Police Department (“PBPD”), Florida State Attorney’s Office 15th Judicial District (“15th SAO”), and the Palm Beach County Medical Examiner’s Office (“PBME”) have all refused to conduct a homicide investigation, as required by Law.  NIA LEE ANKNER’s surviving family has information and evidence providing probable cause to charge and arrest one KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY for 1st Degree Capital Murder.   In August of 2017, KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY and other person’s yet unknown, in the County of Palm Beach, and against the statute, peace, and dignity of the State of Florida, did unlawfully from a premeditated design to effect the death of a human being, and caused the death of a human being, NIA LEE ANKNER, through the unlawful distribution of opium or any compound, derivative or preparation of opium and/or fentanyl, opium or any compound, derivative or perpetration of opium, and/or fentanyl, and which was the proximate cause of the death of NIA LEE ANKNER , did kill and murder, NIA LEE ANKNER, contrary to Florida Statue 782.04(1)(a)1, 782.04(1)(a)2, and 782.04(1)(a)3. (CAPITAL FELONY).  "Dear Governor Ron DeSantis,  I and my family pray you are well and happy; and, we thank God you are Florida’s 46th Chief Executive.  My name is Charles E. Ankner. I (and my family) seek your Office’s review of the information herein related to the homicide of my biological niece, Nia Lee Ankner (“Decedent”); with an end goal of a competent homicide investigation being performed by an authorized Florida criminal investigative entity outside of Palm Beach County.  With your being a former U.S. Navy JAG Officer, and my being a USAF Veteran and certified long experienced paralegal; I’ll strive to be accurate and brief in my presentation, and yet be comprehensive.  Quite frankly Governor, we pray the information herein will make your blood boil; and, motivate you to action.  In August of 2017, the Decedent had met a former coworker-acquaintance, one Kelly Anne McCauley, for a Saturday afternoon pool swim at another person’s residence near the Town of Palm Beach. Neither made it to the pool; and the Decedent was brain-dead from an opiate overdose within two-hours of meeting that day with McCauley. McCauley also delayed calling 911 for twenty-minutes while instead calling her newly estranged boyfriend. By the time McCauley did call 911, eighty-percent of the Decedent’s brain was dead.   Admittedly, the Decedent also had a blood alcohol level of 0.15 in her system at the time of her brain-death. The combination of an opiate supplied by McCauley and ethanol caused the Decedent to stop breathing in the presence of McCauley while she purposefully delayed summoning help. In fact, besides after a twenty-minute in calling 911; McCauley did nothing to render help to the Decedent (rescue-breathing, flag down other cars for help, going into the Office of the Condo parking lot where they were at). McCauley, beyond a reasonable doubt, after supplying a fatal illicit opiate to the Decedent actually and proximately caused her death; and McCauley also for twenty minutes stood-by and let the Decedent suffocate to death.   Kelly McCauley has a long criminal record in Palm Beach County, including for but not limited to: illicit controlled substance use and possession, illicit drug paraphernalia use and possession, solicitation of prostitution, felony armed robbery, felony battery, felony grand theft, and destroying, tampering with, and concealing evidence. In my review of her criminal record; McCauley has always pled-out and never served more than a few months in the Palm Beach County Jail.  Tragically, McCauley is an all too common Palm Beach County catch and release felon. Even more tragic; McCauley was arrested only four-months before murdering the Decedent by Palm Beach County Florida Highway Patrol, for illegal possession of Xanax; with the driver of the car she was in unconscious and the car against the center barrier of Interstate-95. McCauley has lost her driving privileges due to several DUIs.  The Decedent had no criminal nor arrest record.  The motivation for PBPD Officers to resist, “soft-peddle”, or obstruct any and all related criminal investigations is that instead of concentrating on McCauley related to the Decedent’s condition and ultimate death; the PBPD exclusively concentrated on collecting evidence against the Decedent for DUI. In other words, PBPD Detective Lawrence Mennetti and Sgt. Scott Duquette “screwed the pooch” by not processing the scene and detaining McCauley pursuant to Florida Statute. Thereafter, Detective Mennetti performed what believe to be a half-stepped sham investigation in the “incident” and concluded “…no crime was committed in our jurisdiction.”.  Just a draft. How am I doing?   https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/

It isn't a damned competition you myopic virtue signaling troll! Illegal border jumpers are not supposed to be here, FULL STOP!  By your logic lets let them in because we already have mass murderers?! That is really a very special kind of stupid, princess!

It's $5 billion out of $40 trillion of one year's budget.  I suggest that if you aren't vigorously fighting other forms of wasteful spending as hard as you are this, you simply are speaking out for one reason. You hate Donald Trump.  So what is the harm if we over protect our border? What if it slows the flow of illegal drugs just enough to save a few lives. I know my family has lost a couple young men to drugs over the last couple years that maybe would still be here if it wasn't so easily accessible.   What if it keeps just a few murderers out of our country. Isn't it worth it? Haven't we wasted money on worse things than this?  Are you so petty that you would oppose this out of spite while not opposing the other billions we waste or the $50 billion a year we just give away to other countries?  It's $5 billion out of $40 trillion of one year's budget.  I bet most of you never fought so hard for such a small percentage of the budget.... until Donald Trump became your president.  Seems pretty obvious to me what your motives are!

Karen Breunig and?  So we have murderers her and you think that means we should welcome murderers to come here?  Nope

Karen Breunig and?  So we have murderers her and you think that means we should welcome murderers to come here?  Nope

Protect Americans from Americans with Assault Rifles, who goes in schools, churches, synagogues, night clubs, movie theatres, etc, and BRUTALLY SLAUGHTER INNOCENT AMERICANS BY THE DOZENS, INCLUDING TODDLERS AND CHILDREN LIKE IN SANDY HOOK , CT,, HOW ABOUT YOU BUILD A FREAKING WALL AROUND THEM TOO HUH?? HOW ARE YOU PROTECTING YOURSELF FROM HOME GROWN TERRORISTS AND MURDERERS??

There are far more criminals and murderers  that are white Americans ,  not to mention all the other American gangs and criminals than the 0.0132% of illegals that are criminals. Most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!

There is no need for a multi billion dollar border wall. There is no need to force the separation of all families at the border.  There is no need to deny unfortunate refugees the opportunity to apply for asylum.  Illegal border crossings are at a 46 year low.  The situation at our southern border is not as dire as Trump's hysterical tweets suggest. Illegal immigration is not an existential crisis. We are in no danger of losing our country.   The Trump Administration has intentionally adopted a policy of cruelty towards immigrants, and they rationalize their policies by relying on unsubstantiated claims that they pose a threat.  Day after day Trump and his allies resort to fearmongering, scapegoating, and demonizing.  Folks at the southern border have been maligned as rapists, murderers, drug dealers, gang members, and criminals who have been infiltrated by terrorists, and are threatening to spread infectious diseases, while they steal jobs from hard working Americans and simultaneously sponge off the social welfare system because they are so lazy.    Scant evidence has been offered to back these claims up, but when your goal is simply to dehumanize people you can't let hard data get in the way.     Early estimates had put the cost of Trump's wet dream border wall at $25 billion, and that's before any unforeseen cost overruns.    The whole thing strikes me as a terrible waste of resources that is sure to excite reactionaries, but does nothing to solve the underlying issues that compel people to immigrate to the US via any available means.    If the US spends billions on a wall, what have we got when it's done?  Just a wall.  That's it.    It won't improve conditions in the regions in the world where people are suffering.  It won't stop the people living in those regions from attempting to enter the US.  It won't reverse the demographic changes underway in America that have so many entitled Caucasians decrying how minorities are destroying the fabric of society.  Why should we persecute people for losing the birthplace lottery?   Why should anything as universal as wanting better opportunities for yourself and your family be considered criminal?  Instead of building walls to divide us, I would prefer inviting those less fortunate to share in the promise America can offer.

This is an open and public letter to the duly elected president Donald J Trump, from William Sharpe, citizen of the United States of America.  Dear Mr. Pres. you are in a very unique position as president of the United States, whereas only three other presidents have been placed into this position throughout the history of our nation, James Madison, Abraham Lincoln, and John F. Kennedy, two of the three were assassinated as you well know.  James Madison was fighting for the survival of our nation during the war of 1812, Abraham Lincoln was fighting for the survival of our nation, through the Civil war of 1860,  and John F. Kennedy was assassinated before he could fight and save America from the same foes, that the formal two presidents and yourself know so well.  Mr. Pres. you are in a unique position to be in a minority of great presidents and great leaders, and your challenges are no less than the challenges that these president faced, and probably because of technology today your challenges may be greater.  Mr. Pres. we are at the pinnacle as a nation for survival, I don't think anyone needs to tell you this, but I will tell you that a majority of the American people stand behind you,, and are willing to sacrifice all to defend this nation from the tyranny coming from the Democratic party.  Mr. Pres. if we do not stop them here and now, we the American people will be forced into a unCivil War, and that is what these individuals want.  I would ask you to use the power granted to you by the office, to take these individuals involved in the destruction of our nation's Constitution laws our heritage our liberties and freedoms, into custody for trial as domestic terrorist, plotting the overthrow and destruction of the United States of America.  If we the people, common men like myself understand these things to be true and factual, we cannot wait any longer for our nation to be eroded away to be the equal of some substandard nation of crime and larceny.  The American people did not sacrifice their lives in all the battles and wars to defend this Republic to let it be taken away by pedophile, serial killers, rapist.and murderers, and we the people are ready and willing to stand with you and fellow countrymen to stop the destruction of our nation!  If we take these individuals in for trial now, we will have stopped the next violent Civil War in America!  Their public statements and actions prove without a shadow of a doubt that they stand against the American people, and have larceny and ill will in their heart for the will and safety of the American people.  Sincerely citizen William Sharpe of Delaware.

We should have had more secure borders 30 yrs ago or more. The illegals  and drug runners and murderers would not be so rampant in our country.  Democrats DO NOT CARE ABOUT THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!!!!! THEY  ARE ONLY CONCERNED WITH STOPPING TRUMP NO MATTER WHAT. We may have to suffer a bit more, but we need him to stay strong for what this country needs for all of us to survive. This is AMERICA! Not Mexico, not Guatemala,  not Saudi Arabia.........etc. THIS IS OUR COUNTRY.  THE AMERICAN WAYS. TAKE YOUR WAYS BACK TO YOUR COUNTRY. NOT OURS!!!

Your an ignorant man, it doesn’t matter if you build a wall.  It will not stop American Born serial killers, drug dealers/users, rapist, murderers, bigots, child molesters, etc., etc., from being in this country.  As long as the demands stay in the USA the supply will keep coming

that is not the definition of a democrat.  It is absolutely absurd how everyone now believes that one democrat's behaviour represents all.  A white male Christian murdered a group of people in a church at prayer. Does that mean that all white male Christians are evil murderers?  Do you see how ridiculous it is to group everyone into one pile?  This divisiveness by the president is dangerous, and you are the perfect example to the danger....so much anger...winning yet so full of anger and unhappiness

what about all the kids and adults who die by homegrown, born in the usa, murderers?

Dear Mr president. If you Arrest and imprison Americans who knowingly hire Illegals you wont have a border problem. You cant put a wall around an open honey pot and expect to keep the ants out. Likewise make Drugs legal and treat Addicts. (no money = no smuggle) End welfare for Illegals and arrest Commie state politicians who hand our tax money to Illegals. So tell me what is wrong with my plan?.

Then why are you leaving our airports, borders, and seaports undermanned and vulnerable by holding our country hostage.  Terrorists come here mostly by plane. Drug trafficking organizations have also taken to the air. Border Patrol and other law enforcement agents have encountered smugglers using ultralight aircraft to conduct drug drops. Customs and Border Protection data showed that ultralight aircraft may have been used to transport drugs on 534 occasions from 2011 to 2016. Drones have also been used.In recent years, the Coast Guard and Customs and Border Protection have started to see small speedboats from Mexico used to smuggle drugs into the United States, particularly in California, in an effort to get around border walls and Border Patrol agents. From 2011 to 2016, border officials said there were 309 known attempts to smuggle drugs across the border using boats; officials said there was no way of knowing how many boats actually reach shore.

Then why are you leaving our airports, borders, and seaports undermanned and vulnerable by holding our country hostage.  Terrorists come here mostly by plane. Drug trafficking organizations have also taken to the air. Border Patrol and other law enforcement agents have encountered smugglers using ultralight aircraft to conduct drug drops. Customs and Border Protection data showed that ultralight aircraft may have been used to transport drugs on 534 occasions from 2011 to 2016. Drones have also been used.In recent years, the Coast Guard and Customs and Border Protection have started to see small speedboats from Mexico used to smuggle drugs into the United States, particularly in California, in an effort to get around border walls and Border Patrol agents. From 2011 to 2016, border officials said there were 309 known attempts to smuggle drugs across the border using boats; officials said there was no way of knowing how many boats actually reach shore.

There are Five groups that oppose a wall/barrier and increasing border security: 1) Those that smuggle people into the US. 2) Those that smuggle drugs into the US 3) Those that smuggle guns into the US 4) The Blue fascist rats. 5) Brainless zombies who believe anything the Blue fascist rats tell them….

There are Five groups that oppose a wall/barrier and increasing border security: 1) Those that smuggle people into the US. 2) Those that smuggle drugs into the US 3) Those that smuggle guns into the US 4) The Blue fascist rats. 5) Brainless zombies who believe anything the Blue fascist rats tell them….

There are Five groups that oppose a wall/barrier and increasing border security: 1) Those that smuggle people into the US. 2) Those that smuggle drugs into the US 3) Those that smuggle guns into the US 4) The Blue fascist rats. 5) Brainless zombies who believe anything the Blue fascist rats tell them….

This country is going to hell in a hand basket. People claim they don't see color, we're all one race or that "all lives matter" those are the same people that are all in for this wall. Do you know the type of stuff people have to do to smuggle drugs in this country? Every race steals, kills, and lies. Do I hate Trump? No, but I don't care for his vulgarity either. It's not his fault that people are falling for the okeydoke though. People should have a mind of their own. I'm neither Democrat or Republican, I'm a human being that has empathy and compassion for those who are suffering. A Mexican man (who was legal born and bred) told me the conditions living in Mexico, and they're barbaric. Of course people want to come to America, the supposed land of the free and home of the brave, the same way people wanted to escape from England and ended up here. How do we know that the Native Americans didn't have a law about illegals entering in their country?

-Question are Democrat’s being paid by lobbyists and drug cartel not to build the wall 50% of drugs are walked or driven across the U.S.-Mexico Border. 1. The bridge crosses the Rio Grande, connecting Texas with Mexico. Officials said they seized 35 packages believed to be methamphetamine weighing 320 pounds, seven packages believed to be cocaine weighing almost 40 pounds and two packages believed to be heroin weighing around seven pounds. The total street value is estimated at $6,998,000. 2. Puerto Rico 100 lobbyists paid millions to Democratic members of Congress traveled to Puerto Rico, party at fancy seaside resort with rooms costing more than $400 a night live stage shows from New York, during Government shutdown 800,000 great American workers not receiving paychecks.  3. Unknown People elected to Congress with millions in donations

AMEN.USMC. build the wall mr. Trump we don't want the old legal c r we don't want the human trafficking of young girls we don't want all the drugs in our country that we don't want all the drugs in our country that are walls keep out the cartel 2 the drug cartel

AMEN.USMC. build the wall mr. Trump we don't want the old legal c r we don't want the human trafficking of young girls we don't want all the drugs in our country that we don't want all the drugs in our country that are walls keep out the cartel 2 the drug cartel

Abby Schmidt they will with all the lost cartel revenue you Idiot

Americans  want our republic  restored, we want to regain our sovereignty reinstate our constitution and Bill of rights.  We want the united states cooperation  destroyed,  we want the criminal Federal Reserve banking cartel abolished and  our currency  returned to a value backed system.  We want the 97 percent of federal government agencies that have no right to exist under the constitution gone.  We want the traitors arrested.  The wall is  just a minor issue of  what Americans want.

And that's why the Democrats oppose the wall. It's apparent that they are getting kickbacks from the Mexican cartel. Just like the last Mexican president was getting. Most likely what Chapo said is true the Pelosi and the Democrats are on the payroll

As it turns out, back in 2011 then-President Barack Obama issued an executive order “blocking property of transnational criminal organizations.” Obama cited his authority as granted through the Constitution to invoke the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, 50 U.S.C. 1701, and the National Emergencies Act, 50 U.S.C. 1601. The latter is the same legislation that Trump is citing to get funding for the wall to achieve his immigration reform goals. That executive order targeted a number of criminal organizations, including the Mexican Los Zetas cartel, an ally of the MS-13 gang President Trump has regularly called out as a danger to Americans.

Bill Rahbine and what if your daughter was ever to get murdered by a illegal that's in a cartel ? 🤣🤷🏻‍♀ 1 against .. what ? 50 thugs ? ... that wouldn't work out .

Build the wall with cartel money. Use all the drug money coming over the boarder. El Chap had money. Use it to build the wall!!!

Build the wall 👍🙏 keep pushing it. Or declare natural disaster and build anyway. Wonder how much cartel $ they getting to fight this 😉👍

Build the wall. 159 immigrants rescued from a drug cartel. A wall willl hopefully prevent this.

Cartel not happy after paying these Democrats to stop the wall.

Danny Leonard They sold out to globalism. Build the wall with cartel money.

Donald Trump Jr is tied to El Chapo's Mexican drug cartel. These photos prove it. The same Latvian banker Don Jr is in photos with also was behind a massive Russian money laundering scheme as well. Because, of course he was.   https://thesternfacts.com/trump-jr-now-tied-to-mexican-drug-cartels-money-laundering-scheme-5906b8d4ce5d

Francine Cartel its sad but he will survive it.

Frankie Urban  he's trying very hard, but the democraps are blocking him at every move.  At his speech tonight I am hoping he will declare a national emergency due to the invasion of the illegal aliens, the drugs pouring over, the rapes, the murders and the cartel traffickers.   It really is an INVASION and a national security issue.  Get er done and build that wall/fence whatever!!!!!    #MAGA

Gato Gato dont forget drugs gangs cartel human trafficking. Not just killings

Having a hard time understanding how our politicians have decided to become the representatives of illegals. Got all the time in world for some illegals and none for Americans. Hand out our money to people who materialize out of thin air practically. Stop pussyfooting around and build it. The progressives in both parties are never going to consent even tho they know it’s what we need. Time to see how much cartel money is in Congress and senate.

How bout you start charging them money to come in this country and work for this country and pay us the money they owe the cartel lol

How does a wall slow down a Criminal Cartel with Planes exactly?

I have an idea President Trump, why don't you threaten to tear down the walls at the California and Texas borders.  Then we'll see just how quickly Pelosi (and all the American people that cannot see the value and necessity of having walls and security) realizes that we need them...  Anyone is welcome into our country as long as you are vetted, non-criminals, healthy, and legal.  The same process our grand, great grand, great great grand parents had to go through.  Filled out the proper paper work, quarantined until well, became legal and paid taxes, and turned away if they were criminals.  It is much, much easier for the Cartel and terrorists (from all over the world) to get into our country from Mexico.  This is really scary America!  We need security at our borders, people!

It's pretty clear as to which politicians are owned by the cartel.

Keith Rabinowitz They ARE THE DRUG CARTEL, ALONG WITH ALL THE LEGAL AND LAW SYSTEM AND JUDICIARIES. You can't corrupt the entire country without the Powers That Be behind you. They CREATED this morass of evil drudgery.

Lets exterminate the cartel Mr President

Most of the drugs come directly through U.S. ports of entry — the official border crossings. Smuggling engineers use constantly evolving tactics to hide the contraband in fake vehicle panels, secret compartments or deep inside engine parts. Cartel chemists have learned to liquefy meth to make it look like water. And super-potent fentanyl is so compact that pedestrian couriers can walk it through border gates hidden in clothing, shoes or body cavities  They are also playing the odds. San Diego’s main crossing at San Ysidro, the southern terminus of U.S. Interstate 5, is the busiest land border in the Western Hemisphere, where 70,000 vehicle passengers and 20,000 pedestrians enter the United States each day. For smuggling high-value narcotics, blending in is a better bet than sneaking around.  While seizures of hard drugs are at record levels — indicating an unprecedented volume of narcotics entering the United States, experts say — arrests of illegal border crossers dropped last year to the lowest level since 1971.  The money would be better spent using hi tech monitoring and hiring more U.S. customs officers whose job it is to facilitate trade and travel while stopping narcotics and other threats.

Mr president  Human trafficking is going on right new in Iowa and Illinois. And the police are apart of it. There churches in America are supporting them through organizations that help relocate women and children. What there doing. The cities that have large churches. that give a lot to missions. Is how the raise money. Then they ship the illegal immigrants to another city. Where the coyotes cartel are waiting for them. I saw it at the church I was going to.  And yesterday I over heard a police officer talking about. A case of a woman stabbing a man. Both here illegally. The officer said that the federal government told him to go to the Catholic Church in town to get there name. I told them that this is called human trafficking. They looked at me like I was crazy

Mr. President is the report true that there is 14 billion seized from drug cartel Joaquin “El’Chapo” Guzman that could be used to fund the wall?   If so can we use it for your original plan for a concrete wall? Or is this fake news?

Mr. President no matter what u do or say they are going to oppose u. So just forget what everybody thinks. Get the job done. Declare national emergency and build that wall. Our safety comes first. The democrats need the illegals to win in 2020 and plus those drug cartel and human trafficking kickbacks are nice. Do it!! 💪💪🇺🇸🇺🇸

My total opinion about Nancy Pelosi and why she does not want the wall is because behind the scenes I believe she's working with the drug cartels just like the other Democrats that are involved and not wanting the wall because if a wall goes up that's less money they will be receiving from the drug cartel from bringing in the drugs into our country I think she's also my opinion a part of the human trafficking that's going on in this country they don't want to give up all the illegal money blood money that they're getting off these drug cartels the people involved in the human trafficking so we'll never see the wall cuz they will fight to the end because they will be losing millions and millions of dollars every year just my opinion

Pelosi didn’t you take an oath to protect the American people (not the Mexican cartel).  I took the oath to protect and defend my country and even though our pay was delayed because the military wasn’t always given their minute raise we were still at our assigned post.  What makes you any difference?  Oh yea, you’re STILL GETTING PAID while other aren’t.  President Trump Homeland Security has support this security event.  HAIRY PELOSI YOU LIE!!!!!!Taking after your sister Hiliary.

Please crack down on companies hiring ilegals this will also help. And banks getting rich off cartel. Build the wall and build up our border patrol in florida

Sorry for your loss, Them people in Texas are being paid to stop the wall.  Do you know how many millions Soros, Clinton’s and the cartel are going to loose in drug money with the wall.  What people are doing to our kids is despicable

Stay Focus on our Borders. .........Mexico is Not Our Friend they are partners with Drug Cartel .   They love the American $$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$&$$$s  Corrupt just like Venezuela 😡👎🏽

Ted Cruiz said use money seized from El Chapo drug cartel.. $14 billion.. just like local police use confiscated drug money to fight the drug problem.

Thanks for walling the world's largest cartel in with us. Also for giving them a huge tax break

The Mexican drug cartels have a lot of money and they know how to invest it to maximize their illegal profits. During the national discussion in this country about legalizing marijuana it was suspected that a large amount of cartel money went into swaying public opinion away from the legalization.  Is it possible that cartel money is now being used to change public opinion and the politicians opinions on the construction of the border wall between Mexico and the United States? I am just wondering now……

The Mexican drug cartels have a lot of money and they know how to invest it to maximize their illegal profits. During the national discussion in this country about legalizing marijuana it was suspected that a large amount of cartel money went into swaying public opinion away from the legalization.  Is it possible that cartel money is now being used to change public opinion and the politicians opinions on the construction of the border wall between Mexico and the United States? I am just wondering now……

The democrats aka Pelosi, Schuman most likely don’t want the Wall built, to keep the Drug Cartel and them wealthy. Remember in 2009, democrats under Obama, overturned the 1988 Ban on use of federal funds for needle-exchange program. Why do democrats want to encourage drug users to continue the deadly habits?

The wall will do nothing you have to go to there tunnels and flush them out. The people coming to the wall are families and people trying to escape cartel.

Throw........ MS. Nope already got trump getting dump over the wall and let the Spanish and cartel take care of him. Then.... Tear the wall down

democrats work for the cartel

whoever denies that wall will work is an idiot with an agenda in collution with the drugs cartel of Mexico

38 is not even near enough to half the voting public you idiot !  To claim America anything you must have at least 50 percent of the voting public supporting you and you do not !  Your a lair !  4,000 terrorist turns into 12 suspected and only 6 at the southern border , the drugs come in cars and thru the 60 tunnels we have found , your wall is stupidity and nothing more !  That's why 62 percent of us know it and are opposing you !  And over 50 percent are calling for your impeachment so yes America wants you gone , not a wall , four walls around you called a jail cell !

A crazy white guy killed my father, and walked away with no jail time. His name is Bobby Guthrie. The cops were so overwhelmed they got it confused with an incident that happened on the near block so no one was there in time. Evidence was missed and ive looked so the guy walked if you want to put a massive amount of money somewhere put it in the police force. A wall wouldnt have helped my family.

Albert Kojo Kyekye I’m going to admire him when they put him in jail.

Angus Crawford but he was coerced and him and his family threatened with jail time after he wouldn't go along with Mueller. All these trials and admitting crimes has been forced by Mueller. His actions are not  allowed toward murders but he's getting away with it for the so called collusion bs.

Anyone know why Trump won't go to jail once Mueller's report comes out?  They're afraid his shading will blend with the orange suit and he'll slip out in the dirty laundry...  Score to date : Russia 6, US 0...

Arky James education, jail over population, homelessness, the millions of sick folks who can't get help, affordable housing for all, hungry families... idk man pick one

Brent Robinson Mueller will solve the problem once the Orange Orangutang is arrested and thrown in jail.

Build the wall. Move on. Use “drug money” held in escrow. These drug lords are in jail, on the run, or dead. If the ACLU doesn’t like it, build a wall around them.

Cool then lets start rounding up all your white supremacist supporters and put them in jail before they commit more acts of terror. Sadly those white supremacist will disagree with this comment because they support hate.

Donna Price, why is he going to jail?

Eric Helmes  Yes, put Trump in jail for knowingly hiring illegals first.   But it’s not even an issue. Historically illegal migration ebbs and flows according to economic need.  Right now it’s in deep decline and has been due to low unemployment.  This isn’t even in the top 100 issues we should be focusing on.   But, you know, campaign promises an all.

Fake issue by a fake human being in the role of a fake president.  Thankfully, your jail cell is going to be very, very real.  Soon...

False logic. An illegal immigrant may harm your family and therefore we need a wall. It’s like saying you burnt the chicken and now I don’t like pizza. Yes, we need border security. No, Donald Dump isn’t the person to provide even the illusion of safety. We have never been so weak and vulnerable as we are now. A wall won’t change that. For probably the first time in my life, I agree with Anne Coulter. The emergency is the idiot occupying the WhiteHouse!! RESIGN ALREADY!!!!! Either way, we both know, you are going to do jail time. They generally don’t like people that are traitors in prison.

For the last time I am not a meth head . You not gonna get me to curse you out and get put in fb jail . Not today satan .

Get off your tantrum and get this shutdown resolved once and for all! And stop working for the North Koreans, the Chinese and more importantly your friend Putin-Russians. Put America first and NOT your personal interests. Your clothing is made under slave labor conditions, not in the USA but in China and Bangladesh. Also, your daughters clothing was made under slave labor conditions in China! YOU are not putting America first! YOU are not MAGA! Resign today or else you are going to jail for treason in conspiring with the Russians.

Here's an idea dumb dumb, crack down hard on those who employ undocumented immigrants, shut them down and send them to jail. Once the word gets out no one here will hire them they will stop coming and the 100's of thousands that fail to honor their visa commitments will leave. But then we will have to convince all your trumpkins to go to work

Hmmmm....Larry wants a Wall and ole Hillary locked up. How about Healthcare? Clean water? Infrastructure? You are full of ignorance sir. By 2020 that traitor will be in jail.

Hold all the pay for those who don,t want the wall Release The Names Of All Who Used The slush fund. Make Them Pay it Back. More Cleaning Needs To be Done Mueller Belongs In jail with comey,rosenstein,Kelly holder,Rice Lynch,Schiff Clapper,Brannen Obama clintons And more. Get The Scun Out..

I hope you will be able to clean DC.. Hoping you have all the evidence to make them all go to jail!!

I want to see professors of Texas A&M in jail.  That bullshit i was attacked with an electronic arm it could do you hear into your mind voices o noisy it happend me in the university of texas at austin  I was attacked with an electronic arm from i was doing a postdoc in physics department at texas university at austin. They followed to mexico, the night before came back i was attacked and tortured into my mind during all night. I remind i went for a dinner to a small restaurant after i went back to hotel i started to heard voices of women and men talking all the night it looked how if they were outside of the hotel room. I couldnt sleep but my mind was damaged now but i had courage to left austin so i took airplane and flied to mexico. I arrived to mexico at night so i accomodated at hotel because the first idea comes to my mind perhaps i am sick so i hope to go with a neurologist to check my brain tomorrow. But that night in the hotel in mexico was worst because in the night started to hear voices again but now they laughed of me and talking during all the night thay they were from police that night i couldnt sleep. The story is long now my mind is quiet and after ten years i understood they just say stupid things. How did it begin? It started in the lab where i was the phd students started a game very strange so in the building of the university everybody knew me and i just took a couple of weeks. When i saw the behaviour of phd students were anormal i talked with them: i said them: you all have a problem with me and they answered that they had not troubles with you jesus. So i forgot everything. But they went on with the same: i dont know how they knew about all i talked with my family by cellphone. The had information about my activities in the university that was dangerous said myself. So i had to talk with my postdoc chief and i said : i think the phd students are doing something very bad very bad because they know about my cellphones. He answered: i dont think so perhaps it is a bad understood. Twice times i said this to my chief he always gave me the same answer. If you want a proof there is a call phone i did to my Banorte bank for changing my credit card because i found the phd students talking about all i talked with my family in mexico. The story is longer but it is truth, phd students in the physics department did this to me one day heard two students fight about how they had to go back a lot money .. the professors guilty are alex lozanne morgan berg frank rijka alfred lee neliza brito ans student called bryant.

IF THE LAWS WERE ENFORCED TO PUT EMPLOYER'S IN JAIL AND FINE THEM FOR HIRING ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS, THEN THE ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS WOULD QUIT COMING HERE....ALSO GIVE A REWARD TO PEOPLE WHO CALLS IN AND REPORTS ILLEGALS WORKING IN FACTORYS ECT...

ILLEGALS NEED TO BE DEPORTED FOR THIS STUFF!!  Not put in jail, DEPORTED and if necessary their whole family, maybe then they'll catch on to LAWS are made for a reason and you need to obey or GO!!

IMPEACHMENT & JAIL!

If President Trump only knew of this... murder... just down the road from the Winter White House...  Hoping to impress upon Governor Ron DeSantis that the FDLE and FBI should "get on this". Murderers walking free because of incompetent Officers and wealthy backers.   Executive Summary:  Palm Beach County family seeks redress, fair justice, and relief after being denied U.S. and State of Florida Constitutional rights under color of law related to and concerning the homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER.  Specifically, in the face of overwhelming relevant, material, and competent evidence, to date all State and Local Authorities have refused to initiate a criminal investigation into and regarding the opiate caused death of NIA LEE ANKNER. Although the surviving family has provided competent and substantial evidence of a homicide; there has been no related criminal investigation initiated nor conducted by any authorized Florida law enforcement entity, being wholly contrary to and violative of Art. I, § 2, and Art. I, § 16(b) Fla. Const. (1998), and § 839.13, § 839.20, § 843.0855, and § 843.14, Fla. Stat.  Due to incompetence of Town of Palm Beach investigating Law Enforcement Officers at the crime scene, and the subsequent and continuing obstruction of justice by supervising Town of Palm Beach Officers; the Florida Department of Law Enforcement, (“FDLE”), Palm Beach Sheriff's Office (“PBSO”), Town of Palm Beach Police Department (“PBPD”), Florida State Attorney’s Office 15th Judicial District (“15th SAO”), and the Palm Beach County Medical Examiner’s Office (“PBME”) have all refused to conduct a homicide investigation, as required by Law.  NIA LEE ANKNER’s surviving family has information and evidence providing probable cause to charge and arrest one KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY for 1st Degree Capital Murder.   In August of 2017, KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY and other person’s yet unknown, in the County of Palm Beach, and against the statute, peace, and dignity of the State of Florida, did unlawfully from a premeditated design to effect the death of a human being, and caused the death of a human being, NIA LEE ANKNER, through the unlawful distribution of opium or any compound, derivative or preparation of opium and/or fentanyl, opium or any compound, derivative or perpetration of opium, and/or fentanyl, and which was the proximate cause of the death of NIA LEE ANKNER , did kill and murder, NIA LEE ANKNER, contrary to Florida Statue 782.04(1)(a)1, 782.04(1)(a)2, and 782.04(1)(a)3. (CAPITAL FELONY).  "Dear Governor Ron DeSantis,  I and my family pray you are well and happy; and, we thank God you are Florida’s 46th Chief Executive.  My name is Charles E. Ankner. I (and my family) seek your Office’s review of the information herein related to the homicide of my biological niece, Nia Lee Ankner (“Decedent”); with an end goal of a competent homicide investigation being performed by an authorized Florida criminal investigative entity outside of Palm Beach County.  With your being a former U.S. Navy JAG Officer, and my being a USAF Veteran and certified long experienced paralegal; I’ll strive to be accurate and brief in my presentation, and yet be comprehensive.  Quite frankly Governor, we pray the information herein will make your blood boil; and, motivate you to action.  In August of 2017, the Decedent had met a former coworker-acquaintance, one Kelly Anne McCauley, for a Saturday afternoon pool swim at another person’s residence near the Town of Palm Beach. Neither made it to the pool; and the Decedent was brain-dead from an opiate overdose within two-hours of meeting that day with McCauley. McCauley also delayed calling 911 for twenty-minutes while instead calling her newly estranged boyfriend. By the time McCauley did call 911, eighty-percent of the Decedent’s brain was dead.   Admittedly, the Decedent also had a blood alcohol level of 0.15 in her system at the time of her brain-death. The combination of an opiate supplied by McCauley and ethanol caused the Decedent to stop breathing in the presence of McCauley while she purposefully delayed summoning help. In fact, besides after a twenty-minute in calling 911; McCauley did nothing to render help to the Decedent (rescue-breathing, flag down other cars for help, going into the Office of the Condo parking lot where they were at). McCauley, beyond a reasonable doubt, after supplying a fatal illicit opiate to the Decedent actually and proximately caused her death; and McCauley also for twenty minutes stood-by and let the Decedent suffocate to death.   Kelly McCauley has a long criminal record in Palm Beach County, including for but not limited to: illicit controlled substance use and possession, illicit drug paraphernalia use and possession, solicitation of prostitution, felony armed robbery, felony battery, felony grand theft, and destroying, tampering with, and concealing evidence. In my review of her criminal record; McCauley has always pled-out and never served more than a few months in the Palm Beach County Jail.  Tragically, McCauley is an all too common Palm Beach County catch and release felon. Even more tragic; McCauley was arrested only four-months before murdering the Decedent by Palm Beach County Florida Highway Patrol, for illegal possession of Xanax; with the driver of the car she was in unconscious and the car against the center barrier of Interstate-95. McCauley has lost her driving privileges due to several DUIs.  The Decedent had no criminal nor arrest record.  The motivation for PBPD Officers to resist, “soft-peddle”, or obstruct any and all related criminal investigations is that instead of concentrating on McCauley related to the Decedent’s condition and ultimate death; the PBPD exclusively concentrated on collecting evidence against the Decedent for DUI. In other words, PBPD Detective Lawrence Mennetti and Sgt. Scott Duquette “screwed the pooch” by not processing the scene and detaining McCauley pursuant to Florida Statute. Thereafter, Detective Mennetti performed what believe to be a half-stepped sham investigation in the “incident” and concluded “…no crime was committed in our jurisdiction.”.  Just a draft. How am I doing?   https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/

Is lying breaking a law? If so, he should be UNDER the jail.

Its amazing what this country turned into! Just because the dems dont like my president that is doing a great job they refuse to give him anything. In my mind this is the worst case of treason ive ever seen dems should be in jail unreal! Keep up the good fight mr president and ty for all your dealing with to try to save our country!!

Jordan Ozzy DeLage, murder?? Talk about someone being triggered! You aren’t just a fool but a damn fool.   When you actually believe a president, former or current will ever see one second of jail, much less be executed, you really need to visit your proctologist so they can properly evaluate your level of brain damage.

Let's not forget our broken judicial system, criminals are getting away with murder and with a team of klepto serial killers. Can you believe some criminals go to jail for other criminals crimes and get released years later as planned.

Many States have a 2x - 3rd jail. It helps until someone gets out. It's an addiction and needs treated as such. But it takes like all addictions. The addict has to work hard at staying sober for life. It's a decision with prayers. Illegals need to stay out of America period. They should be tried for murder ..

Mark Hack did he bring HIS and his families businesses to the USA?  NO, they are still in China and other Asian countries!  But don't worry NONE of them are on the Tariffs list! Did Mexico agree to pay for the Wall?  Did Hillary go to jail? Did he sue those women who said he sexually assaulted them?  But trump followers don't care! They think they're making more money  , and money is all they care about!

Maybe if they would take these illigals that do this and execute them, maybe this stuff would stop, their not saposed to. Be hear to bigin with so !!!, but, he's probably in a jail getting free meals at the tax payers expence since we live in a country with BS laws enforced by idiots that beleive in the laws that are made to protect the rich and the criminals

Mr President, I have a proposal that I think might end the shutdown. Your a billionaire Mr. President. Why don't you put up the 5.6 billion or whatever it is and if it works like you say for 1 year. You get your money back. Provided you don't get impeached in which case you would probably lose everything you've got, and go to jail anyway can so no harm no foul. What do ya say. Can we get a deal😁?

My President sir, do for best, & go for best to save our life every life, Destroy criminal mafia from roots ,  first catch criminal mafia ,  send them in jail , give  them life sentence, They ruin our life every day, I speak every day any time , until they go in jail, They make any type of case whatever they want to , against any  person, Either they politician , media person, businessman or normal people,  when I comment on you sir , they make any name of account or hack accounr , & make or do any type of cooment. they hack any one's account either they president sir, or any one. sAVE our life SAVE everyone's life President sir. God Bless My President sir , & family give them strength, , make strong , powerful , happy  ,healthy, It's time tonalltogether , All politician , all media , All goverment, All public, All police , World , Once we together they can do nothing with us, It's time to speak openly Against crimnial mafia who suffered from them non sufferd people. Never surrender our life in front of criminal mafia , bit t them , kill them . GOD Bless My President sir , Sir Go for Big achivement , SAVE our life SAVE everyone's life , Because They have no community , They R danger for public , Enemy of people , Enemy of life. 🙏🙏👍👍

My President sir, do for best, & go for best to save our life every life, Destroy criminal mafia from roots ,  first catch criminal mafia ,  send them in jail , give  them life sentence, They ruin our life every day, I speak every day any time , until they go in jail, They make any type of case whatever they want to , against any  person, Either they politician , media person, businessman or normal people,  when I comment on you sir , they make any name of account or hack accounr , & make or do any type of cooment. they hack any one's account either they president sir, or any one. sAVE our life SAVE everyone's life President sir. God Bless My President sir , & family give them strength, , make strong , powerful , happy  ,healthy, It's time tonalltogether , All politician , all media , All goverment, All public, All police , World , Once we together they can do nothing with us, It's time to speak openly Against crimnial mafia who suffered from them non sufferd people. Never surrender our life in front of criminal mafia , bit t them , kill them . GOD Bless My President sir , Sir Go for Big achivement , SAVE our life SAVE everyone's life , Because They have no community , They R danger for public , Enemy of people , Enemy of life. 🙏🙏👍👍

My husband and I were in a terrible reck in 2013.An illegal immigrant almost killed me and my husband. He was 17 didn’t have a license was driving someone else’s car. Was going 80 in a 30 miles zone. Before he hit us he passed a car with a family that had 3 little kids in the car. That could had very well killed them Thank god he didn’t and my husband had to be cut out of the car. He was drunk on top of that. Didn’t spend one night in jail. My husband was I c u for 14 days had too have emergency surgery on his neck and back. This is a man that has never had a broken bone in his body or stitches either. Until that night he still isn’t the same till this day. So yes I’m all for the wall 💯percent. We need a president like Trump he is the one that can get the job done.👍🏻👏👊🇺🇸

My son was killed by an illegal Mexican immigrant who had already been deported once for DUI. He choose to drive drunk, and killed my son while turning onto a busy street. He had no driver’s license, no car insurance.  My son was just 20 years old, less than 2 months shy of his 21st birthday. He was killed instantly. The illegal immigrant was so intoxicated, he tried to urinate on the sheriff deputy’s car. While in jail, he got a Boca Raton lawyer who took us to court to dispute the charges. My family had to live through the awful experience of a trial and details of the accident. Justice did prevail and he was incarcerated. He remains in prison for the time being, but I am concerned if ICE will deport him again, or he will be let back in the community to live amongst us. BUILD THE DAMN WALL

One of sister's best friends was killed by an illegal immigrant.  There were 3 illegals in the car.  The driver never even slowed down at the stop sign on a side highway and was speeding.  He hit her while she was driving the speed limit of 65.  She was life watched but didn't survive long.  The 3 men weren't even injured.  They had no insurance and actually tried to hire an attorney to sue the husband of the woman he killed.  They got out of jail somehow and fled back to Mexico.  I always wonder how long it took them to cross back into the states and how many other crimes they've committed since then.

Our nation went downhill from the moment you took office.   Hawaii was an educated bilingual and literate kingdom before it was annexed and it probably would have joined the Commonwealth of the 🇬🇧.  California, Arizona, New Mexico, Utah, Texas, Oklahoma, Nevada, and Colorado were part of the Spanish empire and Mexico before our nation started a BS war just to take over land under manifest destiny.  This land was first settled by indigenous peoples, and your ancestors illegally came to this land, pillaged from the Native Americans if not killed them off through bloodshed and disease, only for you to prevent the INEVITABLE. The world is becoming smaller and technology is only making travel and multilingualism more common. You represent an obsolete America. You represent outdated practices. How can you lead the most innovative country in the world when you lack a single innovative bone in your body? You only got by in life because of your bombastic entitled attitude. You are unfit to lead this country and BELONG IN JAIL.   #AnyDemocrat2020

Our tax dollars are wasted anyway. Let's just take a chance and build the wall just maybe some people will use the front door and come legal or go to jail.

President Crook is the one going to jail!!! He is the ringleader of the the Trump Felons!!! The Real Don!!!! The Real Thug!!!

President Trump, I highly doubt you will see this. When is the government going to crack down on employers who hire illegal immigrants? My social security number was stolen in 2005. I have filed police reports and have reported to the FBI in regards to undocumented workers using my name and social. The government has zero interest in protecting our identities. I was told that much from the lazy POS’s who run identity theft.GOV. I just got a letter from the IRS today to verify my identity and it may now take up to 4-6 weeks more for my refund to be released when my return was accepted on January 29, 2019. I am so sick of Washington’s state liberal agenda. Someone who steals and the company who assists them should be prosecuted. I’m so sick of having to prove who I am every single time I deal with a government agency. How is this wall going to keep anyone safe if the Feds can not even put the hurt down on those who are killing, stealing and assisting? Should be mandatory that every employer use E-Verify. Theft is theft and those stealing and knowingly hire individuals with stolen American names and social security numbers should be locked in the same jail cell.

Putting you in jail where traitors belong is what Democrats want to do. Democrats know you did not win the presidency, Putin stole it so that you could be his puppet ..you dumb moron!

SO TIRED OF NANCY PELOSI,,, AND IS CHUCK SCHUMER HIDING,,,,, HAHAHAHA,, AND DICK DERBIN, JUST TO NAME A FEW WHO ARE OBSTRUCTING THE BARRIERS AT OUR SOUTHERN BORDERS............... SHAME ON THEM........... DON'T APPROVE ANYTHING THEY WANT UNTIL THE WALL.......... IN FACT,,,,, I AGREE WITH SOME OF YOUR REPUBLICANS,, IT IS TIME ... TO JUST DO IT,, LIKE NIKE SAYS.. AND BUILD THAT WALL AND CLAIM A STATE OF EMERGENCY,,,,, WE ALREADY SEE A TOTAL OF THREE CARAVANS COMING THROUGH............... AND WE ARE WEARY AND TIRED AND DON'T WANT A CIVIL WAR AT THE BASE OF OUR SOUTHERN BORDER IF MEXICO DOES NOT WORK WITH US THIS TIME,, THEY ALREADY LEFT THEM WALK RIGHT IN AT THE OTHER SIDE OF THEIR COUNTRY.... SO WHAT DOES THAT TELL YOU.. AND WHO PAID MEXICO TO DO THAT..... THAT SEEMS PROOF ENOUGH TO ME THAT MEXICO WILL LET THEM JUST INVADE OUR SOUTHERN BORDERS THIS TIME....................... IS THERE A WAY TO ARREST AND JAIL PEOPLE IN OUR GOVERNMENT LIKE NANCY, CHUCK, DICK, ETC.. FROM... OBSTRUCTING WHATEVER YOU NEED TO DO..................

Same with americans how many terrorists  in jail they are all criminals to

Sarah Elizabeth might be going to Facebook jail today lol

Stand STRONG Mr. President, tell Nancy to take down the fence or cement wall surrounding the palace she resides in and see how she gets a lot of people she and Hillary would call them deplorable and irredeemables and see if she’s afraid or is willing to let them stay at her house and have them over for tea and krimpets!!! Build this country’s WALL Nancy for our protection.  If you don’t like living in The United States of America then take yourself and crying chuckle Schumer and go fly a commercial plane and get the HELL out of my country.  As far as I go, I believe you are the new communism and your both TRAITORS!!.  Actually, you both should both be in JAIL!!!

Stephen King they do it’s called jail lots of fencing and Wall!!! 😆

Such a very low, dirtball approach to getting what you want, Comrade Cry-baby! As always, you suck. Go directly to jail!

TRUMP IN JAIL! Thats how US will be safer!!

That's the logic you're all using aye? Big wall, more guards, safe America. Go live in a jail and see what it does to stop illegal drugs?

The Democratic Party  Created The KKK.  Klan violence worked to suppress black voting, and campaign seasons were deadly. More than 2,000 people were killed, wounded, or otherwise injured in Louisiana within a few weeks prior to the Presidential election of November 1868. Although St. Landry Parish had a registered Republican majority of 1,071, after the murders, no Republicans voted in the fall elections. White Democrats cast the full vote of the parish for President Grant's opponent. The KKK killed and wounded more than 200 black Republicans, hunting and chasing them through the woods. Thirteen captives were taken from jail and shot; a half-buried pile of 25 bodies was found in the woods. The KKK made people vote Democratic and gave them certificates of the fact.[67]

The only crime in this country is Donald Trump and the idiots who voted for him murder 101 and accessory to murder and you should be held accountable for the murders of the people in this country  Impeachment time.  jail time. and execution time...

The same people telling you no to $5.5 billion, are the same people who cant account for $21 TRILLION from 1998-2015. So therefore we, the American people are forced to pay a current debt of $21.9 TRILLION, thanks to their carelessness.  But they claim $5.5 billion for more border security is a waste of tax payers dollars? Someone please explain how these people are not in jail...

The topography of the land does not allow for a a complete wall. I believe the people in charge of protecting the border should be the ones to suggest where reenforcement of the barriers should take place. Not against a barrier. Just against a pathological lying narcissistic immoral pos who's only agenda is what will benifit him.  Take a couple of steps back and ask why so many of the people that surrounded his campaign are either in jail or under indictment. If you say deep state then you have no hope.

There are many people who should have been raided and in jail and or executed. What happened to lock her up.... what happened to 10 years of Donald John Trump knowing how to fire people and get a job done?  The law is really lawyers and judges in the U.S., and put there on purpose in this wicked system.  The purpose to over through the country and wealth...... if your guilty, think about it... your guilty.   Either one is right or wrong, further the laws of this land are geared towards HARMING GOOD, POOR, AND MIDDLE CLASS FOLKS.  Any real country free of CORRUPTION would have what's called a criminal punishment system and a victim justice system.   We have a criminal justice system that's why criminals get away with everything the justice is geared towards the wicked!! open your goddamn eyes and ears.  PS, the love of money is the root of all evil. DO NOT SELL YOUR SOUL FOR A PAYCHECK.

This is HORRIBLE that our President would share something like this. Smh from a drunk driving accident? Come on now...this is SO DIRTY! That white kid in TX that killed a whole family didnt even get any jail time because of his privilege. But u wanna use this as a platform for billions of dollars for a wall??? GTFOH!

Tif Duff Trump fixed so many problems already, INCLUDING the jail situation, as you so much wanted him to do. Seriously, can you give the man some time to do the best job as president than anyone else has ever done? He's not a communist, so you aren't going to get all that free stuff you want. Get a job.

Timothy Bourke you mean Fox News.  The No real news shitbags. Build your own jail cell wall trump. America will survive your trump Mafia

Tony Connelly I agree with you. Between medical issues, underinsured/uninsured people not being able to afford medication and medial attention they need and gun violence due to untreated mental illness we have a real crisis.   If we want to stop most illegal immigration we just need to start putting the people who hire them in jail. it doesn't even have to be long, it could be as short as 30 days. however this would put a concrete consequences behind hiring an illegal.

Tony Perez uh, yeah sure AFTER THE CLINTONS, OBAMAS AND THE REST OF THE CORRUPT leftists are put in jail.  We'll wait.  🤔  No, eh?  Didn't think so.  😘

Travis Adams  you going back to Facebook jail lol

Uh you also promised us Killary would go to jail and that has not happened either. I am beginning to wonder just who did I vote for !

Walls keep prisoners in jail wall can keep asshole out

What a goof....hope he goes to jail!

While Mr. Fibbs says that the furlough could be called a "strike"... this is the same person that has cheated workers/contractors out of their money all of his life.... and you expect him to care how you pay your bills and feed your family or how you get services from the government...WAKE UP!... the alarm has been sounding for two years and there are those act as though it has not been heard.... THIS RUSSIAN LACKY thinks being called a MF is a disgrace.... no, being a draft dodging, Trump U scammer, tax cheating, charity cheating, illegal immigrant hiring, P@#$y grabbing, name calling of AMERICAN football players SOB's, wife cheater(x3-that we know of),prostitute paying, daily liar, family separating, children caging and a disgrace and embarrassment to Americans is far worse than a MF... that would might even be too good for him. His PUBLIC conduct would get our children expelled from school for ever... If our great county of America has to suffer over ego and stupidity, no one in Congress or the Executive branch should get a paycheck-seems a lot of them are or could end up on jail anyway(they will be provided for-now that is funny in a sad way).........MF definition.. a despicable or very unpleasant person or thing., a person or thing of a specified kind... REPUBLICANS, Democrats and Independents AND THERE ARE MANY GOOD REPUBLICANS(MANY unfortunately MISLEAD)...STAND UP AND BE COUNTED...rant over -nough said for the "moment".FLOOD YOUR CONGRESSMAN'S OFFICE WITH CALLS=load up their email.... SPEAK OUT! Americans should not have to pay for his stupidity let alone his dumb ass wall....he is a sniveling twitt..just think about who is representing you...

Who are the legal immigrants who are in jail in the USA???

Will you prosecute the radical islamic terrorist who tried to blow you up to the fullest extent, or do you think he has a spare get out of jail free card from Obummer's fake presidency..

Wrong, Comrade Bullshit! No one believes your lyin' cheatin' mouth. Go directly to jail.

Yanira Blanco what have any of the four people you mentioned done to deserve prison time? The last time I checked a bunch of Trumps people were going to prison including his personal lawyer, campaign manager and national security advisor. Trump is under 17 investigations. But yes, lets put the elderly billionaire George Soros in jail- who by the way is a super generous billionaire that actually gives his money to charity unlike Trump who ran a fraudulent foundation.  What is your obsession with Soros anyway? I think you might be watching too much right wing propaganda.

Yep, want to make sure it's weak enough so Russia can continue to penetrate it long after you're in jail.

You are a SMELLY FUCKING TURD. I hope you rot in jail and never see the light of day. POS

You are a liar and a fraud.  Your administration is an American disgrace and a global embarrassment.  Go to jail soon. 👋🏻😎 #MAGA

You are a national disgrace and a global embarrassment.  You are also a fraud and a pathological liar.  Do go to jail soon. 👋🇺🇸 #MAGA

You are going to jail 🎉🎉🎉

You should throw these traitorous Democrats in jail!

You're going to jail going directly to jail do not pass go do not collect $200

You're going to jail going directly to jail do not pass go do not collect $200

Your going to have a wall pretty soon----in jail

campaign promises broken first 2 years 1. didn't repeal and replace obamacare 2. mexico isn't paying for his wall 3. stock market reaching new lows everyday 4. Hillary still not in jail 5. didn't release his taxes 6. only swamp that's draining is his own administration 7. hasn't added any jobs promised 8. No new ethics reforms to reduce the corrupting influence of special interests 9. making collage more affordable  10. hasnt Provided matching contributions for low-income families to the dependent care savings account 11. Allow Americans to deduct child care and elder care from their taxes 12. Reduce the number of tax brackets from seven to three, and likewise greatly simplify tax forms 13. Propose and pass tax simplification bill in which the largest tax reductions are for the middle class 14. Let states manage Medicaid funds 15. Leverage public-private partnerships and private investments through tax incentives to spur $1 trillion in infrastructure  16. Direct the secretary of the treasury to label China a currency manipulator 17. Impose a five-year ban on White House and congressional officials becoming lobbyists after they leave government service 18. my coal miner buddies are still broke

dont  worry  Mr.  President  we  are  behind  you  100%,  keep  it  up,  the  only  thing  we  would  like  to  see  is  them  evil  ppl,  the  weeds,  go  to  jail  for  a  change,  we  are  waiting.

⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️

⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️

⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️

⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️

A sick murderer killed his daughter , you cant quantify an event that happens due to the disgusting actuons of one person to a type of people . Its ignorant and just as wrong and disgusting as saying  When a white Male from Idaho goes to Irag and kills innocent children hes an American.

Adrianna Anders how about the word leftist- u will find rapist impeached clinton, pedophile jailed anthony wiener, kkk robert byrd, mao, lenin, stalin, murderer ted kennedy, groper cory booker, wife beater keith ellison, kkk governor northam, castro, maduro, margaret sanger....that's what i see when i look up leftist...i dont feel safe

I bet you if you look hard enough, you could find a murderer, who was in the military years ago and save the life of another Soldier!

I knew somebody who was killed by an illegal immigrant too. The murderer was from Canada!!! We need a wall for our northern borders too! Keep Canadians out! Build that Wall build that Wall build that Wall!

Jesse McMurray  First, you don’t leave you door open so anyone can get into your house. Second, if someone knocks on your door, you have to screen him first.  If you have your door open, then anyone, including murderer, and thieves will live in your home.

Next time an illegal kills a US Citizen I propose that Pelosi and Schumer be charged along with the murderer. Time them two anti American domdsic terrorist learn the consequences of their stupidity

Should we deport all white people to Europe then?  Almost every single mass murderer is White.  Huh?

So I’m guessing it’s ok if the murderer was from America? Well that’s who is committing the majority of murders here. Americans.

What, you're status as an angel depends on the race of your murderer?

Where was the illegal murderer from?  What country?  You know we grow our own criminals in this country.  We’re any of the kids killed inn school shootings?  I believe all of the shooters were born and raised in the United States.

how many legal citizens are murderer?

its irrelevant whether the murderer was an illegal immigrant or not..

#masege to p.tramp A message of distress from the people of Basra province to the President of the United States of America. Trump respectable.  We are the people of Basra province. We ask you to rescue our province of Basra from the Militias  Gangs who have been stealing the oil of Basrah since 2003 and to this day, they are sending it to Iran and to the terrorist organizations that fund them with weapons. We have been carrying out large demonstrations against these gangs, but they respond to us with repression, torture, murder and assassination. We lack the simplest means of living, such as water and electricity. We demand reforms and appointments for the unemployed youth, many of them graduates and holders of higher diplomas, but the armed groups monopolize appointments for themselves and their parties and gangs. They are killing all those who speak a word and stand against them and they take the presidential palaces in the province of Basra, a place known to the Iraqis, and in the recent demonstrations have fired live bullets at the demonstrators and killed many innocent young people who claim their right, and the assassination of civilian activists In front of their homes and in the streets and markets, We are asking your presence to intervene quickly to rescue us from these dirty armed gangs. We know that the US military has entered Iraq and we welcome this very welcome because we believe that the US military has the ability to rescue Basra, Iraq and Iraqis from these gangs. We hope you will receive this message and respond. Because you are the only hope now for all Iraqis. Thank you Mr. Trump. Youth of Basrah Governorate...........

#رسالة استغاثة من اهالي البصرة الى رئيس الولايات المتحدة الامريكية ترامب...الترجمة في الاسفل... A message of distress from the people of Basra province to the President of the United States of America. Trump respectable.  We are the people of Basra province. We ask you to rescue our province of Basra from the Militias  Gangs who have been stealing the oil of Basrah since 2003 and to this day, they are sending it to Iran and to the terrorist organizations that fund them with weapons. We have been carrying out large demonstrations against these gangs, but they respond to us with repression, torture, murder and assassination. We lack the simplest means of living, such as water and electricity. We demand reforms and appointments for the unemployed youth, many of them graduates and holders of higher diplomas, but the armed groups monopolize appointments for themselves and their parties and gangs. They are killing all those who speak a word and stand against them and they take the presidential palaces in the province of Basra, a place known to the Iraqis, and in the recent demonstrations have fired live bullets at the demonstrators and killed many innocent young people who claim their right, and the assassination of civilian activists In front of their homes and in the streets and markets, We are asking your presence to intervene quickly to rescue us from these dirty armed gangs. We know that the US military has entered Iraq and we welcome this very welcome because we believe that the US military has the ability to rescue Basra, Iraq and Iraqis from these gangs. We hope you will receive this message and respond. Because you are the only hope now for all Iraqis. Thank you Mr. Trump. Youth of Basrah Governorate...........  مترجم الى العربية. رسالة استغاثة من اهالي محافظة البصرة الى رئيس الولايات المتحدة الامريكية ترامب المحترم. نحن ابناء محافظة البصرة نطالبك بأنقاذ محافظتنا البصرة من العصابات المسلحة الذين يسرقون نفط البصرة منذ سنة 2003 والى يومنا هذا ويريسلونه الى ايران والى الجهات الارهابية التي تمولهم بالاسلحة. لقد قمنا بالتظاهرات الكبيرة ضد هذه العصابات ولكن كان القمع والتعذيب والقتل والاغتيالات هو الرد علينا, نحن تفتقد الى ابسط وسائل العيش مثل الماء والكهرباء, نحن نطالب بالاصلاح والتعيينات للشباب العاطل عن العمل وكثير منهم الخريجين واصحاب الشهادات العليا ولكن المجاميع المسلحة يحتكرون التعيينات لصالحهم ولصالح احزابهم وعصاباتهم, انهم يقومون بقتل كل من يتفوه بكلمة ويقف ضدهم وانهم يتخذون من القصور الرئاسية الموجودة في محافظة البصرة مقراً لهم وهو مكان معروف لدى العراقيين, وفي التظاهرات الاخيرة قاموا بأطلاق الرصاص الحي على المتظاهرين وقتلوا الكثير من الشباب العزل الابرياء الذين يطالبون بحقهم, وقاموا بأغتيال الناشطين المدنيين امام بيوتهم وفي الشوارع والاسواق, فنرجوا من حضرتك يا ايها الرئيس التدخل السريع لانقاذنا من هذه العصابات المسلحة القذرة, نحن لدينا علم بان الجيش الامريكي قد دخل الى العراق ونحن نرحب بذلك كل الترحيب لاننا نعتقد بأن الجيش الامريكي له القدرة على انقاذ البصرة والعراق والعراقيين من هذه العصابات الفاسدة, نأمل ان تصلك هذه الرسالة وتستجيب لنا لانك انت الامل الوحيد الان لكل العراقيين. شكراً سيادة الرئيس. شباب محافظة البصرة.  من بريد الصفحة كما وردت

...more murder committed by our own legal citizens.  Facts first.

A BITTER WARNING TO THE AMERICAN MEDIA You are accomplices in murder if something ever happens to our President   WESTERN EUROPE AfD leader blames media smear campaign for ‘assassination attempt’ on state chairman  https://voiceofeurope.com/2019/01/afd-leader-blames-media-smear-campaign-for-assassination-attempt-on-state-chairman/?fbclid=IwAR1dZEvQ5_A_bBaxvKRNzyaH6N84llcUIFYEPXzwQBuDPLIdjnt1gZCtMAU#.XDUAo2ViSGd.facebook

According to Texas Department of Public Safety (DPS), 251,000 criminal aliens have been booked into local Texas jails between June 1, 2011 and April 30, 2018, according to DHS status indicators. These criminal aliens were charged with MORE THAN 663,000 criminal offenses.  Just in TEXAS ALONE:  > 1,351 homicides;  > 7,156 sexual assaults;  > 9,938 weapons charges;  > 79,049 assaults;  > 18,685 burglaries;  > 79,900 drug charges;  > 815 kidnappings;  > 44,882 thefts;  > 4,292 robberies  https://www.justice.gov/opa/pr/departments-justice-and-homeland-security-release-quarterly-alien-incarceration-report  Anyone who opposes the wall is giving warrant and sanction to mass murder, rape, violent crime and human trafficking - and there is just no way for them to spin themselves out of it.

Agree...build the damn wall.  One murder from an illegal is one too many.  🇺🇸

An illegal alien (Honduran) kicked-in the door to my house and tried to murder my then-16 yr old son.  https://youtu.be/6h2qwAAge4c  A few years prior to that, an intoxicated illegal alien crashed into me, totaling my vehicle and damaging my left hand (which has never healed correctly).  Build the wall!

An illegal alien from Mexico tried to murder me. Build the wall!!!!!! #MAGA #KAG

And a white man in Colorado murder his pregnant wife a kid.

And young white American citizens cause a thousand times more destruction. Besides, there was no intention in your brothers death, it was an accident. I am sorry for your loss, but blanket statements that equate an isolated incident to mass murder is ludicrous. Immigrants are not killing us, our own citizens are.

Ann de Roo-Daly sorry smart isnt your strong point. But here, only you,  wendy whats-her-face, and the legendary henk  are haters that need attention.  Since it's necessary to point it out to you. Go talk to that murder suspect hillary

Another murder on the hands of the democrats

Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher... just saying

As we protect our country from people entering illegally,could we also raise the danger level of Mexico?   Our son was murdered there on vacation 3 months  ago.  The murder statistics are outrageous.   Statistics are higher each year.  There were 30,000 murders there in 2017 and 17,000 in US.  Mexico is 1/3 the size of US.   We need to investigate murders of our citizens in Mexico!

Ashton Thompson Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Aurora, Parkland, Newtown, Charleston, Las Vegas, Columbine, Pittsburgh Synagogue, Sutherland, Aurora, etc etc etc etc etc etc et etc etc etc etc etc etc etc etc etc etc etc etc etc etc etc etc incidents of mass murder...  THiS👆🏽is the ‘National Emergency’...not the border❌

Becky Geyer Price , who did he murder? David committed adultry and murdered her husband, who was David's loyal servant, yet God still used him for his own purpose.

Bob Cunha name a wall that has worked?  Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Build the wall one murder from illegals is to many

Build the wall! ALSO institute legislation for immediate death penalty for anyone attempting murder on a police officer! I am sick of seeing the death of our LEOs at the hands of criminals! PLEASE, please put this at the top of your list POTUS.

Build the wall! We just had an illegal immigrant murder 4 innocent people in our area. Could have been prevented.

CM Garner I get it, you're a Russian bots, paid to post propaganda. You even have lovely pictures of that russian POS murder  Putin on your Facebook page.  Facebook has confirmed that all those bogus/fake  news pages about Hillary  during the election were in fact fake,  paid for by the Russians.  Drop dead you commie bastard.

Chenier--This is just one case out of thousands every year. The liberal democrat media refuses to report on them, because it doesn't help their agenda for open border's. The point is, that these illegal's weren't suppose to be here & each case would have been one "less case" of a family losing a loved one to murder, or a killing by a drunk driving illegal.

Chris Holman seriously?? Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Chuck Martin  Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Daniel Antonio Thomas  well how does that stand for crime committed by Your own people? Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Dear President Donald J. Trump, You do realize that all of these Muslims in America will eventually try to murder us .. because their Quran instructs them to do exactly that?

Demand your da to prosecute governor mayor even senators who allowed the murder to be here there are laws against aiding and abetting also go after aclu

Demitris Petrides First off, there's a vast difference between "need" and "want".   Second, at this point we're pretty much just watching a spoiled brat throwing a temper tantrum because he can't have his way, and he's screaming bloody murder about it because he knows his reputation is not only in the crapper, but is on it's last swirl before the drain.  Sure, we all know politicians are liars, but Trump was supposed to be the antithesis of "politician", and now here we are with the greatest pathological liar in human record sitting in the White House. :-/  I mean honestly, do YOU see Mexico paying for the wall?

Erin Salgado seriously? Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher.

Estefania Torres Restrepo California  LARGEST INSANE ASYLUM IN THE WORLD  Interesting that the LA Times did this. All the others are staying away from it. Whether you are a Democrat or Republican, this should be of great interest to you!  Just One State - be sure and read the last part...  try for 3 times.  This is only one State... If this doesn't open your eyes, nothing will!  From the LA. Times:  1. 40% of all workers in LA County (10.2 million people) are working for cash; and not paying taxes. This is because they are predominantly illegal immigrants, working without a green card. (Donald Trump was right)  2. 95 %of warrants for murder in Los Angeles are for illegal aliens.  3. 75% of people on the most wanted list in Los Angeles are illegal aliens.  4. Over 2/3 of all births in Los Angeles County are to illegal alien Mexicans on Medi-Cal, whose births were paid for by taxpayers.  5. Nearly 35% of all inmates in California detention centers are Mexican nationals; they are here illegally.  6. Over 300,000 illegal aliens in Los Angeles County are living in garages.  7. The FBI reports half of all gang members in Los Angeles are most likely illegal aliens from south of the border.  8 Nearly 60% of all occupants of HUD properties are illegal.  9. 21 radio stations in LA are Spanish-speaking.  10. In LA County, 5.1 million people speak English; 3.9 million, speak Spanish. (There are 10.2 million people, in LA County.  (All 10 of the above facts were published in the Los Angeles Times)  Less than 2% of illegal aliens are picking our crops, but 29% are on welfare.  Over 70% of the United States' annual population growth, ( and over 90% of California, Florida, and New York), results from immigration.  Also, 29% of inmates in federal prisons are illegal aliens.  We are fools for letting this continue.  HOW CAN YOU HELP?  Send copies of this letter, to at least two other people.  To 100, would be even better.

Every Single Democrat has Walls around their homes!! Along with Security with guns!! So they don’t live in the neighborhoods across our Country and they have Walls and Body Guards Many!! If they don’t believe Walls Works their houses wouldn’t just have Big Walls but unbelievable Security!! Also important information is their family is protected by their security and Walls! The Americans don’t Matter to Anyone of Them!! They have Their own healthcare not what every American has and can’t afford Medications ect.. Our American children Must Pay for Colleges but illegals don’t, They aren’t held responsible for Crimes under hold and release. American People under Drunk Driving Laws are jailed if you kill someone under the influence ( it’s Murder by Our Laws) Prison People!!!

FB is censoring this:  Build the wall.  If it can stop 1 rape tree, stop 1 child from getting raped or trafficked, stop 1 murder, stop 1 terrorist from entering and spreading extremism like a disease, or stop 1 load of heroin from entering our county and destroying 1 life, etc. It's worth the price of the wall.  YOU CAN'T PUT PRICE TAGS ON PEOPLES LIVES CITIZEN OR NOT!

Flint Michigan has poisonous water     White American terrorists kill far more Americans than illegal immigrants.        Hell,  you alone commit more crimes than illegal immigrants      Using this one murder as a ploy to complete a campaign promise is disgusting

Florence Tedesco Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Four more Angel Families———20 year old ILLEGAL ALIEN , Martinez Guzman, was just arrested in Carson City for the murder of 4 elderly Reno and Gardernerville Nevada residents last week. This POS is suspected of murdering a beloved 80 year old couple who were prominent members of our community. He also murdered two single elderly women.......each living alone. What kind of monster preys on the most vulnerable in our society? ANSWER: AN EXTREMELY DANGEROUS ONE. These murders are further proof that there is a real danger having unvetted illegals in our communities. Those who insist upon open orders and sanctuary cities ....appear to have more blood on their hands this week.    BUILD THE WALL NOW.....Before any more innocent lives are taken.

God Bless all of you! I face losing my youngest daughter to disease, not murder, but if anyone can help me understand how to deal with the grief and broken heart, I would greatly appreciate it. And I feel the pain you are all suffering! Thank you and God Bless you!

Good but don't compromise and let the Democrats keep all those in who are already here.  Start w/ deporting all illegals who have committed rape, murder, theft.....  And stop the freebies!  If they don't get everything for free, you'll eliminate a lot of the illegal crossings.

Hold pelosi and chuck schumer personally responsible for her murder and tell America who helped end your beautiful daughters young life

How many illegal immigrants committed mass murder or even murder as compared to home grown American men?  Let’s start by throwing you out!

How many illegal immigrants committed mass murder or even murder as compared to home grown American men?  Let’s start by throwing you out!

How many legal people kill people everyday. We have a murder problem not an immigration problem

I agree Build The WALL send gun choppers down to patrol our Border and warning shots to stay away from our Borders. Call up their President and Mexican President and start charging fines. Change the Tampered Language Obama , Clinton’s, Pelosi, Schumer changed to make it open Border to allow Mexican, Middle-Easterners and Central Americans Ect. All to enter the U.S.A. Stop allowing so many in , or to come here at all Crime is rampant ! Rape then murder, it’s appalling! We are only one Country get them out of our Government they are tearing our Country to pieces. Be more like Poland . No  strangers are allowed to mass invade and come in on their families and citizens to do them harm by diseases, rape, murder, illegally/ or other wise unvetted. Traitors speaking against us the American people we will not give up our guns to protect ourselves with, we will not submit to or obey an ideology that goes against our Christian Beliefs they should be deported out our Country . No to Sharia Law it is incompatible with the Constitution of the U.S.A. Mc Carran-Walters Act 1952. Thomas Jefferson V. Muslim Pirates.1800s.

I agree Build The WALL send gun choppers down to patrol our Border and warning shots to stay away from our Borders. Call up their President and Mexican President and start charging fines. Change the Tampered Language Obama , Clinton’s, Pelosi, Schumer changed to make it open Border to allow Mexican, Middle-Easterners and Central Americans Ect. All to enter the U.S.A. Stop allowing so many in , or to come here at all Crime is rampant ! Rape then murder, it’s appalling! We are only one Country get them out of our Government they are tearing our Country to pieces. Be more like Poland . No  strangers are allowed to mass invade and come in on their families and citizens to do them harm by diseases, rape, murder, illegally/ or other wise unvetted. Traitors speaking against us the American people we will not give up our guns to protect ourselves with, we will not submit to or obey an ideology that goes against our Christian Beliefs they should be deported out our Country . No to Sharia Law it is incompatible with the Constitution of the U.S.A. Mc Carran-Walters Act 1952. Thomas Jefferson V. Muslim Pirates.1800s.

I guess it means nothing to you that when an illegal commits a murder in this country.......YES that is his focus and it should be.............

I have a friend whose grandson was just struck while riding his bike by an illegal driver who was drunk.  He survived, but has broken bones.  He is young, and most probably will have problems for the rest of his life. I lost my sissy to murder in 2009. The only thing that would have made the grief more unbearable, would be if she had been murdered by someone who wasn't even suppose to be in the country!  They are not sending their finest to America, and there are terrorists coming over that border too!  WE NEED TO BE SECURE!

I illegal murder to many ,keep Americans safe from ppl that aren't supposed to be here.

I live in Southern California a little west of Palm Springs and I say any City or State that becomes a Sanctuary City or Sanctuary State, thereby not enforcing Immigration Law, now can NOT enforce ANY Law. No one can be arrested for rape, robbery, assault, murder, etc., because that would be picking and choosing which Laws to enforce and which Laws to not enforce. The Employers who hire illegals, the Judges, Congressmen, Prosecutors, Mayors, Governors, and Church-Sanctuary People of those cities and states should be held accountable and arrested as accomplices for aiding and abetting illegals, and endangering the lives of United States Citizens. Yes, it IS that simple.

If President Trump only knew of this... murder... just down the road from the Winter White House...  Hoping to impress upon Governor Ron DeSantis that the FDLE and FBI should "get on this". Murderers walking free because of incompetent Officers and wealthy backers.   Executive Summary:  Palm Beach County family seeks redress, fair justice, and relief after being denied U.S. and State of Florida Constitutional rights under color of law related to and concerning the homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER.  Specifically, in the face of overwhelming relevant, material, and competent evidence, to date all State and Local Authorities have refused to initiate a criminal investigation into and regarding the opiate caused death of NIA LEE ANKNER. Although the surviving family has provided competent and substantial evidence of a homicide; there has been no related criminal investigation initiated nor conducted by any authorized Florida law enforcement entity, being wholly contrary to and violative of Art. I, § 2, and Art. I, § 16(b) Fla. Const. (1998), and § 839.13, § 839.20, § 843.0855, and § 843.14, Fla. Stat.  Due to incompetence of Town of Palm Beach investigating Law Enforcement Officers at the crime scene, and the subsequent and continuing obstruction of justice by supervising Town of Palm Beach Officers; the Florida Department of Law Enforcement, (“FDLE”), Palm Beach Sheriff's Office (“PBSO”), Town of Palm Beach Police Department (“PBPD”), Florida State Attorney’s Office 15th Judicial District (“15th SAO”), and the Palm Beach County Medical Examiner’s Office (“PBME”) have all refused to conduct a homicide investigation, as required by Law.  NIA LEE ANKNER’s surviving family has information and evidence providing probable cause to charge and arrest one KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY for 1st Degree Capital Murder.   In August of 2017, KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY and other person’s yet unknown, in the County of Palm Beach, and against the statute, peace, and dignity of the State of Florida, did unlawfully from a premeditated design to effect the death of a human being, and caused the death of a human being, NIA LEE ANKNER, through the unlawful distribution of opium or any compound, derivative or preparation of opium and/or fentanyl, opium or any compound, derivative or perpetration of opium, and/or fentanyl, and which was the proximate cause of the death of NIA LEE ANKNER , did kill and murder, NIA LEE ANKNER, contrary to Florida Statue 782.04(1)(a)1, 782.04(1)(a)2, and 782.04(1)(a)3. (CAPITAL FELONY).  "Dear Governor Ron DeSantis,  I and my family pray you are well and happy; and, we thank God you are Florida’s 46th Chief Executive.  My name is Charles E. Ankner. I (and my family) seek your Office’s review of the information herein related to the homicide of my biological niece, Nia Lee Ankner (“Decedent”); with an end goal of a competent homicide investigation being performed by an authorized Florida criminal investigative entity outside of Palm Beach County.  With your being a former U.S. Navy JAG Officer, and my being a USAF Veteran and certified long experienced paralegal; I’ll strive to be accurate and brief in my presentation, and yet be comprehensive.  Quite frankly Governor, we pray the information herein will make your blood boil; and, motivate you to action.  In August of 2017, the Decedent had met a former coworker-acquaintance, one Kelly Anne McCauley, for a Saturday afternoon pool swim at another person’s residence near the Town of Palm Beach. Neither made it to the pool; and the Decedent was brain-dead from an opiate overdose within two-hours of meeting that day with McCauley. McCauley also delayed calling 911 for twenty-minutes while instead calling her newly estranged boyfriend. By the time McCauley did call 911, eighty-percent of the Decedent’s brain was dead.   Admittedly, the Decedent also had a blood alcohol level of 0.15 in her system at the time of her brain-death. The combination of an opiate supplied by McCauley and ethanol caused the Decedent to stop breathing in the presence of McCauley while she purposefully delayed summoning help. In fact, besides after a twenty-minute in calling 911; McCauley did nothing to render help to the Decedent (rescue-breathing, flag down other cars for help, going into the Office of the Condo parking lot where they were at). McCauley, beyond a reasonable doubt, after supplying a fatal illicit opiate to the Decedent actually and proximately caused her death; and McCauley also for twenty minutes stood-by and let the Decedent suffocate to death.   Kelly McCauley has a long criminal record in Palm Beach County, including for but not limited to: illicit controlled substance use and possession, illicit drug paraphernalia use and possession, solicitation of prostitution, felony armed robbery, felony battery, felony grand theft, and destroying, tampering with, and concealing evidence. In my review of her criminal record; McCauley has always pled-out and never served more than a few months in the Palm Beach County Jail.  Tragically, McCauley is an all too common Palm Beach County catch and release felon. Even more tragic; McCauley was arrested only four-months before murdering the Decedent by Palm Beach County Florida Highway Patrol, for illegal possession of Xanax; with the driver of the car she was in unconscious and the car against the center barrier of Interstate-95. McCauley has lost her driving privileges due to several DUIs.  The Decedent had no criminal nor arrest record.  The motivation for PBPD Officers to resist, “soft-peddle”, or obstruct any and all related criminal investigations is that instead of concentrating on McCauley related to the Decedent’s condition and ultimate death; the PBPD exclusively concentrated on collecting evidence against the Decedent for DUI. In other words, PBPD Detective Lawrence Mennetti and Sgt. Scott Duquette “screwed the pooch” by not processing the scene and detaining McCauley pursuant to Florida Statute. Thereafter, Detective Mennetti performed what believe to be a half-stepped sham investigation in the “incident” and concluded “…no crime was committed in our jurisdiction.”.  Just a draft. How am I doing?   https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/

If President Trump only knew of this... murder... just down the road from the Winter White House...  Hoping to impress upon Governor Ron DeSantis that the FDLE and FBI should "get on this". Murderers walking free because of incompetent Officers and wealthy backers.   Executive Summary:  Palm Beach County family seeks redress, fair justice, and relief after being denied U.S. and State of Florida Constitutional rights under color of law related to and concerning the homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER.  Specifically, in the face of overwhelming relevant, material, and competent evidence, to date all State and Local Authorities have refused to initiate a criminal investigation into and regarding the opiate caused death of NIA LEE ANKNER. Although the surviving family has provided competent and substantial evidence of a homicide; there has been no related criminal investigation initiated nor conducted by any authorized Florida law enforcement entity, being wholly contrary to and violative of Art. I, § 2, and Art. I, § 16(b) Fla. Const. (1998), and § 839.13, § 839.20, § 843.0855, and § 843.14, Fla. Stat.  Due to incompetence of Town of Palm Beach investigating Law Enforcement Officers at the crime scene, and the subsequent and continuing obstruction of justice by supervising Town of Palm Beach Officers; the Florida Department of Law Enforcement, (“FDLE”), Palm Beach Sheriff's Office (“PBSO”), Town of Palm Beach Police Department (“PBPD”), Florida State Attorney’s Office 15th Judicial District (“15th SAO”), and the Palm Beach County Medical Examiner’s Office (“PBME”) have all refused to conduct a homicide investigation, as required by Law.  NIA LEE ANKNER’s surviving family has information and evidence providing probable cause to charge and arrest one KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY for 1st Degree Capital Murder.   In August of 2017, KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY and other person’s yet unknown, in the County of Palm Beach, and against the statute, peace, and dignity of the State of Florida, did unlawfully from a premeditated design to effect the death of a human being, and caused the death of a human being, NIA LEE ANKNER, through the unlawful distribution of opium or any compound, derivative or preparation of opium and/or fentanyl, opium or any compound, derivative or perpetration of opium, and/or fentanyl, and which was the proximate cause of the death of NIA LEE ANKNER , did kill and murder, NIA LEE ANKNER, contrary to Florida Statue 782.04(1)(a)1, 782.04(1)(a)2, and 782.04(1)(a)3. (CAPITAL FELONY).  "Dear Governor Ron DeSantis,  I and my family pray you are well and happy; and, we thank God you are Florida’s 46th Chief Executive.  My name is Charles E. Ankner. I (and my family) seek your Office’s review of the information herein related to the homicide of my biological niece, Nia Lee Ankner (“Decedent”); with an end goal of a competent homicide investigation being performed by an authorized Florida criminal investigative entity outside of Palm Beach County.  With your being a former U.S. Navy JAG Officer, and my being a USAF Veteran and certified long experienced paralegal; I’ll strive to be accurate and brief in my presentation, and yet be comprehensive.  Quite frankly Governor, we pray the information herein will make your blood boil; and, motivate you to action.  In August of 2017, the Decedent had met a former coworker-acquaintance, one Kelly Anne McCauley, for a Saturday afternoon pool swim at another person’s residence near the Town of Palm Beach. Neither made it to the pool; and the Decedent was brain-dead from an opiate overdose within two-hours of meeting that day with McCauley. McCauley also delayed calling 911 for twenty-minutes while instead calling her newly estranged boyfriend. By the time McCauley did call 911, eighty-percent of the Decedent’s brain was dead.   Admittedly, the Decedent also had a blood alcohol level of 0.15 in her system at the time of her brain-death. The combination of an opiate supplied by McCauley and ethanol caused the Decedent to stop breathing in the presence of McCauley while she purposefully delayed summoning help. In fact, besides after a twenty-minute in calling 911; McCauley did nothing to render help to the Decedent (rescue-breathing, flag down other cars for help, going into the Office of the Condo parking lot where they were at). McCauley, beyond a reasonable doubt, after supplying a fatal illicit opiate to the Decedent actually and proximately caused her death; and McCauley also for twenty minutes stood-by and let the Decedent suffocate to death.   Kelly McCauley has a long criminal record in Palm Beach County, including for but not limited to: illicit controlled substance use and possession, illicit drug paraphernalia use and possession, solicitation of prostitution, felony armed robbery, felony battery, felony grand theft, and destroying, tampering with, and concealing evidence. In my review of her criminal record; McCauley has always pled-out and never served more than a few months in the Palm Beach County Jail.  Tragically, McCauley is an all too common Palm Beach County catch and release felon. Even more tragic; McCauley was arrested only four-months before murdering the Decedent by Palm Beach County Florida Highway Patrol, for illegal possession of Xanax; with the driver of the car she was in unconscious and the car against the center barrier of Interstate-95. McCauley has lost her driving privileges due to several DUIs.  The Decedent had no criminal nor arrest record.  The motivation for PBPD Officers to resist, “soft-peddle”, or obstruct any and all related criminal investigations is that instead of concentrating on McCauley related to the Decedent’s condition and ultimate death; the PBPD exclusively concentrated on collecting evidence against the Decedent for DUI. In other words, PBPD Detective Lawrence Mennetti and Sgt. Scott Duquette “screwed the pooch” by not processing the scene and detaining McCauley pursuant to Florida Statute. Thereafter, Detective Mennetti performed what believe to be a half-stepped sham investigation in the “incident” and concluded “…no crime was committed in our jurisdiction.”.  Just a draft. How am I doing?   https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/

If President Trump only knew of this... murder... just down the road from the Winter White House...  Hoping to impress upon Governor Ron DeSantis that the FDLE and FBI should "get on this". Murderers walking free because of incompetent Officers and wealthy backers.   Executive Summary:  Palm Beach County family seeks redress, fair justice, and relief after being denied U.S. and State of Florida Constitutional rights under color of law related to and concerning the homicide of NIA LEE ANKNER.  Specifically, in the face of overwhelming relevant, material, and competent evidence, to date all State and Local Authorities have refused to initiate a criminal investigation into and regarding the opiate caused death of NIA LEE ANKNER. Although the surviving family has provided competent and substantial evidence of a homicide; there has been no related criminal investigation initiated nor conducted by any authorized Florida law enforcement entity, being wholly contrary to and violative of Art. I, § 2, and Art. I, § 16(b) Fla. Const. (1998), and § 839.13, § 839.20, § 843.0855, and § 843.14, Fla. Stat.  Due to incompetence of Town of Palm Beach investigating Law Enforcement Officers at the crime scene, and the subsequent and continuing obstruction of justice by supervising Town of Palm Beach Officers; the Florida Department of Law Enforcement, (“FDLE”), Palm Beach Sheriff's Office (“PBSO”), Town of Palm Beach Police Department (“PBPD”), Florida State Attorney’s Office 15th Judicial District (“15th SAO”), and the Palm Beach County Medical Examiner’s Office (“PBME”) have all refused to conduct a homicide investigation, as required by Law.  NIA LEE ANKNER’s surviving family has information and evidence providing probable cause to charge and arrest one KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY for 1st Degree Capital Murder.   In August of 2017, KELLY ANNE MCCAULEY and other person’s yet unknown, in the County of Palm Beach, and against the statute, peace, and dignity of the State of Florida, did unlawfully from a premeditated design to effect the death of a human being, and caused the death of a human being, NIA LEE ANKNER, through the unlawful distribution of opium or any compound, derivative or preparation of opium and/or fentanyl, opium or any compound, derivative or perpetration of opium, and/or fentanyl, and which was the proximate cause of the death of NIA LEE ANKNER , did kill and murder, NIA LEE ANKNER, contrary to Florida Statue 782.04(1)(a)1, 782.04(1)(a)2, and 782.04(1)(a)3. (CAPITAL FELONY).  "Dear Governor Ron DeSantis,  I and my family pray you are well and happy; and, we thank God you are Florida’s 46th Chief Executive.  My name is Charles E. Ankner. I (and my family) seek your Office’s review of the information herein related to the homicide of my biological niece, Nia Lee Ankner (“Decedent”); with an end goal of a competent homicide investigation being performed by an authorized Florida criminal investigative entity outside of Palm Beach County.  With your being a former U.S. Navy JAG Officer, and my being a USAF Veteran and certified long experienced paralegal; I’ll strive to be accurate and brief in my presentation, and yet be comprehensive.  Quite frankly Governor, we pray the information herein will make your blood boil; and, motivate you to action.  In August of 2017, the Decedent had met a former coworker-acquaintance, one Kelly Anne McCauley, for a Saturday afternoon pool swim at another person’s residence near the Town of Palm Beach. Neither made it to the pool; and the Decedent was brain-dead from an opiate overdose within two-hours of meeting that day with McCauley. McCauley also delayed calling 911 for twenty-minutes while instead calling her newly estranged boyfriend. By the time McCauley did call 911, eighty-percent of the Decedent’s brain was dead.   Admittedly, the Decedent also had a blood alcohol level of 0.15 in her system at the time of her brain-death. The combination of an opiate supplied by McCauley and ethanol caused the Decedent to stop breathing in the presence of McCauley while she purposefully delayed summoning help. In fact, besides after a twenty-minute in calling 911; McCauley did nothing to render help to the Decedent (rescue-breathing, flag down other cars for help, going into the Office of the Condo parking lot where they were at). McCauley, beyond a reasonable doubt, after supplying a fatal illicit opiate to the Decedent actually and proximately caused her death; and McCauley also for twenty minutes stood-by and let the Decedent suffocate to death.   Kelly McCauley has a long criminal record in Palm Beach County, including for but not limited to: illicit controlled substance use and possession, illicit drug paraphernalia use and possession, solicitation of prostitution, felony armed robbery, felony battery, felony grand theft, and destroying, tampering with, and concealing evidence. In my review of her criminal record; McCauley has always pled-out and never served more than a few months in the Palm Beach County Jail.  Tragically, McCauley is an all too common Palm Beach County catch and release felon. Even more tragic; McCauley was arrested only four-months before murdering the Decedent by Palm Beach County Florida Highway Patrol, for illegal possession of Xanax; with the driver of the car she was in unconscious and the car against the center barrier of Interstate-95. McCauley has lost her driving privileges due to several DUIs.  The Decedent had no criminal nor arrest record.  The motivation for PBPD Officers to resist, “soft-peddle”, or obstruct any and all related criminal investigations is that instead of concentrating on McCauley related to the Decedent’s condition and ultimate death; the PBPD exclusively concentrated on collecting evidence against the Decedent for DUI. In other words, PBPD Detective Lawrence Mennetti and Sgt. Scott Duquette “screwed the pooch” by not processing the scene and detaining McCauley pursuant to Florida Statute. Thereafter, Detective Mennetti performed what believe to be a half-stepped sham investigation in the “incident” and concluded “…no crime was committed in our jurisdiction.”.  Just a draft. How am I doing?   https://www.linkedin.com/pulse/palm-beach-county-opiate-massacre-reality-over-charles-ankner-cp/

If a militia of armed American patriots traveled to the border and shot any illegals or migrants crossing into the US, what would be the penalty? Certainly it wouldn’t be murder as they would simply be protecting the country from foreign invaders and stopping a crime in progress?

If only you people had your priorities straight. You don't care about murder or human suffering. If you did, you'd be fighting the many things that cause far more murder, suffering and death. There's a long list before "that time an immigrant was crazy."

If only you people had your priorities straight. You don't care about murder or human suffering. If you did, you'd be fighting the many things that cause far more murder, suffering and death. There's a long list before "that time an immigrant was crazy."

If the wall saves one child from child trafficking, pedos and murder, sacrificed for Baal the wall IS WORTH IT! ✝️✝️

If we dont stop doctirs doing genocide on organs and also frauding our nations tax insurance murder morphine we dont need a wall we need bridges yo ger away from Congress bullshit laws which herd us to genocide plants   Drink only water if you trust your water. No straws and .wake sure you dont let humans poop chenicals that eat your flesh. Brain especially. All products with brain flesh eating can get you shot by a rescuer because you are uncontrollable hallucinating abd in a danger to public   Anheuser Busch liars thieves abd murdering organs  and Pepsi co been told to stop wounding stomach pancreas.

If you really cared about American families you’d stop sucking at the NRA and arms lobbiest tits. Any murder is a tragedy but percentage wise, born and raised Americans murder more people than illegal immigrants could manage if they tried and the majority aren’t tryjng to do anything but make a decent life for themselves. But like everything else, you lie about this. Like you lied today about your approval numbers. Even your favorite biased poll has you at 50%, with the rest in the low 40’s.  Enjoy spending taxpayer money eating and golfing while children are caged at your say so.

If you really cared about American families you’d stop sucking at the NRA and arms lobbiest tits. Any murder is a tragedy but percentage wise, born and raised Americans murder more people than illegal immigrants could manage if they tried and the majority aren’t tryjng to do anything but make a decent life for themselves. But like everything else, you lie about this. Like you lied today about your approval numbers. Even your favorite biased poll has you at 50%, with the rest in the low 40’s.  Enjoy spending taxpayer money eating and golfing while children are caged at your say so.

Illegal immigrants commit murder so do American citizens. #Donthecon

Its is his highest priority! Even one murder is over the line. Even for one the wall must go up!

I’m neither party but if you think a wall is going to stop drugs from coming in here and the murder rate is going drop you are crazy and believe me I’m all about protecting our country been there done that. If you want to convince me about boarder protecting put in mine fields, gun towers with air support from Apache helicopters. It will be 100 times effective a lot cheaper and guess what... it will produce jobs especially for our veterans! Once you see love ones getting their heads blown off better yet blown to pieces I bet you stop trying to cross! VIOLENCE is the ANSWER 💯🇺🇸💯a wall what a joke! Where you thing the drugs and real terrorist are coming from! It’s sure not south of the boarder! They fly in from ALL over the world and let their VISA run out! Americans are stupid and I can’t believe you let some rich politician scare y’all like a bunch of babies! I don’t live in fear 💯

Jacqueline Alas laws against murder already on the books and enforced. We are demanding the remainder of our laws are enforced. What is so controversial about that? Why is that so difficult to comprehend.

Janice Leigh Schroder God Does not condone murder by aliens that are hateful illrgals

Jennifer Berg Edmonson Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher.

John Gardner California  LARGEST INSANE ASYLUM IN THE WORLD  Interesting that the LA Times did this. All the others are staying away from it. Whether you are a Democrat or Republican, this should be of great interest to you!  Just One State - be sure and read the last part...  try for 3 times.  This is only one State... If this doesn't open your eyes, nothing will!  From the LA. Times:  1. 40% of all workers in LA County (10.2 million people) are working for cash; and not paying taxes. This is because they are predominantly illegal immigrants, working without a green card. (Donald Trump was right)  2. 95 %of warrants for murder in Los Angeles are for illegal aliens.  3. 75% of people on the most wanted list in Los Angeles are illegal aliens.  4. Over 2/3 of all births in Los Angeles County are to illegal alien Mexicans on Medi-Cal, whose births were paid for by taxpayers.  5. Nearly 35% of all inmates in California detention centers are Mexican nationals; they are here illegally.  6. Over 300,000 illegal aliens in Los Angeles County are living in garages.  7. The FBI reports half of all gang members in Los Angeles are most likely illegal aliens from south of the border.  8 Nearly 60% of all occupants of HUD properties are illegal.  9. 21 radio stations in LA are Spanish-speaking.  10. In LA County, 5.1 million people speak English; 3.9 million, speak Spanish. (There are 10.2 million people, in LA County.  (All 10 of the above facts were published in the Los Angeles Times)  Less than 2% of illegal aliens are picking our crops, but 29% are on welfare.  Over 70% of the United States' annual population growth, ( and over 90% of California, Florida, and New York), results from immigration.  Also, 29% of inmates in federal prisons are illegal aliens.  We are fools for letting this continue.  HOW CAN YOU HELP?  Send copies of this letter, to at least two other people.  To 100, would be even better.

Jordan Miller I think there is still outrage but personally I dont see or hear about as many Russians or Ukrainians walking or driving across the desert to illegally gain entry into our sovereign nation. We cant just have wide open deserts without any type of boundary. Its been open for years and our citizens have been having to deal with people illegally crossing borders, no Social Security number, not paying taxes, never go back to court to secure legal status and then get involved in crimes of which the wordt of course is murder whether its from drinking and driving or from gang violence. Either way, at some point we have to have a stopping point. Trump may not be a polished politician but he is the only POTUS so far who has had the balls to secure our borders

Jordan Ozzy DeLage, murder?? Talk about someone being triggered! You aren’t just a fool but a damn fool.   When you actually believe a president, former or current will ever see one second of jail, much less be executed, you really need to visit your proctologist so they can properly evaluate your level of brain damage.

Just build it.  Democrats have been getting away with literal murder to just flat out ignoring laws such as who can and can't vote, gun rights, free speech, and everything else.  Just make everything an executive order.  Fucken fire everybody.  Completely restore the 1st and 2nd amendment.  If there are riots, shoot them they're fucken traitors anyway.

Let me explain, Angel Moms are the mother's of children murdered by ILLEGALS. 100% of these children who were murdered by ILLEGALS Were murdered by ILLEGALS. And yes, more children are murdered by citizens than non citizens but that doesn't negate the fact that illegals are murdering children in the USA. If liberals really wanted to stop the no 1 cause of murder in this country they would help Americans overturn Roe V Wade.

Let's be clear, this was a car accident. It was vehicular homicide, NOT murder. We still don't know if Joel Velasquez is illegally in the country or not. We don't know if a wall woulda helped or not.

Let's not forget our broken judicial system, criminals are getting away with murder and with a team of klepto serial killers. Can you believe some criminals go to jail for other criminals crimes and get released years later as planned.

Liberals say it's ok to have an abortion at 20 weeks . That's murder , so why would you trust any of them who support that?? Hillary is for it  This world is gone nuts

Linda Lynch you know that isn't the only issue. If an American commits murder, they are prosecuted and laws are put in place. Your point is silly.

Lisa Mann yes Americans kill Americans..... doesn’t mean we should import murder and other violence.  Ahhhh there it is.....  he’s rich, he can pay for it......   moron

Loretta Sleavensky yes!!! Keep the gun toting Americans out? Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher.

Lynn Limauro Floyd  if they committed murder firing squad

Lynn Limauro Floyd sorry for your loss, but there are white kids shooting up your schools and killing a lot of innocent children the whites have been killing and raping since you set foot on American soil. No one did anything to you.  Building a wall will not protect you from danger.  Zimmerman killed a young boy and got away with murder.  Who feels sorry for his parents. They received no justice. The Native Americans were massacred and given smallpox and had their land taken away.  What about them.  As soon as you white people loose someone to any race but your own you want to act uo, save it.  You are no better than anybody else.

MaLinda Venatta Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Many States have a 2x - 3rd jail. It helps until someone gets out. It's an addiction and needs treated as such. But it takes like all addictions. The addict has to work hard at staying sober for life. It's a decision with prayers. Illegals need to stay out of America period. They should be tried for murder ..

Mario Salerno Obama created policy that protected Americans from 5 most dangerous countries. Trump opened the boarder to them. Obama created policy to modernize the wall. Trump caged babies. Never forget 9-11 16 terrorists were Saudi. They were Saudi trained. They were Saudi financed. ZERO were Mexican. Zero arrived from Mexico. Zero would have been stopped by a idiotic wall! This man tRump and his son-in-law just sold $billion weapons to the only people, the Saudis, who've attacked America. Trump and GOP just allowed the Saudi Prince to murder and dismember Khashoggi. Makes you think.

Melanie Fuller Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Michael Thompson  yes!! But Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher.

Michelle Ann Deshaw Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

More trump Bullshit:    The Actual Facts about  'Murder and Extremism in the United States in 2018'  'ADL, EXECUTIVE SUMMARY'  'Each year, ADL’s Center on Extremism (COE) tracks murders perpetrated by all types of extremists. The 2018 Murder & Extremism report provides key insights into the crimes, including motivations behind these violent attacks.  2018 was a particularly active year for right-wing extremist murders: Every single extremist killing — from Pittsburgh to Parkland — had a link to right-wing extremism. Among this report’s key findings:  Every year adherents of a variety of extreme causes kill people in the United States; ADL’s COE tracks these murders. In 2018, domestic extremists killed at least 50 people in the U.S., a sharp increase from the 37 extremist-related murders documented in 2017, though still lower than the totals for 2015 (70) and 2016 (72).  The 50 deaths make 2018 the fourth-deadliest year on record for domestic extremist-related killings since 1970.  The extremist-related murders in 2018 were overwhelmingly linked to right-wing extremists.  Every one of the perpetrators had ties to at least one right-wing extremist movement, although one had recently switched to supporting Islamist extremism. White supremacists were responsible for the great majority of the killings, which is typically the case.  Deadly shooting sprees were a major factor in the high death toll. Five of the 17 incidents involved shooting sprees that caused 38 deaths and injured 33 people.  The perpetrator of one of 2018’s deadly shooting sprees, at a yoga studio in Tallahassee, was connected to the misogynistic incel/manosphere movement. In the wake of this attack and a similarly-motivated killing spree in Toronto, Canada, ADL’s COE now tracks such incidents as extremist-related killings and has updated its database to include an earlier incel-linked incident, Elliot Rodger’s 2014 shooting spree.  Firearms remain the weapon of choice for extremists who kill. Guns were responsible for 42 of the 50 deaths in 2018, followed by blades or edged weapons.'  https://www.adl.org/murder-and-extremism-2018

More trump Bullshit:    The Actual Facts about  'Murder and Extremism in the United States in 2018'  'ADL, EXECUTIVE SUMMARY'  'Each year, ADL’s Center on Extremism (COE) tracks murders perpetrated by all types of extremists. The 2018 Murder & Extremism report provides key insights into the crimes, including motivations behind these violent attacks.  2018 was a particularly active year for right-wing extremist murders: Every single extremist killing — from Pittsburgh to Parkland — had a link to right-wing extremism. Among this report’s key findings:  Every year adherents of a variety of extreme causes kill people in the United States; ADL’s COE tracks these murders. In 2018, domestic extremists killed at least 50 people in the U.S., a sharp increase from the 37 extremist-related murders documented in 2017, though still lower than the totals for 2015 (70) and 2016 (72).  The 50 deaths make 2018 the fourth-deadliest year on record for domestic extremist-related killings since 1970.  The extremist-related murders in 2018 were overwhelmingly linked to right-wing extremists.  Every one of the perpetrators had ties to at least one right-wing extremist movement, although one had recently switched to supporting Islamist extremism. White supremacists were responsible for the great majority of the killings, which is typically the case.  Deadly shooting sprees were a major factor in the high death toll. Five of the 17 incidents involved shooting sprees that caused 38 deaths and injured 33 people.  The perpetrator of one of 2018’s deadly shooting sprees, at a yoga studio in Tallahassee, was connected to the misogynistic incel/manosphere movement. In the wake of this attack and a similarly-motivated killing spree in Toronto, Canada, ADL’s COE now tracks such incidents as extremist-related killings and has updated its database to include an earlier incel-linked incident, Elliot Rodger’s 2014 shooting spree.  Firearms remain the weapon of choice for extremists who kill. Guns were responsible for 42 of the 50 deaths in 2018, followed by blades or edged weapons.'  https://www.adl.org/murder-and-extremism-2018

Murder is murder, no matter the "status" of a person.

Murder is murder, no matter the "status" of a person.

My family also lost a family member to an illegal alien and her American boyfriend.  He was murdered; shot point blank with their shotgun.  The illegal alien testified against her American boyfriend and she was set free, despite her sitting with the loaded shotgun waiting to murder our family member and spending our family member's money on her drugs while she let his body rot in their home for five days before driving our family member's corpse to a field and lighting it on fire in an attempt to cover their crime.  She resides just outside sunny San Diego last I heard. God Bless you and yours, President Trump and God Bless the United States of America.   #WallsWork  #BuildTheWall  #LockHerUp #FISAgate  #MAGA  #ProtectOurElections  #Trump2020

Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer are criminal traitors. They are complicit in every murder committed by an illegal alien. They have blood on their hands and they should stand trial for their crimes.

Nearly 60,000 immigrants with arrest records -- including 10 accused of murder -- have been allowed to stay in the United States under the Obama-era Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) program, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) revealed Monday.  According to DHS, 59,786 DACA recipients have been arrested while in the U.S. -- approximately 7.8 percent of all who have been approved to remain in this country under the program since it was created in 2012. Of those, 53,792 were arrested before their most recent request for a so-called "grant of deferred action" was approved. Another 7,814 were arrested after their request was approved.

Notice how when you mention Angel Families, Democrats LAUGH. They laugh at the rape, murder, drug deaths, human trafficking and suffering of American citizens at the hands of criminal illegal aliens. Democrats are terrorists

Pearl Brown Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

President TRUM P you have the power to put these Hypocrites Wicked Devil Worshipping Witches & Warlocks in Prison for multitude of murders, kidnapping & selling children & adults into slavery.... Why aren’t they Arrested & Locked up? A dog can pee on the side walk but if I did they’d lock me up & these people get away with murder, rape, & crimes so unspeakable they defy ones imagination. I speak to you devils in Jesus name you will not succeed in your plots & plans! You will fail & fall into the holes you dig for others! AMEN. PUT them in PRISON where they belong where they cannot do any more harm to PEOPLE! 🧐

President Trump has explained why we need secured borders, I would like Nancy to explain how Open Borders help our country and how she is going to protect us from Illegal Aliens that murder rape and assault our citizens.   IF she says she is for border security  then she needs to explain why President Trumps plan doesn't work and what her plan is and explain without using political rhetoric.   WE have an immigration problem and I would like our political leader to fix it for the good of the country not for their own selfish political benefit.

Put a wall around Illinois, mass shooting, Chicago murder rate.  Put a wall around LA lots of gangs and murder there. Put a wall aroung FLA, NY, Michigan the crime in their large cities deserves to stay behind walls. Come on Trump you are all powerful now declaring national emergencies, over riding your constitution for your own gain. You are soon to be the USA’s first Emperor.

Put a wall around Illinois, mass shooting, Chicago murder rate.  Put a wall around LA lots of gangs and murder there. Put a wall aroung FLA, NY, Michigan the crime in their large cities deserves to stay behind walls. Come on Trump you are all powerful now declaring national emergencies, over riding your constitution for your own gain. You are soon to be the USA’s first Emperor.

Reno Nevada just had an illegal brutally murder 4, 1 man and 3elderly women and rape them! And Jerry and Sherri were the most amazing and giving people!Build the wall Mr President! And stop Steve Sisolak from making our state a sanctuary state! My friends who were murdered by this scum need vengeance!!!!

Robert White Obama created policy that protected Americans from 5 most dangerous countries. Trump opened the boarder to them. Obama created policy to modernize the wall. Trump caged babies. Never forget 9-11 16 terrorists were Saudi. They were Saudi trained. They were Saudi financed. ZERO were Mexican. Zero arrived from Mexico. Zero would have been stopped by a idiotic wall! This man tRump and his son-in-law just sold $billion weapons to the only people, the Saudis, who've attacked America. Trump and GOP just allowed the Saudi Prince to murder and dismember Khashoggi. Makes you think.

Ron Gagnon so you're saying once the wall is built there be no more shootings no more deaths no more drugs in the United States. You're a fool and Trump is using scare tactics. There was just a murder yesterday no one has said one word about that that's because the guy was in the u.s. citizen he shot and killed five people and wounded five others

Roy Meston No such thig as God??? Haha you are a demon no wonder you want rape murder and chaos

Russell Lehr The gun control is the reason people do die. Without legal gun owners, people with illegally owned guns can just come into your house and murder your whole family and you cant do a thing about it? You want that? Besides, legally owned firearms is a constitutional right. 2nd amendment, right to bare arms. You give away your arms, you give away your freedom.

Sandra Nelson errrr Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher.

Sergio Simone  Because a convicted murder, shouldn’t be allowed to come in,

Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher.

Sharon George Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher.

Sheryl Whitfield-Tolliver  Seriously.. does nobody fact check this stuff While any death is tragic, a February 2018 study by the Cato Institute using 2015 crime statistics from Texas found immigrants in the country illegally were 25 percent less likely to be convicted of homicide than native-born Americans. (Legal immigrants were 87 percent less likely.)  Approximately 1.4 million people have died from firearms in the U.S. between 1968 and 2011. This number includes all deaths resulting from a firearm, including suicides, homicides, and accidents. Compared to 22 other high-income nations, the U.S. gun-related murder rate is 25 times higher. And over 40% of illegals come by AIR

Skip Rowland guessing you don't have to live around meth toting Mexicans. instead all you retards are making it about race. try visiting one of the cities or counties that have been infested by methicans(aka drug mules) like my area. all you can see is addicts, murder, fighting and stealing. they are living in houses that aren't supposed to be lived in by anyone.

So much blood on the Democrats hands.  They are getting away with murder over and over and over and over,  when will it stop.

So would it have been better if it was an American who killed her? I’m far more worried about a fellow American killing me than an illegal immigrant. Stop trying to highlight every murder by an illegal immigrant to push your agenda!

Stephen Mattison how on earth can you compare a job in a steel factory with a job ... were you need to commit mass murder..  Propaganda? The only person I see is a leader of the free world. Nothing more, nothing less Beyond understanding.

Stephen Pierson Hillary gets the death penalty for murder!

THE IPs (Infanticide Party members) are on a roll these days.  Supporting the murder of new born babies AND refusing to live up to their Constitutional oath to DEFEND AND PROTECT USA!  Maybe, if an IP had a family member killed by an illegal they'd realize it is a CRISIS!

That’s ok with the 💩 on the left . Kill babies unborn and already born , but don’t a animal that was convicted of murder. This is Democratic Party, ok but don’t bother the 💩 that comes across our borders.

The Border Is Pretty Safe Border cities get a bad rap as violent, but the Rio Grande Valley is extremely safe. Of the 24 Texas metro areas ranked by the FBI, Brownsville comes in dead last, with 240 incidents of violent crime per 100,000 people. Nearby McAllen comes in at #18, with 286 per 100,000.  Things are closer to the middle of the pack in El Paso and Laredo, which place at #13 and #10, respectively. The murder rate in each city is low, at 1.4 and 1.5 (Brownsville also comes in at 1.4, which is the second-lowest behind Abilene at 0.6). The numbers in El Paso, Laredo, and McAllen are all slanted heavily toward aggravated assault. In Brownsville, meanwhile, though the overall numbers for everything are very low, robbery crimes make up a surprisingly high number of cases, at 58.1 per 100,000, good for almost 25% of the violent crime in the city.  The Parts Of South Texas North Of The Border Are Somewhat Less So Corpus Christi, Victoria, and San Antonio all place within the top 10 on the list (at #7, 8, and 9, respectively). The numbers for all three cities are pretty similar—although Victoria, like Amarillo, has a surprisingly high number of reported rape cases, at 71.5 per 100,000. The average for all Texas cities listed is 36, which means that, again—either Victoria (and Amarillo) have more than twice as many rapes occurring than the rest of the state, or they’re being reported more frequently in those cities than elsewhere.  That statistic aside, there’s not a lot to parse about those numbers: Corpus has the highest murder rate, at 5.4, of the three, while San Antonio has a lower robbery rate than the other largest metro areas in Texas, Houston and Dallas.

The Border Is Pretty Safe Border cities get a bad rap as violent, but the Rio Grande Valley is extremely safe. Of the 24 Texas metro areas ranked by the FBI, Brownsville comes in dead last, with 240 incidents of violent crime per 100,000 people. Nearby McAllen comes in at #18, with 286 per 100,000.  Things are closer to the middle of the pack in El Paso and Laredo, which place at #13 and #10, respectively. The murder rate in each city is low, at 1.4 and 1.5 (Brownsville also comes in at 1.4, which is the second-lowest behind Abilene at 0.6). The numbers in El Paso, Laredo, and McAllen are all slanted heavily toward aggravated assault. In Brownsville, meanwhile, though the overall numbers for everything are very low, robbery crimes make up a surprisingly high number of cases, at 58.1 per 100,000, good for almost 25% of the violent crime in the city.  The Parts Of South Texas North Of The Border Are Somewhat Less So Corpus Christi, Victoria, and San Antonio all place within the top 10 on the list (at #7, 8, and 9, respectively). The numbers for all three cities are pretty similar—although Victoria, like Amarillo, has a surprisingly high number of reported rape cases, at 71.5 per 100,000. The average for all Texas cities listed is 36, which means that, again—either Victoria (and Amarillo) have more than twice as many rapes occurring than the rest of the state, or they’re being reported more frequently in those cities than elsewhere.  That statistic aside, there’s not a lot to parse about those numbers: Corpus has the highest murder rate, at 5.4, of the three, while San Antonio has a lower robbery rate than the other largest metro areas in Texas, Houston and Dallas.

The Washington Post is the most left wing nut job paper in the country and the supposed data they have conjured up is not based in fact. Sorry for those who point to the Post as a source. Please grasp the truth of this. Any crime by an illegal is way way to many. To make it worse is the idea you would defend the idea that illegals have some right to murder American and get a pass from the rest of us. You are some kind of nut job all by yourself.

The democrat communists are offering them all kinds of freebies and when they come they find out it was all a lie and they do what they known to do  best steal, attack , destroy,  murder , and democrat communists like it like that

The democrat communists lure the illegals and when they are here they find out it was all a lie,  they do what they know what to do best steal, attack , destroy and murder,  its not like they were highly educated and with endless job skills , they dont even know English

The democrats and republicans voting against the wall should all be charged with murder for each person killed by an illegal.  They are responsible for the deaths.

The only crime in this country is Donald Trump and the idiots who voted for him murder 101 and accessory to murder and you should be held accountable for the murders of the people in this country  Impeachment time.  jail time. and execution time...

The only crime in this country is Donald Trump and the idiots who voted for him murder 101 and accessory to murder and you should be held accountable for the murders of the people in this country  Impeachment time.  jail time. and execution time...

There is nothing funny about this. The families deserve respect and know the American people care. Really? Someone is going to laugh when someone has been murdered? Murder in itself is illegal, illegal immigration is illegal. Everyone in government jobs will recieve back pay. You can't bring back the dead. You can only fight for the dead and realize that their life mattered.

We Americans Want And Need The Wall For Our Own Security  We Can Not And Will Not Risk Our Famlies And Loved Ones Th3 Chance Of Disease Crime Theft Murder Of Inocence Citizens  Paying For All Of These Illegals That Do Not Work And Think That They Can Just Come And Recieve Welfare No No We Work Too Hard To Suport Lazy People Who Want Everything For  Nothing When Our Veterans Put Their Life On The Line To Keep Us Free From An Invasion Of Illegals They Are Still Suffering And We Need To Support Them Build The Wall So High They Can't Get Over It So Low They Can't Get Under It And So Long They Can't Get Around It

We all know the Answer to this.. They would rather spend Billions to Murder Innocent Babies and Foriegn Countries then take care of thier own.. Build the Wall!!!

We want the border wall.  Government officials are paid way too much anyway.   Those liberals didn't mind Muslim Obama sending over 1.6 billion dollars to Iran to terrorize AMERICA.   WE AMERICANS WANT THE WALL.  SOMEONE LET OBAMA GET AWAY WITH MURDER WITH BILL AND HILLARY AND YOU WILL NOT SUPPORT OUR GREAT PRESIDENT TRUMP.  KEEP THE GOVERNMENT CLOSED.  SHOW THESE PEOPLE WHO YOU ARE MY PRESIDENT TRUMP.  STAND FOR AMERICA,  PLEASE.   STAND BEHIND US.  WE WANT A SAFE AMERICA.   GET ILLEGALS OUT OF OUR COUNTRY PRESIDENT.   WE HAVE NEEDED A PRESIDENT LIKE TRUMP FOR YEARS.  ANYTHING,  I CAN DO FOR YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP,  I WILL WORK FREE.   YOU REALLY CARE ABOUT OUR COUNTRY.   PLEASE, PLEASE BUILD THE WALL.  KEEP GOVERNMENT CLOSED TO GET THEIR ATTENTION.   THEY JUST WANT THEIR OWN WAY INSTEAD OF THE SAFE WAY.  MR. PRESIDENT,  YOU SACRIFICE YOUR PAY FROM US DAILY TO IMPROVE AMERICA.   I THINK CONGRESS AND SENATE TAKE NO PAY.  IT SHOULD BE A PRIVILEGE FOR ANYONE TO SERVE IN A SEAT FREE.  ALL, I EVER SEE IS THEM TAKING UNNECESSARY NAPS.  GO TO BED AT NIGHT.  SENATE AND CONGRESS ONLY WORK 102 DAYS OUT OF 365 DAYS BECAUSE THEY STAY ON VACATION OR HOLIDAY PAY.  WE BACK YOU MR. PRESIDENT.  BUILD THE WALL.  STOP PAYING CONGRESS AND SENATE A PAYCHECK FOR SITTING ON THEIR LAZY TAIL.  GO MR. PRESIDENT!!!!!!😁😁😁😁😁❤💚❤💚❤💚❤💚

Well satalight wall what ever tactic % that can murder. And go back to Mexico undocumented millions of imagrint 100 tho.s murder

Well satalight wall what ever tactic % that can murder. And go back to Mexico undocumented millions of imagrint 100 tho.s murder

What about all the white men who committed mass murder you f*** is kill me you only want to acknowledge s*** that's good for you f*** you Donald Trump

What about all those non illegals that murder like yesterdays shooting...how is a wall going to protect us. National emergency si gun control not trumps promised wall.

What does that have to do with the illegals who commit murder in our country? Do you actually see a similarity between the 2? WOW

What's more important to Democrat voters? Murder and rape!

Where does the wall go for wealthy privileged american citizens who get away with rape and murder??

While you starve the citizens, much like Putin and Kim Jong-un are doing.  When do you start murdering your political enemies and the LGTB community?  You are already complacent in the murder of journalists.

With all due respect...this could have been done by any us citizen.  Not just a  immigrant.      This happens all the time in the US by us citizens.   Alchoholism is a  horrid disease.    Guns kill at much higher rates  as Americans purposely murder at much higher rates.

You know a government employee that dont make good money, I dont, and if they can't manage their money that's on them. Everyone seems to not save for a rainy day anymore, and spend more then they have. Also when you hire into those government positions, one must always expect this to happen, it happened many, many times before and know one screamed bloody murder.

You're cynically parading out grieving parents to try to create a crisis where there isn't one...meanwhile...on the anniversary of a real crisis...the mass murder at Parkland...only one of many mass murders we've suffered in the country due to your unwillingness to even mention the crisis of gun violence the the real national emergency that requires reasonable gun control.  Since 9/11 white American born males, not illegal immigrants, have committed almost every mass murder in this country, but you say nothing about that.  You are a lying coward.

You're cynically parading out grieving parents to try to create a crisis where there isn't one...meanwhile...on the anniversary of a real crisis...the mass murder at Parkland...only one of many mass murders we've suffered in the country due to your unwillingness to even mention the crisis of gun violence the the real national emergency that requires reasonable gun control.  Since 9/11 white American born males, not illegal immigrants, have committed almost every mass murder in this country, but you say nothing about that.  You are a lying coward.

Your loss is heart crushing.  I understand.  What I don't understand is WHY it is only the handful of victims killed by "illegals" are worthy of sympathy?  There are murder victims every day all over this country.  Families of those victims aren't deserving of notice because it doesn't further trump's agenda.  Why do other victims not matter?  They too are somebody's child/sibling/parent.

use  FBI and CIA and Police to stop drug trafficing these criminals break law and commit murder

“What’s more important to the Democrats? Stopping me from fulfilling another one of my promises or murder?”

Abby Schmidt Nobody cares  any more it has become to dangerous.    between the gangs , ISSI , the illnesses a lot of which are fatal & the rapist, Drunks, & Drugs coming through the borders its time to close them.  lord forbid  one of them should kill one of your family members. then you would understand. I raised my kids on my own.  i got welfare for 6 months i took a cut in pay to get off it. it was not designed to be a way of life. Kids now get pregnant now so the Tax payers have to pay for their kids .  if you can't afford to buy insurance then don't have kids.  when they are raised on it they don't even try to get off it, we don't owe other people a living especially from other countries that is communism go to Cuba  Russia North Korea ,  they are starving ,  if your sickly, disabled or old they let you die.  your only allowed 2 kids in China & Japan.  if you get a job your paying for others medicine, housing, food, How do you want to live just getting by or have a chance to have nice things, travel give your kids nice clothes , take them out to eat. afford a safe place for them while your at work. the rich democrats who all voted for the wall before Trump won are not going to give you anything. they all have wall, gates, armed body guards. & they would have you arrested if you dared to come near them

Adrianna Anders how about the word leftist- u will find rapist impeached clinton, pedophile jailed anthony wiener, kkk robert byrd, mao, lenin, stalin, murderer ted kennedy, groper cory booker, wife beater keith ellison, kkk governor northam, castro, maduro, margaret sanger....that's what i see when i look up leftist...i dont feel safe

All theas White Folks that where immigrants and possibly rapist and etc..... there was no boarder Security about 242 years ago when ya came and killed Native Americans and in slaved Black folks hear and ya all came from home land EUROPE but white folks want  a wall now. Can’t build American like that Remember what ur values was when white folks was escaping mother fuckers like TRUMP IN Europe was white folks u did this about 242 years ago. Can’t be that   stupid.

John Bentley you're talking about the cowards who blocked me yeah? Their opinion really matters. Christians, Republicans and one of them looked like a serial rapist :') plus they had to hide so they were brave enough to hate me properly :D Typical Idiot Army Courage

Kris Landers way to blame the victims. Maybe if I don’t wear a short skirt, I won’t get raped either. Nice try but it is the rapist fault for raping a 6 year little girl. Who he drugged btw

Sherry Michaels Saye you heard what I said your a child rapist and a molester of fine ethics

Trump,you have got to be the dumbest person on this Planet! Trump said that "he wants this to end ",well you are the one that started the "Trump Shutdown" and you can it Today ! i do feell for these families but it is Not all illegal aliens that are at the Southern border or bringing drugs into this country ! There are home grown murders, rapist, and human Traffickers! This is all Propaganda ! No Wall is going to stop that ! Trump is NOT COMPASSIONATE, it is CRIMINAL that the Coast Guard is working without pay ,they are an imperative part of Border Security! STOP the Trump Shutdown NOW ! If Trump really was for the American people ,he would of took the deal the Democrats gave him on December 11 ,2018 and Never cause this heartbreaking suffering ! Trump is Using these people as a "pawn" in his SICK game ,what kind of leader does this ? Well it is DICTATORS like Putin who does this to their citizens ! Trump , you are the one who threw the DACA people under the bus and now you want you give them just a little to get a STUPID Wall! These people are "Pawns" just to be "USE" to make you look good  to your CRAZY base  ! How PATHETIC! Pence, is such a LIAR just like you, I guess that must be a prerequisite to work for you ! Trump, if you are so worried about that "Russia Thing" and you have to cause such Distraction, Why don't you just go TESTIFLY to Mueller Face to face ? Why not get it over with ? Nobody can be caught in a "Purjury Trap" if you tell the TRUTH ! Trump, you need to END this and pay these people ! Trust me, they will REMEMBER come 2020 !Why don't you go today and announce to the American people that you are RESIGNING ? Trump, you are the most DISGUSTING,INCOMPETENT,HORRIBLE person who has ever been in that oval office ! Trump has No morals, No integrity,No COMPASSION,No DECORUM,No Empathy and he is STUPID!

Your an ignorant man, it doesn’t matter if you build a wall.  It will not stop American Born serial killers, drug dealers/users, rapist, murderers, bigots, child molesters, etc., etc., from being in this country.  As long as the demands stay in the USA the supply will keep coming

Your child molester and a rapist

how the hell did they  come in   for 9 11 it wasnt crossing the borders cubans came in by boats they come in by tunnels semis crossing canada borders  get the fricken truth meth is made in usa murders and rapist are here and the biggest con are the presdient his family and goons he is a  fricken traitor to our country

the 2A was written to protect us from libtards...the side of castro, mao, lenin, stalin, che, infanticide, abortions, kkk robert byrd, kkk governor northam, margaret sanger, rapist impeached clinton, pedophile jailed anthony wiener, maduro,...just wish democrats would stop shooting up all these places, and more importantly stop turning all prosperous countries into killing fields..

🖕🖕🖕🖕🖕🖕🖕🖕FUCK TRUMP THE RAPIST .....

800,000 workers struggling to pay their bills, food stamps being eliminated for the needy, security of air travel being jeopardized, and our Coast Guard not being paid for life saving and stopping drug smuggling - That’s the Emergency!!!

An emergency declaration ought to be reserved for legitimate emergency situations where quick, decisive action is needed to resolve a crisis.  Trump's failure to win approval for his vanity project does not constitute a national emergency.  Typically, when someone is facing a legitimate emergency, they wouldn't undermine their own argument for exercising emergency powers by admitting that the situation is such that they don't actually need to declare an emergency.  Trump is truly such a special case, that he deftly made the case for his "emergency" declaration by admitting, "I could do the wall over a longer period of time, I didn't need to do this, but I'd rather do it much faster. And I don't have to do it for the election; I've already done a lot of wall for the election 2020."  Later in the same address, Trump basically admitted that his emergency declaration will not result in his Wall being built quickly.  If we are genuinely experiencing a border crisis that requires an emergency declaration from Trump, how is it that Trump was able to wait until nearly 25 months into his administration before declaring an emergency?  If the situation is so dire, and requires prompt, decisive action, exactly how will construction of a wall that would take several years to complete address the issue in time?   Sever dehydration is a medical emergency. Would you advise someone suffering from severe dehydration to begin development of a well to deal with their thirst, or would you give them a glass of water?  How do you justify building Trump's Wall to deter border crossings, when apprehensions at the southern border are near a 46 year low?  What good will Trump's Wall do to curb drug smuggling across the border, when both the DEA and the CBP admit that most of the narcotics that cross the southern border come through legal ports of entry?  How effective will Trump's Wall be at preventing undocumented immigrants from entering the country, when the Center for Migration Studies of New York found that in 2016-2017, 62% of the newly undocumented were folks who had overstayed their visas, and not crossed our southern border illegally?   How would Trump's Wall address the refugee crisis, when it won't provide any of the resources needed to process and adjudicate asylum claims, nor will it lead to a resolution of the circumstances refugees are fleeing in their homelands?  "Build the Wall!" was never a real solution. It was a slogan.  Trump'a Wall has always been a simplistic remedy offered by an ignorant sleaze in order to appeal to the simple-minded.

Chris Jordan G those children are not dead! A lot of them were unaccompanied and some were with people smuggling them over. But no sense in talking to someone who supports child trafficking and heartless who doesnt care if measures are taken to NOT add ONE more Angel Moms to the list. Oh by the way people are numb to Dems name calling now.

Does anyone not think that the Democrats are corrupt and making money from groups that profit from the illegal immigrants and drug smuggling coming across the border?

How exactly ? Is your Trump Family monument Wall going to stop Narco Subs, catapults , industrial Drones, small aircraft , comericial airline drug mules , high altitude balloons , tunnels , ladders , fast speed boats , legal point of entry smuggling ? You say “ I don’t know what I’m going to do with all the funding not given to the wall “ ? Wake up to 2020 and use the little left in your brain to work it out . A Wall ? How is that going to stop it ?  Just about your Ego only . I’m still waiting for anyone to sensibly reply how a wall is going to stop this ?? 😳😳  Idiot in Charge

I'm really disappointed with our government in not wanting to protect our nation in choosing to not build the wall just because it is a "Trump thing" and they oppose all Trump decisions, good or not. Why would our government not want to make sure we are protected from foreign invaders, terrorist, drug cartels,  human traffickers, gun smuggling,  kidnapping, and from those who want to disobey the law? Why? Our government  needs to grow up and do what's right for America, instead of throwing tantrums because they didn't get their way in the elections. This is just my opinion. Others are free to feel differently, of course. ;) I am all for immigrants coming here for asylum, byw, but just doing it the legal and safe way. :) I agree with Pres. Trump, that we do need the wall.

If we legalized marijuana it would allow us to ....tax and obtain revenue for the wall, cut down on illegal smuggling across the mexico border, reduce incarcerations, fund opioid rehabilitation and generate new jobs.  ......just a thought

Jordanian Border Wall BUILT USING $500 BILLION U.S. TAXPAYER MONEY BUT WE CAN'T HAVE OUR OWN WALL?  "GOP AND DEMOCRATS FULLY FUND A BORDER WALL -- IN JORDAN By Neil Munro, March 22, 2018  The 2018 omnibus provides just enough funds to build 33 miles of fencing on the Texas border — but it also provides $500 million to help Jordan build a wall and defense line against jihad terrorists trying to cross its 287-mile border with Iraq and Syria. The omnibus budget says on page 394:  SEC. 9011. Up to $500,000,000 of funds appropriated by this Act for the Defense Security Cooperation Agency in ‘‘Operation and Maintenance, Defense-Wide’’ may be used to provide assistance to the Government of Jordan to support the armed forces of Jordan and to enhance security along its borders.  On page 375, the omnibus says:  For the ‘‘Counter-Islamic State of Iraq and Syria Train and Equip Fund’’, $1,769,000,000, to remain available until September 30, 2019 …  That these funds may be used in such amounts as the Secretary of Defense may determine to enhance the border security of nations adjacent to conflict areas including Jordan, Lebanon, Egypt, and Tunisia resulting from actions of the Islamic State of Iraq and Syria:  The U.S.-funded, $500 million, 274-mile Jordan-Iraq border wall was described by Vice.com, in a 2016 article titled “The Great Wall of Jordan: How the US Wants to Keep the Islamic State Out”;  The wall, which began as a $20 million project in 2008 to erect a set of surveillance towers along a 30-mile (50 km) stretch of the border with Syria, has since expanded into a program costing half a billion dollars, according to defense officials who spoke to VICE News. Called the Jordan Border Security Program or JBSP, the wall is ostensibly meant to stop weapons of mass destruction from getting out, but since 2013 has refocused on detecting Islamic State fighters and arms smuggling, as well as refugees, on both sides of the border …  The first phase of the JBSP, the erection of the towers, was completed in September 2009. Phase 1B, the beginning of the fence, was completed in March 2014. Phases 2 and 3, the building of a fully integrated and networked fence running along a 275-mile(442 km) stretch of Jordan’s borders with Syria and Iraq and costing some $300 million, are scheduled to be fully operational this year. Further phases will extend the fence along the entire border and improve surveillance and detection gear. Mobile surveillance stations and quick reaction forces will be stationed at vulnerable points or emerging hot spots.  It’s all paid for by the United States taxpayer."  https://www.breitbart.com/immigration/2018/03/22/gop-democrats-fully-fund-border-wall-jordanians/

Julie Albers Hampe I guess if you like drug traffickers, child trafficking, and gun smuggling then that’s up to you.

Mark Parsons - what about them Mark?  ICE reports most illegal drugs are being smuggled at ports or through tunnels under the walls in towns.  The Chinese are becoming a problem as well with their smuggling at sea ports mostly with  fentanyl.

Most of the drugs come directly through U.S. ports of entry — the official border crossings. Smuggling engineers use constantly evolving tactics to hide the contraband in fake vehicle panels, secret compartments or deep inside engine parts. Cartel chemists have learned to liquefy meth to make it look like water. And super-potent fentanyl is so compact that pedestrian couriers can walk it through border gates hidden in clothing, shoes or body cavities  They are also playing the odds. San Diego’s main crossing at San Ysidro, the southern terminus of U.S. Interstate 5, is the busiest land border in the Western Hemisphere, where 70,000 vehicle passengers and 20,000 pedestrians enter the United States each day. For smuggling high-value narcotics, blending in is a better bet than sneaking around.  While seizures of hard drugs are at record levels — indicating an unprecedented volume of narcotics entering the United States, experts say — arrests of illegal border crossers dropped last year to the lowest level since 1971.  The money would be better spent using hi tech monitoring and hiring more U.S. customs officers whose job it is to facilitate trade and travel while stopping narcotics and other threats.

Most of the drugs come directly through U.S. ports of entry — the official border crossings. Smuggling engineers use constantly evolving tactics to hide the contraband in fake vehicle panels, secret compartments or deep inside engine parts. Cartel chemists have learned to liquefy meth to make it look like water. And super-potent fentanyl is so compact that pedestrian couriers can walk it through border gates hidden in clothing, shoes or body cavities  They are also playing the odds. San Diego’s main crossing at San Ysidro, the southern terminus of U.S. Interstate 5, is the busiest land border in the Western Hemisphere, where 70,000 vehicle passengers and 20,000 pedestrians enter the United States each day. For smuggling high-value narcotics, blending in is a better bet than sneaking around.  While seizures of hard drugs are at record levels — indicating an unprecedented volume of narcotics entering the United States, experts say — arrests of illegal border crossers dropped last year to the lowest level since 1971.  The money would be better spent using hi tech monitoring and hiring more U.S. customs officers whose job it is to facilitate trade and travel while stopping narcotics and other threats.

Securing the border was supposed to happen already, President Obama said he would do it, what happened?  Before that 30 yrs ago after President Reagan granted amnesty . All the walls and fences in Europe to keep immigrants out and smuggling out but that's ok.

Sigh, how many times to we have to tell you, the wall is not going to stop terrorists or drug smuggling!  According to Justice Department public records, no immigrant has been arrested at the southwest border on terrorism charges in recent years.   And most drugs are smuggled into the United States onboard fishing boats, trains, tractor-trailers and ordinary cars that come into the country at legal ports of entry. The wall won't stop any of this.  The wall is a scam and a distraction!

Sonja Sherrod Seizing control of GM and Chrysler without proper authorization from Congress. Firing whistle-blower Gerald Walpin for doing his job as the Inspector-General in charge of investigating corruption, waste, and fraud in government programs. Collecting data on fellow Americans who oppose healthcare reform with flag@whitehouse.gov and now, through a new Obama campaign website, again collecting data on fellow Americans who disagree with the Administration Placing the U.S. Census Bureau under the supervision of the White House Chief of Staff, by law the Department of Commerce. His Justice Department’s smuggling of weapons, that the President signed off on funding for. Manipulating jobs by hiring and rehiring Census workers. Creating false districts and assigning stimulus funds to those districts. Violating tax codes by releasing private tax details to the public when attacking Koch Industries. Creating a taxpayer-funded position, Director of Progressive Media & Online Response, to promote Obama’s incumbent candidacy, in violation of the Hatch Act. Obama’s filming of a campaign ad in the White House in violation of FEC laws.

The US-Canada border is 5,525 miles long and it receives less resources and fewer border agents than the US-Mexico border (which is 1,954 miles.) The number of illegal border crossings along the US-Canada border has increased by 142% in just one year. Fenatyl, Marijuana, Ecstacy and coke are the most common drugs smuggled into our country from Canada. It also serves as an easy entrance for terrorists to enter into the US. Border agents along the US-Canada border have made statements about how easy it is for human trafficking and drug smuggling to slip through, due to the lack of man power and resources. Thousands of traffickers and smugglers illegally cross, completely unnoticed by border security and drawing all of our attention on the Southern border only makes it easier for them to do so. The Northern border is currently a bigger threat to us than the Southern border, so why is it we choose not to pay attention?

The US-Canada border is 5,525 miles long and it receives less resources and fewer border agents than the US-Mexico border (which is 1,954 miles.) The number of illegal border crossings along the US-Canada border has increased by 142% in just one year. Fenatyl, Marijuana, Ecstacy and coke are the most common drugs smuggled into our country from Canada. It also serves as an easy entrance for terrorists to enter into the US. Border agents along the US-Canada border have made statements about how easy it is for human trafficking and drug smuggling to slip through, due to the lack of man power and resources. Thousands of traffickers and smugglers illegally cross, completely unnoticed by border security and drawing all of our attention on the Southern border only makes it easier for them to do so. The Northern border is currently a bigger threat to us than the Southern border. Overstayed visas also account for 2/3 of illegal immigration and Canadians are the highest when it comes to over stayed visas

What about all of the northern States like the one I grew up on that border another country and have no walls?  It sucks that you can't find a job with the skills you have, maybe try learning Spanish or move to a place where speaking Spanish isn't a job requirement... If 45 knows things we don't that make it crisis now that is more important than helping the Americans in California or Puerto Rico then why did it take so long for him to declare an emergency? Why didn't he do so in the first 2 years of his term when he was trying to get this done? It's not an emergency if you wait 2 years... Jim Jenkins - if control laws take lives, that blanket statement would mean you having a driver's license, being married in the government's eyes, or opening a bank account take lives... there are many countries with stricter gun laws that have lower crime rates. That point on gun control laws was also just simple way of showing that if you support a wall because it could save one person's life, then you should also support guns laws as they would save one person's life, or healthcare for all as that saves one life, or a full transition to renewable energy as that saves one life... more wall is a waste of taxpayer funds if it doesn't deal with the majority issues used to manufacture its need as an emergency, namely illegal immigration and drug smuggling.  Lastly saying that relatively few innocent people are killed by a gun is just plain nonsense. Try telling that to one family members that was killed in any number of mass killings in the last few years from Sandy Hook to Las Vegas concert goers... and stricter gun control doesn't mean law abiding citizens cant own guns, it just means they have to jump through a few more hoops. You loved your wife enough to file paperwork with the government declaring it, why cant you do the same with your gun? You wanted to drive bad enough you took a test showing you knew how to do so safely and show back up at the dmv every few years to reregister your license, why wouldn't you also do the same to own gun?

YES THEY COME HERE BUY CARS AND DRIVE WITH OUT LICENSE MANY THINK AGAIN OUR PRESIDENT DONALD  TRUMP IS TRYING TO PROTECT OUR LIVES HE IS FIGHT AGAINST TERRORIST AND IN LEGAL PEOPLE ISIS AGAINST DRUG SMUGGLING INLEGALS I VOTED FOR TRUMP WILL AGAIN IF I AM STILL ON EARTH LIFE IS SO SHORT TRUMP HAS DONE MORE GOOD  THAN ANY OTHER PRESIDENT    HAS SINCE KENNEDY

A Christian man killed many people. Let’s deport the Cristians!

A Republican killed my co-worker. Deport them all.

Agree!!! I have a list of people to deport and revoke their “fake citizenship “ have proof they lied on their application

Albert Kojo Kyekye, come here Trump will happily deport you..and if you're not deported you'll pay double In health care..and live paycheck to paycheck...

Also needs to be a crime to hire,medical treat through government funding, welfare for illegals are a crime. Deport themselves and a charge to country of origin for any incarceration or money spent and if not our boarders will close to said country by default of over 30% abuse till payed in full

Are we going to deport all the white locals who kill people? Road rage, mass shootings, etc? Immigrants commit far fewer crimes than native born Americans.

As an AMERICAN CITIZEN , BUILD THE WALL, SECURE OUR BORDERS , DEPORT ILLEGAL ALIENS!!! I love my country but we won’t have a country if we don’t defend it!!!

BEFORE you - BUILD THE WALL - - - - deport the demonrats to Mexico

BUILD THAT WALL DEPORT ALL ILLEGALS AND THEIR FAMILIES AND DREAMERS.

BUILD THE WALL AND DEPORT THEM ALL

Build The Wall. Deport Them All!

Build and deport!

Build that wall and make it tall then DEPORT THEM ALL !!!!!!

Build the wall and then deport all criminals.

Build the wall deport ALL illegals just load them all up and dump them where they came from. And take their kids with them

Build the wall! Deport those evil invaders!

Build the wall!!!! Deport nancy.

Build the wall, deport all illegal aliens, financially starve all "sanctuary cities" and prosecute their mayors, and close our bordee for at least 50 years.

Build the wall, deport all illegals

Build the wall, deport all illegals, no benefits of any kind for illegals/"refugees" Tel them the American Frere Ride is over.

Build the wall, give Daca kids a path to citizenship, establish a program for all current illegals to obtain citizenship by paying a fee, requirement to take a constitution class and English classes, and a path to make them tax paying and off government free programs within a time period or deport them!

Build the wall. Deport them ALL, with a democrat under each arm.

Build wall. Shut down border. Deport ever single SOB that’s here illegal. Be making trillions because not feeding scum. MAGAFOREVER!!!!!!!

But I'm sorry your daughter lost her life. My heart is with you. All my kids,and me, had dangerous situations with illeagle aliens from mexico ect. We need the wall, president TRUMP is right, it is a NATIONAL EMERGENCY,  now. PRESIDENT TRUMP HAS MY VOTE! TRUMP! TRUMP! TRUMP! USA! USA! USA! BUILD THE WALL! BUILD THE WALL!! DEPORT THEM ALL!! ICE!! ICE!! GLAD WE HAVE ICE AGENTS!!

Can we deport the demonrats - please?  If only!

DACA is disappointing. First: We've had 7 amnesty programs since 1986. If ANYONE was had the opportunity at amnesty and didn't take it - then it should be off the table for them (for kids, I'd give it 2). Second: Anyone that has been here 5 years or less does not have ties to this country - they still have ties to their former country - deport them! So you are dealing with people from 2000-2013. Then ALL DACA applicants must be vetted - if they have committted ANY other crime - they are deported. Third: They should NEVER gain citizenship, a green card to allow them to stay maybe, but not citizenship. Breaking the  law should never be rewarded like that. Fourth: They should be ineligible for welfare. Fifth: Their ability to stay should not be the reason for parents, siblings, aunts, uncles to stay....it should not be a means to chain migration. We, as a country, need to send a strong message to the rest of the world - we welcome LEGAL immigrants, but if you come illegally you WILL BE deported!

Dear Mr.President, Shut down the gov. Build the wall. Deport the illegals. The citizens of this country stand behind you

Deport All Liberal To Mexico!!!

Deport Melania since you hate immigrants

Deport all Americans you must be including yourself then

Deport all immigrants they are all trouble we can do without.

Deport and build wall we must defend,Americans first other countries need take care there own

Deport the rednecks keep the illegals.

Deport your illegal alien wife, parents and birther son

Do not cave in President Trump! Start deporting DACA on a weekly basis until they are ready to negotiate! If you deport them all, then so be it! Democrats think they have to have their way or else and it’s time for a change in America!  Otherwise, America needs a Civil War!!!

Good bag up the liberals and deport there asses .

Here we have another illegal killing Americans.  Deport all of them  Man, 19, detained on immigration concerns wanted in 4 Nevada murders  https://www.foxnews.com/us/man-19-detained-on-immigration-concerns-wanted-in-4-Nevada-murders

I agree with President Trump, Build the wall and go door to door sending all their ass back to Mexico, they do not belong here taking all our jobs having kids to stay here, this is our country, You all should be glad he want to send them back stop them from coming over here,Further more Any of you looked at all these immigrants over here how they got here, This one at least protects us! Do your homework!! GO DOOR TO DOOR ARREST ALL OF THEM DEPORT THEIR ASS CHILDREN AND ALL, get that wall up..

I am 100% BUILD THE WALL. BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL  BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL. DEPORT ALL ILLEGALS iLLEIN THEIR NOT BELONG THIS COUTRY. COME LEGALLY PERIOD.

I am sick and tired of illegals coming into this country and using the system to their benefit.  Don't just build the wall, deport any and all illegals the hell outta here, they are a stain on the underlying pants of society.

I stand by you President Trump. If the Dems won’t get on board . Make Mexico pay for the wall. I know you know how to do this. Cut them off. No deals. No more aid or help. No protection. Deport illegals now!! Cut off any aid and all aid to illegals now. Raise tariffs . They will be begging to pay for the wall.

I still believe we need to build a tall wall. How about we also build a deportation system next to the wall. Human slingshot or catapult comes to mind. One every mile, so the border patrol and ICE can immediately deport them back. Brutal and should be very effective. Extra points for Cactus landing fields. For every 10 illegals deported, lets launch a democrat politician over the wall too. Kind of like greasing the rails or something.

I'll pay for your ticket so you can deport yourself to Cucklandia above us.

If you want safety in America, let all the immigrants in, deport all Americans, then build the wall. Statistically, it will be a safer country that way.

In 2006 Hilary Clinton says- build the wall and deport anyone who is convicted of a crime   https://www.infowars.com/hillary-in-2006-lets-build-a-wall-deport-illegals/

In a sense, the wall merely represents the Trump administration’s worst instincts and desires. It is harmful, wasteful, and offensive, but an ineffective wall is nonetheless better than the surge of 5,000 new Border Patrol agents and 10,000 new Immigration and Customs Enforcement officers to round up and deport people that the president also wants. No wall has ever arrested, robbed, battered, or murdered nonviolent people, as immigration enforcement has. A wall will not create an interest group to lobby for itself, endorse nationalist presidential candidates, and demand more power and funding, as the Border Patrol union does. The wall is more than a symbol. It will harm the lives of thousands of border residents and immigrants while wasting billions of tax dollars. But in a world run by nationalists, the one small source of comfort for non-nationalists over the next four years may be the knowledge that it could be worse.  -  D.  Bier - Cato Institute

LaTonya Stewart Boss Great .  Congress should pass a law to deport them too.

Let’s deport democrats

Lynn Limauro Floyd A white guy drove drunk and killed my uncle. We need to deport white people too!

My son was killed by an illegal Mexican immigrant who had already been deported once for DUI. He choose to drive drunk, and killed my son while turning onto a busy street. He had no driver’s license, no car insurance.  My son was just 20 years old, less than 2 months shy of his 21st birthday. He was killed instantly. The illegal immigrant was so intoxicated, he tried to urinate on the sheriff deputy’s car. While in jail, he got a Boca Raton lawyer who took us to court to dispute the charges. My family had to live through the awful experience of a trial and details of the accident. Justice did prevail and he was incarcerated. He remains in prison for the time being, but I am concerned if ICE will deport him again, or he will be let back in the community to live amongst us. BUILD THE DAMN WALL

NO AMNESTY FOR DACAs! ....... ......  ..... ...... .......NO AMNESTY FOR TPSers! ........... ............ ........... .............. ........... ............ ........ ..... ......... ...... ...... ...... .........NO DELAYED ACTION FOR ANY FOREIGN INVADER!  .. ..................... .............. .......... ..... ...DEPORT THEM ALL!

Nandan Shah stop licking ads.he won't deport you licking ass

Our president is amazing. All that oppose him are running scared. We will prevail. We will get border security and hopefulley deport millions in the process.

Part 2 of the article I started: Terrrorists Know the U.S. Border Is Not Secure  A Costa Rican immigration service official whose jurisdiction includes the Golfito camp disclosed that at least several other U.S.-bound suspected terrorists also were pulled from this camp since Qoordheen’s March 2017 arrest, likewise based on significant derogatory U.S. counterterrorism intelligence. The Costa Rican official declined to provide specifics of the intelligence beyond that it involved terrorism, offering only that: “Most are good, but some are bad.”  The American public was never told that Qoordheen and other suspected terrorists were pulled off U.S.-bound migrant routes in distant Costa Rica and Panama because such information is usually classified or not disclosable, in line with standard practice to protect ongoing investigations and operations.  That necessary opacity, unfortunately, seems to have given life to denialism about President Trump’s claims that terrorists are among migrants from countries of terror concern, like the Middle East. The skeptics have demanded proof then cited Trump perfidy when protected intelligence wasn’t provided. Trump’s assertions were thus ridiculed and dismissed as unsupported fear-mongering.  But the rejectionists, many of whom obviously do not know that a central homeland security practice is threat preemption, are wrong. Down here, on the southern-most leg of migrant routes to the American border, it is they who invite ridicule and eye rolls.  American, Panamanian, and Costa Rican law enforcement and intelligence officials are engaged in actual programs here to hunt, investigate, and deport real terrorist suspects who are, in fact, discovered among the thousands of migrants from the Middle East, Horn of Africa, and South Asia funneling through this section of Latin America—as President Trump said and as I saw and heard on the ground.  Migrants from Bangladesh and Sri Lanka processing through Costa Ricans customs at Paso Canoas on the Panama border. They are working at it here because sheer geography pushes tens of thousands of U.S.-bound migrants from all over the world who pass from South America landing zones through these two countries as they push north. Panama and Costa Rica are chokepoints on the migrant trail where “extra-continental” travelers, as they are sometimes called at the American embassies, can become known in the greatest concentrations.  Terror Migrants Pulled From U.S. Border Routes Some acknowledgements of terror travel through these countries—and of the American efforts to mitigate it—are in public evidence, even if the underlying reporting remains confidential.  A December 19 Immigration and Customs Enforcement statement, for instance, announced the deportation of U.S.-convicted Brazil-based smuggler Sharafat Ali Khan after time served for transporting at least 100 aliens from Pakistan, Afghanistan, and Bangladesh through South and Central America to the United States. The statement offered this nugget, with the usual lack of elaboration: “Several of the individuals smuggled by Khan’s organization had suspected ties to terrorist organizations.”  The new statement seems to comport with earlier reporting by The Washington Times that one of these individuals was an Afghan involved in a plot to attack in the United States or Canada and had family ties to members of the Taliban.

Please deport all far left lunatics, they're the true danger, voting records prove it !!!

Please list the laws that citizens can ignore and get a pass for breaking. I’ll wait. Hussein Obama’s dreamers are America’s nightmare. Deport them all.

President Trump is the BEST President EVER! Trump 2020!!! Keep the government SHUTDOWN,  deport all illegal immigrants, build the wall and close the border permanently!

Right wing Trump supporters have killed over 50 on school and public area mass shootings. We need to deport all Trump supporters and impeach/remove Trump

Round them up and deport them.

Safe borders is only the first step then deport All illegals , maybe appoint all those non essential government employyees to ICE and pay them based on the number of illegals they round up for deportation.

Screw them.  Deport ALL ILLEGALS and build a WALL.

Should we deport all white people to Europe then?  Almost every single mass murderer is White.  Huh?

Sorry to hear... if the wall is already built and we have illegal immigrants inside of the country that is not the biggest problem because it is easy to find here inside the country and easy to deport...

Tell Nancy if we only use technology to secure our borders, it will use facial recognition technology which means EVERY illegal immigrant will have their data stored on all law enforcement computer databases countrywide. What does that mean? That means that ICE will be able to tap that database to locate, detain and deport many many more illegals than a simple low tech wall. Does Nancy really want to go down that path?

Thank you Mr Trump .for caring about the USA and its citizens. Build that Wall..and deport.

That's simply silliness. How many white, males have killed, maimed, tortured other U.S. citizens? Can we deport them too? No, we build prison walls and once they are released or escape or die, we consider it justice served. We don't blame the entire white, male race, do we? This is simply another example of you race hating.

The December 2017 draft memo—which Merkley shared with NBC News after receiving it from a government whistleblower—shows that Trump administration officials wanted to deport children more quickly by denying them asylum hearings after taking them away from their parents.  "It appears that they wanted to have it both ways—to separate children from their parents but deny them the full protections generally awarded to unaccompanied children," concluded ACLU attorney Lee Gelernt, who led a class-action lawsuit on behalf of migrant parents.  President Donald Trump's "child immigration strategy is immoral and comes from a dark place in the heart of this administration," Merkley declared, responding to the revelations on Twitter. "Children are NOT expendable commodities in political battles."

The best solution to deport so-called illegal immigrants would be ceasing to be No.1 in the world.

Then deport all of the insurgents currently sitting in detention. Sweep the American Southwest house by house and remove them all.

Then hurry up!  Instill e-verify, build the wall, and deport every illegal here!

There is no doubt that Pelosi will reject the President's latest offer. That being the case I would:   Immediately proclaim a national crisis and get the military building barriers.  Secondly, I would let ICE loose. By that I would have them raid thousands of businesses and immediately deport any illegals found. As a nice measure I would give a 1 week notice that these raids are about to begin. Thirdly, along with deportation I would arrest either the hiring HR director, or if no one fits that description, arrest the front line supervision for hiring illegals.   Lastly, I would implement a 25% fee on ANY monies wired to Mexico and Central America.   If the President would implement a get tough program I would guess Pelosi would come begging to finally get this immigration issue solved once and for all. This crap needs to end.

They deport illegal criminals and they keep coming back.   You can sure tell who's side the  democrats are on.      Wake up America!

Too many lives lost at the hands of Illegals! From drugs, murders, hit and runs, and drunk driving. BUILD THAT WALL NOW.  DEPORT ILLEGALS.

Trump is the Best President we've had in recent history.  Israel's Secure Fence/WALL is 99.9% effective and ours can be too, if designed right.  No more Illegals coming through and then we can go and deport all those that are in this Country illegally.  To live in America is a privilege, not a right.  Illegals have no rights, period.

Tunde Lakatos he will try to deport you too.

USA TRUMP ALL THE WAY 2024!! BUILD THE WALL!! DEPORT ALL ILLEGALS!!

USA Tax payers have been financing their very own demise. STOP doing that. Start by confiscating George Soros asset and his dark money and deport him, his family, his supporters and beneficiaries if you wish to keep your country.

We need the wall... we need to deport the illegals... iof they can't come the right way stop breaking into our country same as coming into my home or your home when we are not home breaking and entering.

We need to deport Democrats. we need to open the government. We need to protect the Border. And you mr. President keep doing the right work .🇺🇸🇺🇸MAGA 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸

We need to deport every illegal MF out of this country.

We need to simply execute illegal criminals and deport the rest to the middle East!!!

We want the damn wall. U go for it Mr President . I'm  tired of this b.s. illegals r just coming to get the benefits & to do crimes. Deport them  all

What good is the wall you have 30 million ILLEGALS here now and sanctuary cities what good is the freaking wall deport them now you fraud president then build the wall

While we are at it deport every single illegal that voted in our elections, charge every single American that processed all their write in ballots as votes.................Michael

White people kill more, deport them.  Impeach the russian backed cheating incompetent traitor.

Why must the libs stay on this side of the wall after we build it? Cant we deport these treasonous devils,its clear they hate this country? Just saying build that wall and deport anyone who doesnt like our countries freedom.

Why must the libs stay on this side of the wall after we build it? Cant we deport these treasonous devils,its clear they hate this country? Just saying build that wall and deport anyone who doesnt like our countries freedom.

Yes Mr President our country need our walls to prevent tragedies to our children and women and against every America citizens. This has started by obama changing our immigration laws to allow immigrants to enter our country illegally and able to stay and get free everything. And over congress which didn’t stop him. Just like everything he has done for them and not for the citizens. And because they themselves said they was for security and protection at our border and have a wall to keep out immigrate but to deport those here as well. So have they. Not as much as they should have. Plus it is what democrats want to do for our border but refuse to just because of who is our President.

Yes, drain the swamp and Build the wall, deport all illegals.

the IDIOT central american GANG member in the photo thinks he can evade detection if he wears an italia shirt. Dumb ILLITERATE ILLEGALS. CA is teeming with these lowlifes. BUILD THAT WALL. DEPORT THEM  ALL.  http://enewspaper.latimes.com/infinity/article_share.aspx?guid=425d841b-a4ca-4f87-86b9-df6c0829b6bf

well.,,, they. will help  but. like the. old. saying. were theres. a will ,,theres a. way,,  enforce. the. law. ,,deport ,and. arrest. ,illegals,,,

A drunk driver that was previously DEPORTED, which then made it a felony to come back. Was re arrested, but STILL out drinking and driving.

A wall is not going to stop immigrants all together!!  Let's change the laws.  No more welfare assistance, for the ones that are already here (legally and illegally) are abusing the system by having children and depending on the taxpayer to cover for their children upbringing.  Let's use technology to check all tractor trailers crossing the border full of immigrants like thermal imaging cameras, let's put some device to prevent anyone from digging tunnels.  All the immigrant already in this country, MUST SPEAK THE ENGLISH LANGUAGE, otherwise send them back, THEY MUST PAY TAXES, but most of all, THE IMMIGRANTS WHO ARE INVOLVED IN CRIMINAL ACTS MUST BE DEPORTED TO THE AUTHORITIES IN THEIR COUNTRY!!  Even the immigrants criminals are being supported at the expense of taxpayer.

Albert Kojo Kyekye, come here Trump will happily deport you..and if you're not deported you'll pay double In health care..and live paycheck to paycheck...

Alison Edwards Lorentz DACA was unconstitutional. I really think DACA will not benefit America in anyway. All of them including all visa overstays and illegals immigrants need to be deported.

Americans face consequences,  illegals do not.  They get deported only to run right back.  And....how many children are trafficked across that border every year?

Americans face consequences.  Illegals get deported and come right back. And....what about all the children that get trafficked through that border?  Oh I forgot, our country no longer cares about children

An illegal alien who had been deported 7 times killed my best friends ONLY child along with another young girl that night. He simply just snuck back in every time. Can’t help but wonder if it hadn’t been so easy to sneak back in if those poor girls would still be here.

An illegal immigrant killed my Uncle. Had been deported twice.

An illegal immigrant killed my boyfriends sister while driving illegally and driving drunk... this is after he was deported 2 times, and still came back again

And they have consequences.  They do get deported so they can come right back and do it again.  Maybe if we took care of Americans and focused on mental health, we could save some lives.  There's an idiot idea

Anyone here capable of defending ICE after arresting a former marine named Jilmar Ramos? US born, served in the Marines. Returned from Afghanistan with PTSD. He was arrested for starting a fire after having an episode and he got sent to ICE detention and was ready to be deported. A US BORN MARINE ABOUT TO BE DEPORTED. When will you idiots realize this is a race war, not an immigration war. It’s about being brown and poor, not about being illegal.

Anyone here capable of defending ICE after arresting a former marine named Jilmar Ramos? US born, served in the Marines. Returned from Afghanistan with PTSD. He was arrested for starting a fire after having an episode and he got sent to ICE detention and was ready to be deported. A US BORN MARINE ABOUT TO BE DEPORTED. When will you idiots realize this is a race war, not an immigration war. It’s about being brown and poor, not about being illegal.

BLAME THE TRAITOR DEMOCRATS FOR FIRST FAVORING AND PROTECTING ALL ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS WITH A SANCTUARY STATE LAW. NOW ALL ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS CAN COMFORTABLY DO A CRIME. EASILY GET FREE KICK BACK TIME WITH FREE ROOM AND BOARD BED INCLUDED AND GET REWARDED WITH NOT BEING DEPORTED. WE LOVE YOU LAURA TRUMP ❤ SORRY FOR YOUR PRECIOUS LOST MARY ANN ALL ANGEL'S FAMILIES.

But our citizens have consequences.   They get deported, only to come back and do it again

Cathy Rohrer-Mackenrodt  first illegal aliens not immigrants and 2nd even though this sounds crazy it's not illegal to be illegal in our country. It has always been they can only be deported if they commit a felony.

Cindy Kidder Foster you republicans need to stop spreading those lies. Obama had more illegals deported then any other. You need to come to the times and see the truth. Donnie is not the truth

Close the border and stop legal and illegal immigration until all the illegals are deported no matter where they are from. Don't reopen the borders or immigration until the southern border is secure and we have a better way to round up folks who overstay their VISAs. It is ridiculous how sorry our government is performing. They screw up everything they have their get their hands on.

DACA is disappointing. First: We've had 7 amnesty programs since 1986. If ANYONE was had the opportunity at amnesty and didn't take it - then it should be off the table for them (for kids, I'd give it 2). Second: Anyone that has been here 5 years or less does not have ties to this country - they still have ties to their former country - deport them! So you are dealing with people from 2000-2013. Then ALL DACA applicants must be vetted - if they have committted ANY other crime - they are deported. Third: They should NEVER gain citizenship, a green card to allow them to stay maybe, but not citizenship. Breaking the  law should never be rewarded like that. Fourth: They should be ineligible for welfare. Fifth: Their ability to stay should not be the reason for parents, siblings, aunts, uncles to stay....it should not be a means to chain migration. We, as a country, need to send a strong message to the rest of the world - we welcome LEGAL immigrants, but if you come illegally you WILL BE deported!

DACA is disappointing. First: We've had 7 amnesty programs since 1986. If ANYONE was had the opportunity at amnesty and didn't take it - then it should be off the table for them (for kids, I'd give it 2). Second: Anyone that has been here 5 years or less does not have ties to this country - they still have ties to their former country - deport them! So you are dealing with people from 2000-2013. Then ALL DACA applicants must be vetted - if they have committted ANY other crime - they are deported. Third: They should NEVER gain citizenship, a green card to allow them to stay maybe, but not citizenship. Breaking the  law should never be rewarded like that. Fourth: They should be ineligible for welfare. Fifth: Their ability to stay should not be the reason for parents, siblings, aunts, uncles to stay....it should not be a means to chain migration. We, as a country, need to send a strong message to the rest of the world - we welcome LEGAL immigrants, but if you come illegally you WILL BE deported!

Formerly deported, but came back to Adams County PA.  https://fox43.com/2019/02/15/mexican-citizen-accused-of-raping-child-in-adams-county/

HOW MANY white Americans shoot up schools, concerts, churches, movie theaters and cause mass murders. Get your priorities straight. Immigrants keep a low profile, working hard at jobs like at your golf clubs that no Americans will do trying to evade felonies that get them deported.

Hailey King was my 18 year old cousin. She was left in the street to die by an illegal who hit her and her friend on a Scooter. He was doing over 70 MPH in a 35 zone. After he hit them from behind, throwing Hailey onto his windshield and falling in the street he continued to drag her friend and the Scooter for Blocks until his legs were torn off. Hailey had a Baby girl that will never know her Mommy's voice and her friend is a double amputee.The illegal immigrant that is supposed to be deported at the end of his prison term(originally 17 years) will be out of prison in 2021 (2 yrs for a life and pair of legs), do you want him in your neighborhood? Would you trade places with my family? I stand with my President! Thank you and God Bless you President Donald J. Trump. #ChristianforTrump

Here's a true story and a very sad one at that.  A few years ago in my city, a young mother was viciously gunned down by her own father who had snuck back into this country after already being deported.  He snuck in and killed his own daughter all because he felt disrespected because she was dating an older man.  So yeah, I'm all for the wall.

Hey when they get deported it helps make it harder to get back into the United states. We can fight them but the problem is they just come back with out a wall

How does one have a criminal past but not be deported if they did not have legal documents to stay here? This is more then just a wall. The justice system sucks and needs fixing.

However stats have proven over and over again that citizens commit way more crimes than illegals. I would think many of the illegals that do come here also get their guns here since it's so easy to do so. However I am against illegal immigration but the majority of our mass shootings are caused by white American citizens. President Obama deported more illegals than any other president. It's not the crisis that Trump's conning his base to believe. Stats show immigration from the southern border is the lowest in 50 years. Many of the suspected terrorist that have entered this country, came through Canada. Trump is conning his base lmao

I agree Build The WALL send gun choppers down to patrol our Border and warning shots to stay away from our Borders. Call up their President and Mexican President and start charging fines. Change the Tampered Language Obama , Clinton’s, Pelosi, Schumer changed to make it open Border to allow Mexican, Middle-Easterners and Central Americans Ect. All to enter the U.S.A. Stop allowing so many in , or to come here at all Crime is rampant ! Rape then murder, it’s appalling! We are only one Country get them out of our Government they are tearing our Country to pieces. Be more like Poland . No  strangers are allowed to mass invade and come in on their families and citizens to do them harm by diseases, rape, murder, illegally/ or other wise unvetted. Traitors speaking against us the American people we will not give up our guns to protect ourselves with, we will not submit to or obey an ideology that goes against our Christian Beliefs they should be deported out our Country . No to Sharia Law it is incompatible with the Constitution of the U.S.A. Mc Carran-Walters Act 1952. Thomas Jefferson V. Muslim Pirates.1800s.

I agree and proud that you had an 18 year employee and who was employee of the month 13 times  wow  still kept to your conviction had the man deported !!  Can't say your not fair.  Now I know you will do the same with Melania's Family who got in via Chain Migration again because your a fair President and not the self serving hypocrite that anyone with an ounce of intelligence knows you are.   MAGA.

I am sorry for your loss, but that American can face the charges, instead of being protected by sanctuary cities or deported,  only to come right back.

I still believe we need to build a tall wall. How about we also build a deportation system next to the wall. Human slingshot or catapult comes to mind. One every mile, so the border patrol and ICE can immediately deport them back. Brutal and should be very effective. Extra points for Cactus landing fields. For every 10 illegals deported, lets launch a democrat politician over the wall too. Kind of like greasing the rails or something.

I support the wall 100%.  I have lived next door to these illegals that tormented my family for years.  The wall needs to be built, fully monitored, and the illegals on this side deported.  Cut off all the free stuff they received including education for their children, which they use as child care services while they work.  They raid the food banks every week that is suppose to be for U.S. Citizens that need help.  The schools are providing three meals a day with a food kit for the kids to have food over the weekend.  While the parents spend their money on lots of beer and parties instead of feeding their own kids.

I was injured in a car accident caused by an illegal immigrant. 13 years later I still have mobility issues because of it. A couple months before, a cop who was a member at my church was shot and killed during a routine traffic stop. He was murdered by a kid who was deported 9 times. He left behind a wife and infant. I am a supporter of the wall! Thank you Trump!

ILLEGALS NEED TO BE DEPORTED FOR THIS STUFF!!  Not put in jail, DEPORTED and if necessary their whole family, maybe then they'll catch on to LAWS are made for a reason and you need to obey or GO!!

ILLEGALS NEED TO BE DEPORTED FOR THIS STUFF!!  Not put in jail, DEPORTED and if necessary their whole family, maybe then they'll catch on to LAWS are made for a reason and you need to obey or GO!!

If Walls don't work, why do I have to have one around my Pool? Why are Walls around Schools and Day Cares? Why did Disney put one around their lakes? Why do Over 55 Communities have Walls and Guard Stations? Why does the Democratic Party have one around their Building? Get the point? President Donald J. Trump, if you have to shut the government down in order to get our Wall that will provide the safety and National Security that All Americans are entitled too, do whatever it takes! How many more loved ones do we have to bury before the Democrats do their job? My family buried an 18 year old American girl and her American 20 year old companion is a double leg amputee. Oh, the criminal illegal immigrant that is supposed to be deported at the end of his prison term(originally 17 years) will be out of prison in 2021 (2 yrs for a life and pair of legs), do you want him in your neighborhood? Here’s the Senate switchboard: (202) 224-3121. Call your Senator. Tell them you stand with the President. Demand the wall. #BuildOurWall

I’m disabled because an illegal took a short cut across a California highway. Not even deported, 7 different I.Ds. I got nothing and he’s still driving around!!!!!!!

Last year there were 40,000 firearm related deaths on the US. Last year the Trump administration overturned environmental protection statutes and workplace safety regulations. Meanwhile, people without legal resident status actually have one of the lowest crime rates in the country- precisely because they don’t want to risk being deported. If Trump truly wanted to make American families safe he would implement stricter gun laws, reinstate laws that ensure clean water and safe food, and protect workers from dangerous working conditions. But we all know he couldn’t care less about actually making American families safe. #AmericaDeservesBetter

Lost another irrational fb yesterday over this issue.  She called the President the “liar in chief” and accused me of having a “hateful heart” when I said that an illegal Dominican drug lord who lives in my hometown in RI, and has been arrested multiple times, should be deported.  🙄  Unfriended her! Why are people lacking common sense?  The wall isn’t going to solve all the problems if states (like RI and MA) refuse to send illegals that are arrested to ICE for deportation.

Mentioned  before holidays.  Three Mexican immigrants busted selling meth. One life the other 18 and 20 yrs. Million each to keep in the prison system.  Then they can be deported. Not to mentioned attorneys have to be paid to defend them. Build the wall.

My friend was stabbed 40 times the illegal was just deported to Mexico.  That was his punishment.  And you wonder why I fight for the wall?

My son was killed by an illegal Mexican immigrant who had already been deported once for DUI. He choose to drive drunk, and killed my son while turning onto a busy street. He had no driver’s license, no car insurance.  My son was just 20 years old, less than 2 months shy of his 21st birthday. He was killed instantly. The illegal immigrant was so intoxicated, he tried to urinate on the sheriff deputy’s car. While in jail, he got a Boca Raton lawyer who took us to court to dispute the charges. My family had to live through the awful experience of a trial and details of the accident. Justice did prevail and he was incarcerated. He remains in prison for the time being, but I am concerned if ICE will deport him again, or he will be let back in the community to live amongst us. BUILD THE DAMN WALL

Not Enough. Look, Boss, I'm sorry, but, these bastards have to be deported and their enablers, the "sanctuary state" secessionists, must be vanquished.

President Trump.. please close our borders and order all illegals to be deported to open up jobs for our military men and women whom you are bringing home. #AmericaFirst!

Sorry for you loss. Illegals should be deported immediately.

Surely their is funding somewhere for the completion of the wall and a military presence there, and get people back to work without having to depend upon the Deplorable Dems. Those who came illegally should be deported unless they apply for asylum at THEIR US embassy where they can be heard quickly and be housed and protected in lieu at that site until their onsite asylum hearing.NO BENEFITS for those who cross illegally, they should be deported to their local US embassy immediately.

Surely their is funding somewhere for the completion of the wall and a military presence there, and get people back to work without having to depend upon the Deplorable Dems. Those who came illegally should be deported unless they apply for asylum at THEIR US embassy where they can be heard quickly and be housed and protected in lieu at that site until their onsite asylum hearing.NO BENEFITS for those who cross illegally, they should be deported to their local US embassy immediately.

Taylor Embree, killed by a three time deported illegal DUI convict; Bakersfield, CA.   This bullshit has to stop.  The American people have had enough.

The Democrats are so full of crap. My niece was the victim of an illegal. He had been deported 3 times prior to shooting her in the face with a stolen police officer’s gun and killed her. He was a drug dealer to boot.  He sold heroin and cocaine. Each time he was deported he was back within days. He wasn’t here to seek the good life and he ultimately damaged my family, almost beyond repair. There is a border crisis. It is not a manufactured crisis. It is the Democrats who are having a tantrum. I am furious! Mr. President DO NOT BACK DOWN!!! 🤬

The Democrats are so full of crap. My niece was the victim of an illegal. He had been deported 3 times prior to shooting her in the face with a stolen police officer’s gun and killed her. He was a drug dealer to boot.  He sold heroin and cocaine. Each time he was deported he was back within days. He wasn’t here to seek the good life and he ultimately damaged my family, almost beyond repair. There is a border crisis. It is not a manufactured crisis. It is the Democrats who are having a tantrum. I am furious! Mr. President DO NOT BACK DOWN!!! 🤬

The Statue of Liberty welcomed every ship bound for Ellis Island, it’s size and position in the harbor shouted Welcome to the United States of America.   Those emigrating  to this country PAID (yes, paid!) to board a ship as a passenger at their port of departure. There was never a guarantee that their paid passage would not end up with one or all of their family members being returned. They were not required to have a passport or visa. However, they were REQUIRED to enter this country LEGALLY. Incoming ships to the port of New York were stopped at a small island off the coast of Staten Island prior to being received at Ellis Island. Inspectors would board the ships to vet passengers who were deemed mentally or physically ill or any who were involved in criminal activity. Those passengers deemed a threat to the well being of our country, were NOT gained entry. The remainder of the passengers were forwarded to Ellis Island where they were processed. Thousands of immigrants arrived daily to Ellis Island and in most cases their processing took only a few hours and then immigrants were released to acquire citizenship (which most did) Those who were cleared to enter the USA were directed to rail transportation in order to connect with their DOCUMENTED SPONSOR. Immigrants waiting to be processed were afforded the opportunity to BUY ( yes buy - not given) food at the Ellis Island commissary after exchanging their currency.  Those who were detained for health reasons were placed in a holding pattern and were given food and drink for free. If a child over the age of 12 was denied entry due to illness, they were sent back to their country of origin ALONE via ship. Those under 12  who were not deemed healthy enough to stay were SENT BACK to their country of origin with one parent. Children and adults requiring any type of medical attention were sometimes held in the infirmary and were CHARGED A FEE (Yes they paid) for any medical services. My great grandparents along with millions of those who emigrated here from various countries did so by LEGAL means and were not afforded a free ride, nor did they expect anything for free except entering a country where all citizens lived freely.  When they arrived, family took care of family. I am proud of my Italian/Irish ancestry. Reopen Port(s) of legal entry similar to Ellis Island and apply those same rules. In addition, those who fail to enter legally through the legal port(s) of entry will be denied citizenship forever and remain deported.  Allow all illegals presently living here to be processed in a similar fashion.  If they have been receiving assistance from the government and have not obtained work,  make a mandatory military service of 2 years minimum to gain immediate citizenship. Any new citizen convicted of a major crime within one year of obtaining a citizenship will be deported. As an employee working at the World Trade Center, I survived two terror attacks. How I remember the flags waving and the “we will never forget” signs, post 9/11. How quickly everyone forgets. I will never forget the numerous funerals I attended, nor the fear I still live with to this day from what I witnessed. Welcome to the United States of America to all those who wish to do so legally and are willing to give back to this country by working and making this great land of immigrants a prosperous and safe place for future generations.   God Bless the USA!!

The Statue of Liberty welcomed every ship bound for Ellis Island, it’s size and position in the harbor shouted Welcome to the United States of America.   Those emigrating  to this country PAID (yes, paid!) to board a ship as a passenger at their port of departure. There was never a guarantee that their paid passage would not end up with one or all of their family members being returned. They were not required to have a passport or visa. However, they were REQUIRED to enter this country LEGALLY. Incoming ships to the port of New York were stopped at a small island off the coast of Staten Island prior to being received at Ellis Island. Inspectors would board the ships to vet passengers who were deemed mentally or physically ill or any who were involved in criminal activity. Those passengers deemed a threat to the well being of our country, were NOT gained entry. The remainder of the passengers were forwarded to Ellis Island where they were processed. Thousands of immigrants arrived daily to Ellis Island and in most cases their processing took only a few hours and then immigrants were released to acquire citizenship (which most did) Those who were cleared to enter the USA were directed to rail transportation in order to connect with their DOCUMENTED SPONSOR. Immigrants waiting to be processed were afforded the opportunity to BUY ( yes buy - not given) food at the Ellis Island commissary after exchanging their currency.  Those who were detained for health reasons were placed in a holding pattern and were given food and drink for free. If a child over the age of 12 was denied entry due to illness, they were sent back to their country of origin ALONE via ship. Those under 12  who were not deemed healthy enough to stay were SENT BACK to their country of origin with one parent. Children and adults requiring any type of medical attention were sometimes held in the infirmary and were CHARGED A FEE (Yes they paid) for any medical services. My great grandparents along with millions of those who emigrated here from various countries did so by LEGAL means and were not afforded a free ride, nor did they expect anything for free except entering a country where all citizens lived freely.  When they arrived, family took care of family. I am proud of my Italian/Irish ancestry. Reopen Port(s) of legal entry similar to Ellis Island and apply those same rules. In addition, those who fail to enter legally through the legal port(s) of entry will be denied citizenship forever and remain deported.  Allow all illegals presently living here to be processed in a similar fashion.  If they have been receiving assistance from the government and have not obtained work,  make a mandatory military service of 2 years minimum to gain immediate citizenship. Any new citizen convicted of a major crime within one year of obtaining a citizenship will be deported. As an employee working at the World Trade Center, I survived two terror attacks. How I remember the flags waving and the “we will never forget” signs, post 9/11. How quickly everyone forgets. I will never forget the numerous funerals I attended, nor the fear I still live with to this day from what I witnessed. Welcome to the United States of America to all those who wish to do so legally and are willing to give back to this country by working and making this great land of immigrants a prosperous and safe place for future generations.   God Bless the USA!!

The problem is when the immigrant doesn't face any charges because they are here illegally.   My uncle was killed in aurora colorado. He was hit by an illegal alien who was driving drunk without a license. The courts commuted his ENTIRE sentence so that he could be deported. So he is probably in mexico drinking beers with his friends while my aunt and cousins have no father or husband.

There is a 10yr old an hour from here that would like to give her opinion but she can't. She was picked up at church and then raped, killed and her body stuffed down a well. The person who did it had been deported multiple times with an assault record.  Can you imagine how hard she was screaming and crying as she was being raped and then being silenced as she was murdered in cold blood. This was preventable. Now tell me how this was not preventable? She was only ten. She had her own dreams.

There were numerous serial killers and guess what? They r mostly white! So should they have gotten deported too?

This is why we need a wall. Here are some of the victims stories. Some of these people who are murdered were murdered by illegals who were previously deported. http://www.ojjpac.org/memorial.asp

To the democrats every illegal is a family looking for a better life, to the republicans it's a gang banger whose been deported 3 times before, or an ISIS terrorist in disguise. Truth is its both, good people and bad people. But we cannot help the good people until stop the bad people with a wall and make everyone go through at least as much security as at an airport.

Tony Perez are you upset because your drug dealer got deported

We need illegals deported just as, if not more so than the wall.

What a lie Trump signed bill allowing million illegal communist south American 's to come to USA and never be deported Mr Trump walls derverison so Trump and other traitors screw USA flooding USA with commies south American 's

YOU DO HAVE A CHOICE! --->Donald Trump can me a canadian citizen please have a sliver of the northwest angle? we can share the land with you please! 120 people are usa citizens there that cant get to canada they will have dual citizenship if you do this!!! this will make us all legal immigrants it will solve everything! Its a flaw in the map that benjamin franklin made and didnt finish the map before he passed away do this before canada closes and usa moves in and leaves you or even worse family investigations for more deporting !!! we are all family noone should be deported!!! Theres no time to waste do it before everything is destroyed please!!!? WE NEED EACHOTHER!!!# I Dont want to have to leave!!! I dont deserve it nor anybody else i dont want to stay here with usa citizens in a tent! We deserve more than that all of us!!! Please iam begging you!!! I dont want usa citizens in poverty like me here its horrible!!! 😭😭😭😭😭😭Please?! I cant even send a 100 dollars to a philipino girl in the phillipines for food or ill get charged for fraud. https://youtu.be/WGKU8awk7VgThis Land Is Your Landyoutube.com

it's amazing how he was deported but managed to get back to the US, managed to get a car and drive around!!!! omg how could the authority let him do that so freely??? the state should be sued for this!

The trial of drug kingpin El Chapo shows how useless a wall would be in stopping drug trafficking https://www.businessinsider.com/el-chapo-trial-shows-a-wall-wont-stop-drugs-from-crossing-the-border-2019-1

Barbara Hansen it will save billions of dollars.. article from may of 2016: “Criminal aliens — non-citizens who commit crimes — are a growing threat to public safety and national security, as well as a drain on our scarce criminal justice resources. In 1980, our federal and state prisons housed fewer than 9,000 criminal aliens. Today, about 55,000 criminal aliens account for more than one-fourth of prisoners in Federal Bureau of Prisons facilities, and there are about 297,000 criminal aliens incarcerated in state and local prisons. That number represents about 16.4 percent of the state and local prison population compared to the 12.9 percent of the total population comprised of foreign-born residents.

My son was killed by an illegal Mexican immigrant who had already been deported once for DUI. He choose to drive drunk, and killed my son while turning onto a busy street. He had no driver’s license, no car insurance.  My son was just 20 years old, less than 2 months shy of his 21st birthday. He was killed instantly. The illegal immigrant was so intoxicated, he tried to urinate on the sheriff deputy’s car. While in jail, he got a Boca Raton lawyer who took us to court to dispute the charges. My family had to live through the awful experience of a trial and details of the accident. Justice did prevail and he was incarcerated. He remains in prison for the time being, but I am concerned if ICE will deport him again, or he will be let back in the community to live amongst us. BUILD THE DAMN WALL

POS Fake Dictator Wannabe in Chief. Your days as a free punk are number. You will incarcerated for the rest of your miserable days in a military prison for crimes against this country. Mark my words. G

We want more than that Mr. President, we want the swamp criminals in DC that have been selling our country out all these years to be prosecuted and incarcerated!

Why can't we Send those who have to do Court ordered community Service work or who are incarcerated and in the overcrowed prisions that taxpayers are paying for to clean up the trash in the National parks.  They get paid 3 square meals a day, a bed, a roof over their head, libraries, gyms, tvs and game rooms...  There is No reason they shouldn't be put immediatly on a guarded clean up detail.  They can re pay with Civil Service duties. Put the tracker ankle bracelets & wrist bands on  them while being watched with armed guards and put them in tgere to do clean up work.  However ... It's a shame people cant take a trash bag in on their own or are so lazy and not more considerate to pick up after themselves to begin with.

"An anguished question from a Trump supporter: "Why do liberals think Trump supporters are stupid?" The serious answer: Here’s what we really think about Trump supporters - the rich, the poor, the malignant and the innocently well-meaning, the ones who think and the ones who don't... That when you saw a man who had owned a fraudulent University, intent on scamming poor people, you thought "Fine." That when you saw a man who had made it his business practice to stiff his creditors, you said, "Okay." That when you heard him proudly brag about his own history of sexual abuse, you said, "No problem." That when he made up stories about seeing muslim-Americans in the thousands cheering the destruction of the World Trade Center, you said, "Not an issue." That when you saw him brag that he could shoot a man on Fifth Avenue and you wouldn't care, you chirped, "He sure knows me." That when you heard him illustrate his own character by telling that cute story about the elderly guest bleeding on the floor at his country club, the story about how he turned his back and how it was all an imposition on him, you said, "That's cool!" That when you saw him mock the disabled, you thought it was the funniest thing you ever saw. That when you heard him brag that he doesn't read books, you said, "Well, who has time?" That when the Central Park Five were compensated as innocent men convicted of a crime they didn't commit, and he angrily said that they should still be in prison, you said, "That makes sense." That when you heard him tell his supporters to beat up protesters and that he would hire attorneys, you thought, "Yes!" That when you heard him tell one rally to confiscate a man's coat before throwing him out into the freezing cold, you said, "What a great guy!" That you have watched the parade of neo-Nazis and white supremacists with whom he curries favor, while refusing to condemn outright Nazis, and you have said, "Thumbs up!" That you hear him unable to talk to foreign dignitaries without insulting their countries and demanding that they praise his electoral win, you said, "That's the way I want my President to be." That you have watched him remove expertise from all layers of government in favor of people who make money off of eliminating protections in the industries they're supposed to be regulating and you have said, "What a genius!" That you have heard him continue to profit from his businesses, in part by leveraging his position as President, to the point of overcharging the Secret Service for space in the properties he owns, and you have said, "That's smart!" That you have heard him say that it was difficult to help Puerto Rico because it was the middle of water and you have said, "That makes sense." That you have seen him start fights with every country from Canada to New Zealand while praising Russia and quote, "falling in love" with the dictator of North Korea, and you have said, "That's statesmanship!" That Trump separated children from their families and put them in cages, managed to lose track of 1500 kids. has opened a tent city incarceration camp in the desert in Texas - he explains that they’re just “animals” - and you say, “well, ok then.” That you have witnessed all the thousand and one other manifestations of corruption and low moral character and outright animalistic rudeness and contempt for you, the working American voter, and you still show up grinning and wearing your MAGA hats and threatening to beat up anybody who says otherwise. What you don't get, Trump supporters in 2019, is that succumbing to frustration and thinking of you as stupid may be wrong and unhelpful, but it's also...hear me...charitable. Because if you're NOT stupid, we must turn to other explanations, and most of them are less flattering." ~ A friend of a friend of a friend, perfectly expressing my thoughts on this.

"Illegal Immigrant" is just a nice way of saying criminal,,There are thousands of people in prison for lesser crimes.

AMERICANS WANT TRUMP IN PRISON FOR TREASON

America's high priority is for you to be in prison where you belong..

American's want Hillary in prison and the US to stop playing sugar-daddy to every shyster country on the planet. But none of that seems to be happening.  PS: they also want the goddamn swamp drained, not re-arranged.

Americans now issue new compromise proposal.  Screw the Democrats.  No Amnesty.  Have the Military START BUILDING THE WALL, but do not announce it.  We don't give a damn about what the Democrat criminals say.  Build a WALL, not steel slats.  Keep the government shut!  Do not let the pressure off of the Democrat criminals. Start deporting the 11 million ILLEGAL ALIENS brought in through no fault of the American people.  And by the way, its more like 35 million, not 11 million.  This is our final offer.  The next step is to put Chuck and Nancy in prison in Guantanimo.

Americans want you out of the Oval Office and in prison.

Angela Lynne pawns ?? So tell me , your husband works at a prison ?? They have walls right ? Big ones ? Razor fence ? Armed security ?? Hmmmmmm sage thing our border needs .. once it happens for us all , then the shutdown will be over

As for me, seeing trump in prison

Barbara Hansen it will save billions of dollars.. article from may of 2016: “Criminal aliens — non-citizens who commit crimes — are a growing threat to public safety and national security, as well as a drain on our scarce criminal justice resources. In 1980, our federal and state prisons housed fewer than 9,000 criminal aliens. Today, about 55,000 criminal aliens account for more than one-fourth of prisoners in Federal Bureau of Prisons facilities, and there are about 297,000 criminal aliens incarcerated in state and local prisons. That number represents about 16.4 percent of the state and local prison population compared to the 12.9 percent of the total population comprised of foreign-born residents.

Benedict Donald, you are a liar, coward and TRAITOR. Prepare for prison in 2019.

Benedict Donald, you are a liar, thief, coward and con artist. Oh, I almost forgot that you are also a TRAITOR! Your melodramatic reality TV stunts won't distract justice from catching up with you. Prepare for prison in 2019.

Border Crossings  - IF YOU CROSS THE NORTH KOREAN BORDER ILLEGALLY YOU GET 12  YEARS  HARD LABOR.  - IF YOU CROSS THE IRANIAN BORDER ILLEGALLY YOU ARE DETAINED INDEFINITELY.  - IF YOU CROSS THE AFGHAN BORDER ILLEGALLY, YOU GET SHOT.  - IF YOU CROSS THE SAUDI ARABIAN BORDER ILLEGALLY YOU WILL BE  JAILED.  - IF YOU CROSS THE CHINESE BORDER ILLEGALLY YOU MAY NEVER BE HEARD FROM AGAIN.  - IF YOU CROSS THE VENEZUELAN BORDER ILLEGALLY YOU WILL BE BRANDED A SPY AND YOUR FATE WILL BE SEALED.  - IF YOU CROSS THE CUBAN BORDER ILLEGALLY YOU WILL BE THROWN INTO POLITICAL PRISON TO ROT.  - IF YOU CROSS THE U.S. BORDER ILLEGALLY YOU GET:   1 - A JOB,  2 - A DRIVERS LICENSE,   3 - SOCIAL SECURITY CARD,   4 - WELFARE,  5 - FOOD STAMPS,  6 - CREDIT CARDS,  7 - SUBSIDIZED RENT OR A LOAN TO BUY A HOUSE,  8 - FREE EDUCATION,  9 - FREE HEALTH CARE, 10 - A LOBBYIST IN WASHINGTON , 11 - BILLIONS OF DOLLARS WORTH OF PUBLIC DOCUMENTS PRINTED IN YOUR LANGUAGE, 12 - AND THE RIGHT TO CARRY YOUR COUNTRY'S FLAG WHILE YOU PROTEST THAT YOU DON'T GET ENOUGH RESPECT.  I JUST WANTED TO MAKE SURE I HAD A FIRM GRASP ON THE SITUATION...

Build the Wall! Hillary for Prison !

Build the damn wall!  Declare national emergency, put her and  Chuck in prison for treason and build the wall. Don't back down! Enough of the illegal aliens and drugs pouring in destroying our country.

But you did NOTHING in your first two years in office! Meanwhile, more than 1,500 criminal aliens were CONVICTED of homicide and more than 3,700 CONVICTED of sexual assault. (SOURCE: Dept. of Homeland Security, testimony presented to Congress in an open hearing. July 2018) ... But you and Jared focused on getting the prison reform bill passed -- which was a high priority for Dems -- without demanding they provide funding for the wall. Pathetic.

COMRADE TRUMP FOR PRISON 2019 ...MAGA !!!

COMRADE TRUMP FOR PRISON 2019...MAGA !!!

DAY 2 of NATIONAL EMERGENCY:  - The President of the United States, flanked by his wife and fellow billionaires, arrive at Trump International Golf Club in West Palm Beach, FL to play golf, have fun, and spend taxpayer money.  - Asylum seeking children remain in prison camps

Defending our border doesn’t require a wall.   Defending our country from YOU will require a wall. A prison wall.

Do you feel like all the drugs that have been pouring into this country and all the gun runners crossing into America and the gangs that keep people from leaving their homes after dark speaks to being safe?  There was a day when parents were not fearful of the kids playing ball in the yard or walking to the corner store for a treat OR the ice cream man? Today children are not free to live like the days of yesterday because this is now the home of drugs evil and destruction.  It is a terrifying place for people.  We are no longer the home of the free.  We are not free.  We are slaves to our government and the other riff raff who do not belong any place but prison or sent to the place they ran from to bring terror and destruction to a place that was once proud and strong and clean.  If government would do the job we elected them to do without being the greed ravaged froup it has become America could be great again.  But the Lord will have to return to clean up the mess now.

Donald Trump for Prison 2020

Donald Trump for Prison 2020 https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2019/01/08/paul-manafort-robert-mueller-plea-deal-russia-investigation/2485091002/Paul Manafort, President Trump's former campaign chief, accused of lying about sharing polling data with Russianusatoday.com

Dummycrats for prison 2019

Emil Dörr he's not going to prison, it will be too full of Obama and his entire administration.

Enjoy prison as we clean up your mess.

Enjoy your prison walls https://www.yahoo.com/news/ex-trump-lawyer-rigging-polls-direction-trump-142621277.html

Erin Curry Bayhan he will get paid, but when I put gas in car, buy groceries, pay my mortgage, electric etc they aren’t going to take an IOU. Fortunately we have savings for now, but there are many couples that work at the prison and single parents who need their paycheck. I’m over both sides and the blame game, I just want this to all end. It is a sad day in our country for sure.

Every Single Democrat has Walls around their homes!! Along with Security with guns!! So they don’t live in the neighborhoods across our Country and they have Walls and Body Guards Many!! If they don’t believe Walls Works their houses wouldn’t just have Big Walls but unbelievable Security!! Also important information is their family is protected by their security and Walls! The Americans don’t Matter to Anyone of Them!! They have Their own healthcare not what every American has and can’t afford Medications ect.. Our American children Must Pay for Colleges but illegals don’t, They aren’t held responsible for Crimes under hold and release. American People under Drunk Driving Laws are jailed if you kill someone under the influence ( it’s Murder by Our Laws) Prison People!!!

False logic. An illegal immigrant may harm your family and therefore we need a wall. It’s like saying you burnt the chicken and now I don’t like pizza. Yes, we need border security. No, Donald Dump isn’t the person to provide even the illusion of safety. We have never been so weak and vulnerable as we are now. A wall won’t change that. For probably the first time in my life, I agree with Anne Coulter. The emergency is the idiot occupying the WhiteHouse!! RESIGN ALREADY!!!!! Either way, we both know, you are going to do jail time. They generally don’t like people that are traitors in prison.

Francine, like Prison walls, they won't keep the criminals out :D great metaphor though ;)

GET THE BALL ROLLING IN THE DIRECTION OF MUELLER, CLINTON AND OBAMA FOR THEIR CRIMES AND LYING DURING THE CLINTON EMAIL SCANDEL.  WE WANT JUSTICE AND THEM IN PRISON FOR THE UNTHINKABLE CRIMES.

Hailey King was my 18 year old cousin. She was left in the street to die by an illegal who hit her and her friend on a Scooter. He was doing over 70 MPH in a 35 zone. After he hit them from behind, throwing Hailey onto his windshield and falling in the street he continued to drag her friend and the Scooter for Blocks until his legs were torn off. Hailey had a Baby girl that will never know her Mommy's voice and her friend is a double amputee.The illegal immigrant that is supposed to be deported at the end of his prison term(originally 17 years) will be out of prison in 2021 (2 yrs for a life and pair of legs), do you want him in your neighborhood? Would you trade places with my family? I stand with my President! Thank you and God Bless you President Donald J. Trump. #ChristianforTrump

Hailey King was my 18 year old cousin. She was left in the street to die by an illegal who hit her and her friend on a Scooter. He was doing over 70 MPH in a 35 zone. After he hit them from behind, throwing Hailey onto his windshield and falling in the street he continued to drag her friend and the Scooter for Blocks until his legs were torn off. Hailey had a Baby girl that will never know her Mommy's voice and her friend is a double amputee.The illegal immigrant that is supposed to be deported at the end of his prison term(originally 17 years) will be out of prison in 2021 (2 yrs for a life and pair of legs), do you want him in your neighborhood? Would you trade places with my family? I stand with my President! Thank you and God Bless you President Donald J. Trump. #ChristianforTrump

He can't run from prison!!

Heidi Dudek you are delusional you need to chk facts you are literally talking outa your asss !! Show me sources that state such bullshit !! Do you even know who blocked women’s Equal rights amendment to our constitution? Republican conservatives! Dont be mislead by stupidity! Trump n his campaign managers and chosen cabinet members are literally either in prison or on their way to it for criminal activity on behalf of your cult leader !! Omg the stupidity on this feed ffs ! History has shown economy has always done better under dems national debt has been decreased by more dems !  Trump has increased it !  And just a fyi im not a dem ive been registered republican for yrs ! but after them backing this moronic  idiot in the house now ! Never again !

Hillary's going to prison soon, Obama next. My guess is Obama will be more than happy to pick up the soap.

How do drugs get into prison if they have walls?

I HAVE REACHED THE EXALTED POSITION OF A HATE MONGER [According to Facebook].  Basically, Facebook Deems That Any of My Posts [In the Parlance of Terms and Conditions Are in ANY WAY UNFLATTERING with Regard to Illegal Aliens / Other Citizens] Are to Be Considered as HATE SPEECH AND WILL NOT BE POSTED.  The Offending Posts Are Shaded in Grey and Will Be Destroyed When I Leave the Web Page on Which the Post Was Entered.  This Flies in the Name of Logic as Many of My Posts ARE COMPRISED OF LINKS to Documentation Available in the Public Records [e.g. []- DOJ ... There Are over 56,000 ILLEGAL ALIENS in the Federal Prison System So Why Should We Let More in ??; []- DOJ ... It Is a Crime to Emote That the President and Members of Congress Should Be SUBJECT TO PHYSICAL HARM].  Animal Farm Rears It’s Ugly Head ... ONLY LIBERALS KNOW THE TRUTH OF POLITICAL MATTERS !! =+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+=+= MY FILE || csfe2015\ facebook\ f_share\ family\ cour10ay\ 2016\ CE0803_A.wpd

I disagree with both of you. I believe the Democrats did shut down the government. I don't believe they did it over 5 billion dollars. I believe they did it out of defense for our American values and ideals. America is beginning to look a little to much like a prison. Guns in churches and schools, metal detectors in hospitals, court houses, and government buildings, and now a wall and security wire around the border? What's the difference between our nation and a maximum security penitentiary? We are becoming a little to harden. President Roosevelt feared declaring war for this very reason. He reasoned that the people would become to hardened and that the mentality would replace mercy and forgiveness. Fundamental emotions of all human beings. Defending our country's most sensitive beliefs is worth every loss we will incur during a lengthy government shutdown (showdown). Our virtues are worth defending. It is more important now, in the state our country is in, than it ever has been in America's brief history! Do you really want our values to go extinct? It's about more than border security. It's about more than 5 billion dollars. It's about who gets to determine the nation's system of beliefs. Do we believe in welcoming our neighbors, protecting the weak, sacrificing for the poor, or do we believe in a nation of walls, hardened schools, guns in temples, a nation that is so afraid of its own citizens that it needs metal detectors at the courthouse and even worse at the hospital! I'm for border security but I have to stand against a wall and what it stands for. There is just so much more at stake than a mere barrier between our nations.

I have friends and family in prison. If walls didn't work, they'd be out causing mischief.

I hope you see the walls of your prison cell soon.  Who will piss in your hair then??

I think you should stop worrying about this wall and start trying to figure on how you are going to keep Junior from going to prison.

I voted for you and I’m a Law Enforcement Officer. I deserve to be paid and not used as a political hostage. I go to work everyday despite the dangers of working in “the most violent and assaultive penitentiary in the federal prison system” (Mr. Carbajal)

IMPEACH TRUMP!!! TRUMP FOR PRISON!!! REPORT FAKE NAMES AND PROFILES!!! Eradicate the trolls!!!

If Walls don't work, why do I have to have one around my Pool? Why are Walls around Schools and Day Cares? Why did Disney put one around their lakes? Why do Over 55 Communities have Walls and Guard Stations? Why does the Democratic Party have one around their Building? Get the point? President Donald J. Trump, if you have to shut the government down in order to get our Wall that will provide the safety and National Security that All Americans are entitled too, do whatever it takes! How many more loved ones do we have to bury before the Democrats do their job? My family buried an 18 year old American girl and her American 20 year old companion is a double leg amputee. Oh, the criminal illegal immigrant that is supposed to be deported at the end of his prison term(originally 17 years) will be out of prison in 2021 (2 yrs for a life and pair of legs), do you want him in your neighborhood? Here’s the Senate switchboard: (202) 224-3121. Call your Senator. Tell them you stand with the President. Demand the wall. #BuildOurWall

If Walls don't work, why do I have to have one around my Pool? Why are Walls around Schools and Day Cares? Why did Disney put one around their lakes? Why do Over 55 Communities have Walls and Guard Stations? Why does the Democratic Party have one around their Building? Get the point? President Donald J. Trump, if you have to shut the government down in order to get our Wall that will provide the safety and National Security that All Americans are entitled too, do whatever it takes! How many more loved ones do we have to bury before the Democrats do their job? My family buried an 18 year old American girl and her American 20 year old companion is a double leg amputee. Oh, the criminal illegal immigrant that is supposed to be deported at the end of his prison term(originally 17 years) will be out of prison in 2021 (2 yrs for a life and pair of legs), do you want him in your neighborhood? Here’s the Senate switchboard: (202) 224-3121. Call your Senator. Tell them you stand with the President. Demand the wall. #BuildOurWall

If people don't like the thought of a wall then why don't we open all the prison in America they are behind a wall or barrier for some reason or let someone walk thru your front door without knocking what is wrong with you people we need to protect our country everyone one needs to come the same way as our ancestors did legally

If you lock them up they will learn quick, that prison wall work every time!

Instead to put Joaquín "El Chapo" Guzmán (The drugs dealer in prison for life time and cost the tax payer paid for his accommodation for life time, I have a good idea, Why not Joaquín "El Chapo" Guzmán paid to pay for the wall with a lots of extra money for his freedom

It doesn't work like that. If it did wouldn't he have done that 2 years ago. Why hold the country hostage now out of the blue? My guess is he is mad the Dems took the house and scared to death of what Mueller has on him as he watches all of his associates go to prison. This is his big distraction and its failing BIGLY.

It’s really sickening the way MSM is covering the anticipated speech and saying it’s not going to be factual and there is no crisis.  Get all your facts out there — especially the fact that they are proposing money from our budget and tax dollars to build a wall in Tunisia.  The minuscule percentage of the budget that 5B is and the billions paid out every year in “social programs” for ILLEGALS, including the cost of sanctuary cities, prison, opioid epidemic, human trafficking etc.  There better be a comprehensive plan of immigration reform, e-verify, a census with the citizenship question on it, cleaned up voter rolls, a consistent election process in all states, etc.  Do Dems not want it nor see that you were elected because you promised this reform — it’s not a political promise it’s the job you promised to do.  And it’s what we voted for.  They offer no solutions, just opposition.  Design the wall based on what the border patrol tells you they want and need — not the Dems.

Jackie Lee Collins the majority of the prison population is minority and Hispanic, try again

Jim Butkowsky , over seven percent of the illegals coming into our country end up in prison which is higher than our legal population.

John Burks , better phrased as that’s why prisons still have prisoners in them. There are plenty of drugs and weapons in every prison.

Judy Goebel we are counting on trump to be in prison soon!!! Then the round up of all you traitors will begin!

Julia Isabella  Why would a "Christian" who's father was a Muslim and grew up in the mostly Muslim country of Indonesia intentionally change his name from Barry Soetoro to Barack HUSSEIN Obama and why would he release from prison the top 5 Taliban commanders when he was in office? 🤔

Kim MAGAbillies are the minority and guess what.....NO WALL! Trump for Prison 2020

LIAR LIAR PANTS ON FIRE   LIBERTY UNIV. CIO ADMITTED HE   WAS ASKED TO RIG TWO POLLS IN   FAVOR OF TRUMP  FOR $50K     THAT IS COLLUSION  AND   OBSTRUCTION OF JUSTICE     TIME FOR HERR DRUMPF TO RESIGN   OR JUST GO STRAIGHT TO PRISON   WITH HIS CORRUPT FAMILY AND   ILLEGALLY GAINED ADMINISTRATION!

Letting in illegals. Hammering the taxpayer with billions in Medicaid costs, court cost, prison costs, border policing is the Democrats Schumer and Pelosi (won't give $1 for the Wall) "solution" they been using for 40 years. The WALL is the solution. Once build it's a low cost low maintenance very efficient use of taxpayer money (but wait hold on that's the Democrats and Schumer/Pelosi main objection they can't get their hands on endless amounts of taxpayer money their non solutions have generated for decades) The Schumer's NYC there are 3 million illegals 35% of the 8.5 million population of NYC. If immigration Plan Schumer translates to the US it would mean 112 million illegals in US. White Europeans are now the minority in NYC and NY state had the largest number of it's citizens of all nationalities emigrating from it of any State in the Union meaning it has the poorest standard of living in the country. Schumer has risen to the top of the Democrat party not because of talent but because NY is a one party state since the 1920s and Calvin Coolidge. . The Democrats could run a dead rat for Senate and it would be elected in NY State-which would actually be an improvement since it would do less damage then Schumer. Things would actually improve without Crying Lying Chuck monkey wrenching the economy of the state-tax,tax,tax and let's add a Green something or other tax and more illegals to support

Linda Sarsour is a Bad Omen for America. This person is a liar, an enemy of the United States and Israel! It will have to be EXPULTED. We are afraid for your safety.  Jan 19, 2019 8:00 am By Rami Dabbas - 30 Comments  Every day more secrets are revealed about the Muslim Brotherhood and the State of Qatar, which stands behind the Muslim Brotherhood and supports it financially and morally through several tools and institutions, both inside Arab countries and in the West, especially in the United States of America, under the cover of the charities and NGO organizations located in those countries.  Linda Sarsour is an Arab American of Palestinian origin and executive director of the New York-based Arab American Society, an association that is administratively linked to the Qatar Foundation International and ideologically follows the Muslim Brotherhood and Sheikh Yusuf al-Qaradawi – a terror promoter — who strongly supports the terrorist Hamas movement and the Qatari government, which is allied with adherents of political Islam. The Qatar Foundation International is closely linked to the Qatari government. Former US Treasury Department analyst Jonathan Schanzer describes the institution as “an ATM for the Muslim Brotherhood and its affiliated groups, the spiritual father of the Muslim Brotherhood, Sheikh Yusuf al-Qaradawi, as well as funding Hamas and terror groups in Syria.” Schanzer stressed that Qatar’s neighbors from Arab countries were “nauseated” by Qatar’s support for the Muslim Brotherhood.  The Qatar Foundation and the Emir of Qatar established the Al-Qaradawi Research Center in honor of Qaradawi. The purpose of the Center was to promote Al-Qaradawi’s ideas on the basis that he was a pioneer of moderate Islamic thought for Muslims today. In January 2012, the Qatar Foundation (QF) opened a center for Islamic legislation and advocacy. Tariq Ramadan, the grandson of the Brotherhood’s founder Hassan al-Banna and the son of Brotherhood leader Saeed Ramadan, was appointed as the director of research of the center.  At the same time, the Qatar Foundation has strong ties to the International Institute of Islamic Thought, an affiliate of the Muslim Brotherhood in the United States that was investigated on terror finance issues after the 9/11 attacks. The deputy director of the Qatar Foundation for Islamic Legislation and Advocacy was Jasser Odeh. At the same time, he taught and lectured at the International Institute of Islamic Thought, as he mentioned in his own profile. The Muslim Brotherhood in the United States described the International Institute of Islamic Thought as one of “our organizations and institutions owned by our friends” in a secret memo issued in 1991. The memo states that the purpose of its network in the United States is “a kind of grand jihad in eliminating and destructing Western civilization from within.”  Now we come back to Linda Sarsour, who also has suspicious personal relationships. In 2004, Sarsour told the press that the US authorities questioned her and her Palestinian husband Maher Judeh, who was threatened with deportation after living in the United States for seven years. In the same interview, Sarsour mentioned that one of her cousins spent 25 years in prison in Israel, and that a family friend was sentenced to 99 years in prison. She added that her unmarried brother was also serving a 12-month sentence for being a member of Hamas.  The New York Police Department opened an investigation into the relationships of the Arab-American Association, headed by Linda Sarsour, and tried to obtain information about its board members. It found that its chairman was Dr. Ahmed Jaber, head of the Dawood mosque, known as the Islamic Mission in America. Sarsour is constantly trying to portray law enforcement officials and the government as unfair to Muslims, and her claims and fears of terrorist plots are in fact government conspiracies, according to Sarsour.  For example, Sarsour said that New York police detectives fabricated terror cases so they could get funding for the New York Police Department. The government stopped an al-Qaeda plot to destroy an aircraft using an explosive device hidden in a person’s underwear: Sarsour claimed the attacker was actually a CIA agent. In an interview, Sarsour said that “fear of Islam” is merely a manifestation of American persecution of minorities, and the United States remains a democratic state with an authoritarian element. Sarsour is known to launch fierce attacks on Muslim Brotherhood opponents, including Muslim dissidents themselves, so the Qatar-affiliated Brotherhood put its money in the right place when it decided to invest in her organization.

Linda Sarsour is a Bad Omen for America. This person is a liar, an enemy of the United States and Israel! It will have to be EXPULTED. We are afraid for your safety.  Jan 19, 2019 8:00 am By Rami Dabbas - 30 Comments  Every day more secrets are revealed about the Muslim Brotherhood and the State of Qatar, which stands behind the Muslim Brotherhood and supports it financially and morally through several tools and institutions, both inside Arab countries and in the West, especially in the United States of America, under the cover of the charities and NGO organizations located in those countries.  Linda Sarsour is an Arab American of Palestinian origin and executive director of the New York-based Arab American Society, an association that is administratively linked to the Qatar Foundation International and ideologically follows the Muslim Brotherhood and Sheikh Yusuf al-Qaradawi – a terror promoter — who strongly supports the terrorist Hamas movement and the Qatari government, which is allied with adherents of political Islam. The Qatar Foundation International is closely linked to the Qatari government. Former US Treasury Department analyst Jonathan Schanzer describes the institution as “an ATM for the Muslim Brotherhood and its affiliated groups, the spiritual father of the Muslim Brotherhood, Sheikh Yusuf al-Qaradawi, as well as funding Hamas and terror groups in Syria.” Schanzer stressed that Qatar’s neighbors from Arab countries were “nauseated” by Qatar’s support for the Muslim Brotherhood.  The Qatar Foundation and the Emir of Qatar established the Al-Qaradawi Research Center in honor of Qaradawi. The purpose of the Center was to promote Al-Qaradawi’s ideas on the basis that he was a pioneer of moderate Islamic thought for Muslims today. In January 2012, the Qatar Foundation (QF) opened a center for Islamic legislation and advocacy. Tariq Ramadan, the grandson of the Brotherhood’s founder Hassan al-Banna and the son of Brotherhood leader Saeed Ramadan, was appointed as the director of research of the center.  At the same time, the Qatar Foundation has strong ties to the International Institute of Islamic Thought, an affiliate of the Muslim Brotherhood in the United States that was investigated on terror finance issues after the 9/11 attacks. The deputy director of the Qatar Foundation for Islamic Legislation and Advocacy was Jasser Odeh. At the same time, he taught and lectured at the International Institute of Islamic Thought, as he mentioned in his own profile. The Muslim Brotherhood in the United States described the International Institute of Islamic Thought as one of “our organizations and institutions owned by our friends” in a secret memo issued in 1991. The memo states that the purpose of its network in the United States is “a kind of grand jihad in eliminating and destructing Western civilization from within.”  Now we come back to Linda Sarsour, who also has suspicious personal relationships. In 2004, Sarsour told the press that the US authorities questioned her and her Palestinian husband Maher Judeh, who was threatened with deportation after living in the United States for seven years. In the same interview, Sarsour mentioned that one of her cousins spent 25 years in prison in Israel, and that a family friend was sentenced to 99 years in prison. She added that her unmarried brother was also serving a 12-month sentence for being a member of Hamas.  The New York Police Department opened an investigation into the relationships of the Arab-American Association, headed by Linda Sarsour, and tried to obtain information about its board members. It found that its chairman was Dr. Ahmed Jaber, head of the Dawood mosque, known as the Islamic Mission in America. Sarsour is constantly trying to portray law enforcement officials and the government as unfair to Muslims, and her claims and fears of terrorist plots are in fact government conspiracies, according to Sarsour.  For example, Sarsour said that New York police detectives fabricated terror cases so they could get funding for the New York Police Department. The government stopped an al-Qaeda plot to destroy an aircraft using an explosive device hidden in a person’s underwear: Sarsour claimed the attacker was actually a CIA agent. In an interview, Sarsour said that “fear of Islam” is merely a manifestation of American persecution of minorities, and the United States remains a democratic state with an authoritarian element. Sarsour is known to launch fierce attacks on Muslim Brotherhood opponents, including Muslim dissidents themselves, so the Qatar-affiliated Brotherhood put its money in the right place when it decided to invest in her organization.

Looking forward to you in prison, traitor.

Mark Parsons yeah right. I guess that's why your boy Manafort is getting ass raped in prison right now.  Military traitor Flynn is singing to Mueller at a very high decibel level to avoid giving up the booty.  Jared and Don the Con, Jr are next, then the retarded kid.  Keep denying.  Anyone that supports this crook is also a traitor.

Martin Miranda no the wall at the prison or mental facility will hold them     walls work

Mathew Bake des he built one in oval Office with Lego Stones.  But this was it . Later in Prison He finde a Lot of Walls who surruond him. Orange is good Color for workingsuite

Matthew 25 31“When the Son of Man comes in his glory, and all the angels with him, he will sit on his glorious throne. 32.All the nations will be gathered before him, and he will separate the people one from another as a shepherd separates the sheep from the goats. 33.He will put the sheep on his right and the goats on his left. 34.“Then the King will say to those on his right, ‘Come, you who are blessed by my Father; take your inheritance, the kingdom prepared for you since the creation of the world. 35.For I was hungry and you gave me something to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me something to drink, I was a stranger and you invited me in, 36.I needed clothes and you clothed me, I was sick and you looked after me, I was in prison and you came to visit me.’ 37.“Then the righteous will answer him, ‘Lord, when did we see you hungry and feed you, or thirsty and give you something to drink? 38.When did we see you a stranger and invite you in, or needing clothes and clothe you? 39.When did we see you sick or in prison and go to visit you?’ 40.“The King will reply, ‘Truly I tell you, whatever you did for one of the least of these brothers and sisters of mine, you did for me.’ 41.“Then he will say to those on his left, ‘Depart from me, you who are cursed, into the eternal fire prepared for the devil and his angels. 42.For I was hungry and you gave me nothing to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me nothing to drink, 43.I was a stranger and you did not invite me in, I needed clothes and you did not clothe me, I was sick and in prison and you did not look after me.’ 44.“They also will answer, ‘Lord, when did we see you hungry or thirsty or a stranger or needing clothes or sick or in prison, and did not help you?’ 45.“He will reply, ‘Truly I tell you, whatever you did not do for one of the least of these, you did not do for me.’ 46.“Then they will go away to eternal punishment, but the righteous to eternal life.”

Matthew 25 31“When the Son of Man comes in his glory, and all the angels with him, he will sit on his glorious throne. 32.All the nations will be gathered before him, and he will separate the people one from another as a shepherd separates the sheep from the goats. 33.He will put the sheep on his right and the goats on his left. 34.“Then the King will say to those on his right, ‘Come, you who are blessed by my Father; take your inheritance, the kingdom prepared for you since the creation of the world. 35.For I was hungry and you gave me something to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me something to drink, I was a stranger and you invited me in, 36.I needed clothes and you clothed me, I was sick and you looked after me, I was in prison and you came to visit me.’ 37.“Then the righteous will answer him, ‘Lord, when did we see you hungry and feed you, or thirsty and give you something to drink? 38.When did we see you a stranger and invite you in, or needing clothes and clothe you? 39.When did we see you sick or in prison and go to visit you?’ 40.“The King will reply, ‘Truly I tell you, whatever you did for one of the least of these brothers and sisters of mine, you did for me.’ 41.“Then he will say to those on his left, ‘Depart from me, you who are cursed, into the eternal fire prepared for the devil and his angels. 42.For I was hungry and you gave me nothing to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me nothing to drink, 43.I was a stranger and you did not invite me in, I needed clothes and you did not clothe me, I was sick and in prison and you did not look after me.’ 44.“They also will answer, ‘Lord, when did we see you hungry or thirsty or a stranger or needing clothes or sick or in prison, and did not help you?’ 45.“He will reply, ‘Truly I tell you, whatever you did not do for one of the least of these, you did not do for me.’ 46.“Then they will go away to eternal punishment, but the righteous to eternal life.”

Matthew 25 31“When the Son of Man comes in his glory, and all the angels with him, he will sit on his glorious throne. 32.All the nations will be gathered before him, and he will separate the people one from another as a shepherd separates the sheep from the goats. 33.He will put the sheep on his right and the goats on his left. 34.“Then the King will say to those on his right, ‘Come, you who are blessed by my Father; take your inheritance, the kingdom prepared for you since the creation of the world. 35.For I was hungry and you gave me something to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me something to drink, I was a stranger and you invited me in, 36.I needed clothes and you clothed me, I was sick and you looked after me, I was in prison and you came to visit me.’ 37.“Then the righteous will answer him, ‘Lord, when did we see you hungry and feed you, or thirsty and give you something to drink? 38.When did we see you a stranger and invite you in, or needing clothes and clothe you? 39.When did we see you sick or in prison and go to visit you?’ 40.“The King will reply, ‘Truly I tell you, whatever you did for one of the least of these brothers and sisters of mine, you did for me.’ 41.“Then he will say to those on his left, ‘Depart from me, you who are cursed, into the eternal fire prepared for the devil and his angels. 42.For I was hungry and you gave me nothing to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me nothing to drink, 43.I was a stranger and you did not invite me in, I needed clothes and you did not clothe me, I was sick and in prison and you did not look after me.’ 44.“They also will answer, ‘Lord, when did we see you hungry or thirsty or a stranger or needing clothes or sick or in prison, and did not help you?’ 45.“He will reply, ‘Truly I tell you, whatever you did not do for one of the least of these, you did not do for me.’ 46.“Then they will go away to eternal punishment, but the righteous to eternal life.”

Matthew 25 31“When the Son of Man comes in his glory, and all the angels with him, he will sit on his glorious throne. 32.All the nations will be gathered before him, and he will separate the people one from another as a shepherd separates the sheep from the goats. 33.He will put the sheep on his right and the goats on his left. 34.“Then the King will say to those on his right, ‘Come, you who are blessed by my Father; take your inheritance, the kingdom prepared for you since the creation of the world. 35.For I was hungry and you gave me something to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me something to drink, I was a stranger and you invited me in, 36.I needed clothes and you clothed me, I was sick and you looked after me, I was in prison and you came to visit me.’ 37.“Then the righteous will answer him, ‘Lord, when did we see you hungry and feed you, or thirsty and give you something to drink? 38.When did we see you a stranger and invite you in, or needing clothes and clothe you? 39.When did we see you sick or in prison and go to visit you?’ 40.“The King will reply, ‘Truly I tell you, whatever you did for one of the least of these brothers and sisters of mine, you did for me.’ 41.“Then he will say to those on his left, ‘Depart from me, you who are cursed, into the eternal fire prepared for the devil and his angels. 42.For I was hungry and you gave me nothing to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me nothing to drink, 43.I was a stranger and you did not invite me in, I needed clothes and you did not clothe me, I was sick and in prison and you did not look after me.’ 44.“They also will answer, ‘Lord, when did we see you hungry or thirsty or a stranger or needing clothes or sick or in prison, and did not help you?’ 45.“He will reply, ‘Truly I tell you, whatever you did not do for one of the least of these, you did not do for me.’ 46.“Then they will go away to eternal punishment, but the righteous to eternal life.”

Matthew Cloward ya I guess prison wall are just for looks  … ya right

Mentioned  before holidays.  Three Mexican immigrants busted selling meth. One life the other 18 and 20 yrs. Million each to keep in the prison system.  Then they can be deported. Not to mentioned attorneys have to be paid to defend them. Build the wall.

Michael Fox Yes he get it done he get a Wall he wear Orange and the Prison has many Walls. Low Minded naive Brain Limited Trumpee

My 18 year brother was killed by an illegal immigrant in 2005 who was high on drugs and drunk,  he is still in prison to this day in United States.  2020 he will be released back to Mexico. I support the wall 100%  No wall will bring my brother back but maybe save someone else's brother or sister 😢

My son was killed by an illegal Mexican immigrant who had already been deported once for DUI. He choose to drive drunk, and killed my son while turning onto a busy street. He had no driver’s license, no car insurance.  My son was just 20 years old, less than 2 months shy of his 21st birthday. He was killed instantly. The illegal immigrant was so intoxicated, he tried to urinate on the sheriff deputy’s car. While in jail, he got a Boca Raton lawyer who took us to court to dispute the charges. My family had to live through the awful experience of a trial and details of the accident. Justice did prevail and he was incarcerated. He remains in prison for the time being, but I am concerned if ICE will deport him again, or he will be let back in the community to live amongst us. BUILD THE DAMN WALL

NO! WE WANT TO SEE YOU IN PRISON, AT THE VERY LEAST! YOU ARE THE NATIONAL CRISIS, YOU MORON!

Obummer will enjoy prison life from what I hear.

On December 12, Cohen was sentenced to 36 months in federal prison. At his sentencing, Cohen said he acted out of "blind loyalty" to Trump, adding that "time and time again I felt it was my duty to cover up his dirty deeds."

POS Fake Dictator Wannabe in Chief. Your days as a free punk are number. You will incarcerated for the rest of your miserable days in a military prison for crimes against this country. Mark my words. G

Peter Darling, way too funny! Dwindling base??? Actually, according to RCP, Trump’s average approval is only 1% below his highest. See below for the truth   Poll	Date	Approve	Disapprove	Spread RCP Average	1/25 - 2/14	43.6	53.6	-10.0  Rasmussen	2/12 - 2/14	50	49	+1 FOX News	2/10 - 2/12	46	52	-6 Economist	2/10 - 2/12	41	57	-16 Reuters	2/6 - 2/12	39	57	-18 Politico	2/7 - 2/10	45	51	-6 The Hill	2/7 - 2/8	47	53	-6 Gallup	2/1 - 2/10	44	52	-8 CNN	1/30 - 2/2	42	54	-12 Quinnipiac	1/25 - 1/28	38	57	-19 All President Trump Job Approval Polling Data  As far as Manafort goes, all this narrative about someone who was sent to prison over something that wasn’t even a part of the 2016 campaign. Amazing!

Piper Tunno the shooters are either dead or in prison.  We have criminal citizens who are punished. We don’t need to add illegal criminals from other countries to the ones we already have.

Poor impotent Donnie. FAILED to negotiate with Congress and now going to FAIL with your “emergency.”  By the time your useless vanity project makes its way through the courts, you’ll be LONG out of office and enjoying the striped sunshine from inside your prison cell.   #MAGA!

President TRUM P you have the power to put these Hypocrites Wicked Devil Worshipping Witches & Warlocks in Prison for multitude of murders, kidnapping & selling children & adults into slavery.... Why aren’t they Arrested & Locked up? A dog can pee on the side walk but if I did they’d lock me up & these people get away with murder, rape, & crimes so unspeakable they defy ones imagination. I speak to you devils in Jesus name you will not succeed in your plots & plans! You will fail & fall into the holes you dig for others! AMEN. PUT them in PRISON where they belong where they cannot do any more harm to PEOPLE! 🧐

President TRUM P you have the power to put these Hypocrites Wicked Devil Worshipping Witches & Warlocks in Prison for multitude of murders, kidnapping & selling children & adults into slavery.... Why aren’t they Arrested & Locked up? A dog can pee on the side walk but if I did they’d lock me up & these people get away with murder, rape, & crimes so unspeakable they defy ones imagination. I speak to you devils in Jesus name you will not succeed in your plots & plans! You will fail & fall into the holes you dig for others! AMEN. PUT them in PRISON where they belong where they cannot do any more harm to PEOPLE! 🧐

Prison walls dont stop criminals what makes yall Republicunts think it will stop illegal immigrants from getting here. Yall are really that dumb

Prison walls will keep us safe from you.

Promise that Mexico is paying? Hilary in prison?

REASONS SOCIALIST DEMOCRATS DON’T UNDERSTAND IF YOU CROSS THE NORTH KOREAN BORDER ILLEGALLY YOU GET 12 YEARS HARD LABOR.  IF YOU CROSS THE IRANIAN BORDER ILLEGALLY YOU ARE DETAINED INDEFINITELY.  IF YOU CROSS THE AFGHAN BORDER ILLEGALLY, YOU GET SHOT.  IF YOU CROSS THE SAUDI ARABIAN BORDER  ILLEGALLY YOU WILL BE JAILED. IF YOU CROSS THE CHINESE BORDER  ILLEGALLY YOU MAY NEVER BE HEARD FROM AGAIN. IF YOU CROSS THE VENEZUELAN BORDER  ILLEGALLY YOU WILL BE BRANDED A SPY AND YOUR FATE WILL BE SEALED.  IF YOU CROSS THE CUBAN BORDER ILLEGALLY YOU WILL BE THROWN INTO POLITICAL PRISON TO ROT. PRESIDENT Donald Trump BUILD THE WALL “IT WORKS”.

Roy Meston  How did you get human and drug trafficking across the border from my statement?  I was pointing out the obvious Liberal bs of your repeated statement about walls around a prison don't  stop drugs from getting in as an argument against a border wall.. Keep up dude..

Roy Meston  You seem to think you know a lot about drugs in prison. You are either an ex con or a guard that smuggled drugs to inmates in your prison wallet.. Drugs aren't as easy to get into prison as cell phones are..and from the sounds of it, you could fit a dozen Obama phones in your "wallet".

Roy Meston  You seem to think you know a lot about drugs in prison. You are either an ex con or a guard that smuggled drugs to inmates in your prison wallet.. Drugs aren't as easy to get into prison as cell phones are..and from the sounds of it, you could fit a dozen Obama phones in your "wallet".

Roy Meston  You seem to think you know a lot about drugs in prison. You are either an ex con or a guard that smuggled drugs to inmates in your prison wallet.. Drugs aren't as easy to get into prison as cell phones are..and from the sounds of it, you could fit a dozen Obama phones in your "wallet".

So let me get this straight.....  Only Mexicans are in our prison system for murdering?  Please correct me if I’m wrong.  So y’all only care about people killed by Mexicans and not by Americans?   Again, please correct me if I’m wrong.  But guess what...  I KNOW BETTER.  Your are not wanting more brown people in this country.    MAKE AMERICA WHITE AGAIN!!!!!

So let's take all the money confiscated in drug crime and apply it to the wall. Send all drug fellons to the other side of the wall and save the money it takes to care for them in prison to patrol the boards. Build the wall

So our nation should be like a prison?

Susan Scarberry, FACT❗️Obama is NO LONGER IN OFFICE. Try to keep up!  You can't deflect from the deep, deep trouble the man CURRENTLY in the White House finds himself. Scandal after scandal. The name RUSSIA seems to pop up often. WHY?   If President Obama was such a hardened criminal why has the ONLY issue connected to him was paying a fine for errors in campaign records? Not ONE indictment, not ONE conviction and NO ONE from his administration went to prison. Oops!

THERE IS NO TWITTER IN PRISON   TRE45ON

TRUMP PENCE FOR PRISON 2020

Ted Bundy was convicted of killing 36 women. And he did so by going state to state and escaping from prison a few times. We should have border walls on state line.

Tell Nancy we want impeachment and prison.

Teresa Franklin lol I Understand  Not being paid However President Trump has Tried and Tried to negotiate with her and she Consistently Says NO! I don’t care What you think She’s Not willing to negotiate! What would you have him do? He Wants to Keep America Safe! We the people Want that steel barrier! Wonder How Many cons at your husbands prison are illegals? Wonder how many have murdered Americans? You don’t care? Well I’m Sorry for you! I like Many millions of Americans ARE Praying for these people not getting paid but these Dems HAVE to be willing to compromise!!!

That's simply silliness. How many white, males have killed, maimed, tortured other U.S. citizens? Can we deport them too? No, we build prison walls and once they are released or escape or die, we consider it justice served. We don't blame the entire white, male race, do we? This is simply another example of you race hating.

The Democrats are only refusing because of who is asking. That is it. They did not act like that when Obama was President. He should have been thrown in Prison along with Hillary...but they did nothing. But yet, they keep going after President Donald J. Trump. It doesn't matter what it is, they will keep working against our President and every member in the Federal government that is doing that needs to be kicked out of Office. We want our elected Officials to what we elected them to do, and that is to secure our borders and keep our country safe. We write their pay checks...it's time they do their job..or get out!

The criminal trumpleforeskin is going to prison.

The dictator is a fascist and and a crook and will be in prison soon.

The only way Trump can stay out of prison is by keeping the government closed.

The wall is just a distraction for Drumpf’s dwindling base. Drumpf’s 2016 campaign chairman Paul Manafort, attended a pre-sentencing hearing for his crimes this week. The recommendation was for him to serve between 19-24 years. His sentence was increased due to his continued lying about the contacts between the Russian government officials and his campaign team. Why would the 69 year old continue to lie and inevitably choose to die in prison? Keeping his boss out of it and hoping for a presidential pardon perhaps. I don’t know but Special Counsel Robert Mueller does. 😏

There are more important things to do in this country than build a fucking wall because that QUACK(Trump) wants to see how much power he has over the pocketbook of America, he better worry about those chains that they are gonna put on his fat ass and his kids when Mueller puts out his report showing that the entire family of hardened Criminals were Traitors to our country, their is way too much to do in this country than build a wall because Putin is making him do it, time for that QUACK to go, specifically speaking to Prison for the rest of his worthless life!!!

There has never been a MORE DISGUSTING PERSON IN AMERICA  THEN THE TRAMP.  YOU HATE AMERICA BECAUSE YOU ARE NOT ALLOWED TO BARROW MONEY FROM AMERICAN BANKS. YOU HAVE BEEN TAKEN TO COURT BECAUSE YOU DON'T PAY PEOPLE THAT WORK FOR YOU. PLUS SOOOO MUCH MORE. I'LL BE DANCING IN THE STREETS WHEN YOU AND YOUR CRIME FAMILY ARE IN ORANGE PRISON SUITS. POS

They only care about getting illegals for their voting block!  THEY WILL DO ANYTHING AND EVERYTHING TO GET YOU IN PRISON, AND WE WILL DO EVERYTHING TO KEEP THE BEST HEAD OF STATE IN POWER!  They think they can intimidate us and you!  The harder they push, the more we will push back!

This wall distraction isn't going to work. Neither will shutting down the government. Mueller is coming for you and soon you'll be in prison. Traitor.

Tony Perez What would he go to prison for? Hes done nothing illegal.

Trump 2020 = in federal prison

Trump prison 20 to life

Trump this is total Bullshit! What a Propaganda post ! We will be a Nation and "STUPID Trump" isn't gonna fly in with his tights and cape to save the day ! Trump you are so PATHETIC! Trump,your first and only priority is to open up the Government NOW, so these people can get paid ! Trump, you think that by NOT paying the Border Patrol that there won't be the cartels to swoop in with butt loads of money to tempt these people! Wow, that sounds a might bit CRAZY! There had already been CORRUPTION on the Southern Border !Trump, you are complete imbecile,pay the Coast Guard ASAP, they keep our borders "SAFE" ! If this is Not some kinda of "SiCK " game and a Political ploy to "USE" your CRAZY base,then prove it ! OPEN UP THE GOVERNMENT! I still am interested in where all the 1.6 Billion Dollars that you got in March went ? Why are you asking for an additional 5.7 Billion dollars ? Why hold these Feberal workers "Hostages" just so you can say "I won " ? It should demonstrate to the American people that you don't "Care" about the citizens of this Nation and that you are a "Greedy ,INCOMPETENT,EGOTISTICAL,,LIAR "! Trump your tweet about Schumer is very PATHETIC,you Fired Comey because of the "Russia Thing"! What Trump are you grasping at straws? Trump ,you could go today and TESTIFY to Mueller Face to Face and put it all behind you ,since all of this is just more Distraction from the Meuller investigation! Dude,you still have the option to RESIGN before you are in PRISON! Why don't you just to that,save the country money and time in your IMPEACHMENT hearings !

Trump's "Brown Shirts"  - Make no mistake, if I had the means, YOU would be on your knees apologizing on their behalf - but it will be enough to see you go to prison.  https://boingboing.net/2019/01/19/mob-of-young-maga-hat-wearers.html?fbclid=IwAR19DOI6bj-W6ZSDDY4vLHCJD9p7bCLG50dQ9tswnYn-oP_LiQtAO-FbwBA

Trump's "Brown Shirts"  - Make no mistake, if I had the means, YOU would be on your knees apologizing on their behalf - but it will be enough to see you go to prison.  https://boingboing.net/2019/01/19/mob-of-young-maga-hat-wearers.html?fbclid=IwAR19DOI6bj-W6ZSDDY4vLHCJD9p7bCLG50dQ9tswnYn-oP_LiQtAO-FbwBAMob of young MAGA hat wearers surrounds Native American elder and mock himboingboing.net

WHEN IS EVERYONE GONNA GET IT???  🙄🙄  THE ONLY REASON MUELLER DID THE INVESTIGATION WAS TO KEEP THE HEAT OFF HIMSELF, HILLARY AND OBAMA FOR THE CLINTON EMAIL SCANDEL.  TIME TO GET THE CROOKS IN PRISON.

Walls  work  IF  they  are  prison  walls  with  the  required  human  resources.  May  you  know  such  in  your  lifetime.

Walls work that's why there is no drugs and weapons in prison

Well he got Korea to stop launching missiles, he gotten Korea to release hostages, he got Korea to return our fallen soldiers, tax cuts for US citizens, more jobs, brought back jobs that past administrations shut down, prison reform for people that gets out of prison. Ect. But i think keeping us from going to war with North Korea and stopping the missiles flying our way was priority, don't you?

Well he got Korea to stop launching missiles, he gotten Korea to release hostages, he got Korea to return our fallen soldiers, tax cuts for US citizens, more jobs, brought back jobs that past administrations shut down, prison reform for people that gets out of prison. Ect. But i think keeping us from going to war with North Korea and stopping the missiles flying our way was priority, don't you?

When I wanted to escape prison it was a wall that stopped me 😅💯

Why Liberals just don’t understand these Trump Supporters   A question asked by a Trump supporter: "Why do liberals think Trump supporters are stupid?”  Here's what we really think about Trump supporters - the rich, the poor, the malignant and the innocently well-meaning, the ones who think and the ones who don’t...  That when you saw a man who had owned a fraudulent University, intent on scamming poor people, you thought “Fine."  That when you saw a man who had made it his business practice to stiff his creditors, you said, “Okay."  That when you heard him proudly brag about his own history of sexual abuse, you said, "No problem.”  That when he made up stories about seeing Muslim-Americans in the thousands cheering the destruction of the World Trade Center, you said, "Not an issue.”  That when you saw him brag that he could shoot a man on Fifth Avenue and you wouldn't care, you chirped, "knows me.”  That when you heard him illustrate his own character by telling that cute story about the elderly guest bleeding on the floor at his country club, the story about how he turned his back and how it was all an imposition on him, you said, "That's cool!”  That when you saw him mock the disabled, you thought it was the funniest thing you ever saw.  That when you heard him brag that he doesn't read books, you said, "Well, who has time?”  That when the Central Park Five were compensated as innocent men convicted of a crime they didn't commit, and he angrily said that they should still be in prison, you said, "That makes sense.”  That when you heard him tell his supporters to beat up protesters and that he would hire attorneys, you thought, “Yes!"  That when you heard him tell one rally to confiscate a man's coat before throwing him out into the freezing cold, you said, "What a great guy!”  That you have watched the parade of Neo-Nazis and white supremacists with whom he curries favor, while refusing to condemn outright Nazis, and you have said, "Thumbs up!”  That you hear him unable to talk to foreign dignitaries without insulting their countries and demanding that they praise his electoral win, you said, "That's the way I want my President to be.”  That you have watched him remove expertise from all layers of government in favor of people who make money off of eliminating protections in the industries they're supposed to be regulating and you have said, "What a genius!”  That you have heard him continue to profit from his businesses, in part by leveraging his position as President, to the point of overcharging the Secret Service for space in the properties he owns, and you have said, "That's smart!”  That you have heard him say that it was difficult to help Puerto Rico because it was the middle of water and you have said, "That makes sense.”  That you have seen him start fights with every country from Canada to New Zealand while praising Russia and quote, "falling in love" with the dictator of North Korea, and you have said, "That's statesmanship!”  That Trump separated children from their families and put them in cages, managed to lose track of 1500 kids, has opened a tent city concentration camp in the desert in Texas - he explains that they're just "animals" - and you say, "Well, OK then.”  That you have witnessed all the thousand and one other manifestations of corruption and low moral character and outright animalistic rudeness and contempt for you, the working American voter, and you still show up grinning and wearing your MAGA hats and threatening to beat up anybody who says otherwise.  What you don't get, Trump supporters in 2019, is that succumbing to frustration and thinking of you as stupid may be wrong and unhelpful, but it's also...hear me...charitable. Because if you're NOT stupid, we must turn to other explanations, and most of them are less flattering.  (Author unknown)

Why not just make it a felony with a minimum of 30 years in prison for employers (or anyone) that hire illegals.

Yanira Blanco what have any of the four people you mentioned done to deserve prison time? The last time I checked a bunch of Trumps people were going to prison including his personal lawyer, campaign manager and national security advisor. Trump is under 17 investigations. But yes, lets put the elderly billionaire George Soros in jail- who by the way is a super generous billionaire that actually gives his money to charity unlike Trump who ran a fraudulent foundation.  What is your obsession with Soros anyway? I think you might be watching too much right wing propaganda.

Yanira Blanco what have any of the four people you mentioned done to deserve prison time? The last time I checked a bunch of Trumps people were going to prison including his personal lawyer, campaign manager and national security advisor. Trump is under 17 investigations. But yes, lets put the elderly billionaire George Soros in jail- who by the way is a super generous billionaire that actually gives his money to charity unlike Trump who ran a fraudulent foundation.  What is your obsession with Soros anyway? I think you might be watching too much right wing propaganda.

Yes Sir,walls work very well. How effective would a prison be at keeping inmates in without their walls/fences? And walls are absolutely Biblical too.

You DO know he's going to prison for being a Russian traitor right? There will never be a wall.

You are a traitor.  You belong in prison.

You going to prison

You have conflated “border security” with a wall that won’t work, you incompetent buffoon. Resign and play some golf before your prison sentence.

You're not gonna sell this illegal move with more of your baseless fear-mongering, Comrade. Prison awaits!

Your son Junior will be very safe behind thick prison walls.

You’re a fucking idiot!!!! You are the crisis!!!! Resign you pos! We the people want you in prison you fucking traitor!!!!! You and your family are deplorable, disgusting and a complete disgrace!!!!

ive been in facebook prison , no big deal. this site is a ghetto of no freedom .just  use it , abuse it , crap on it . what ever it gave you ,you just give it back !

seeing your fat ass die in prison

so if walls dont work do inmates in prison stay voluntarily??

An illegal alien bastard murdered my godson.  May all MS-13 animals rot in hell.  I stand with the President.  BUILD THE WALL...and crime will fall.

Andres Zapata sorry, you missed the point. 90% of all illegal narcotics come from you guessed it, The Honduras. across Mexico, over the border to mainstream America via. MS-13.  And no, everyone responsible for own decisions, just like my son. However, if there wasn't any available, No Addictions, and/or 300,000 deaths of overdoses! Got it?    #buildthewall #nationalemergency #stopthedrugs

Anyone want to play the Trump drinking game today? The words are: criminals MS-13 Wall Obama Collusion HRC Steel Slats Billions and Billions Terrorists The wall has already been built Mexico will pay for it See through steel Very dangerous southern border Drugs

As it turns out, back in 2011 then-President Barack Obama issued an executive order “blocking property of transnational criminal organizations.” Obama cited his authority as granted through the Constitution to invoke the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, 50 U.S.C. 1701, and the National Emergencies Act, 50 U.S.C. 1601. The latter is the same legislation that Trump is citing to get funding for the wall to achieve his immigration reform goals. That executive order targeted a number of criminal organizations, including the Mexican Los Zetas cartel, an ally of the MS-13 gang President Trump has regularly called out as a danger to Americans.

Bruce Hale show us one Democrat that supports ISIS, or MS13, or illegal immigration. You plainly show your bias and hatred for those that are working to oppose Donald Trump, but show no compassion for those that Trump's government shutdown impacts more severely each day. How would you feel if you were forced to work unpaid for a month just so Donald Trump has a hostage to bargain with for his wall. You support a dealmaker who cares little for 800,000 civil servants and thousands of others who are working longer hours to keep things running without them. No true American or Christian could act so cruelly.

Build that wall & stand strong against the democrats who support ISIS, MS13, criminal aliens, 6 more years of the best president ever. Chuckie Nancy Maxine Waters Pocahontas & that evil stupid Cortez lady you will lose & you all can go to hell

Build the wall and hunt down the MS13 gangs!

DA Medina have you ever heard of MS13???

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda GriffinHenk 12) Border Security and Immigration  ~Secured $1.6 billion for border wall construction in the March 2018 omnibus bill.  ~Construction of a 14-mile section of border wall began near San Diego.  ~Worked to protect American communities from the threat posed by the vile MS-13 gang.  ~ICE’s Homeland Security Investigations division arrested 796 MS-13 members and associates in FY 2017, an 83 percent increase from the prior year.  ~Justice worked with partners in Central America to secure criminal charges against more than 4,000 MS-13 members.  ~Border Patrol agents arrested 228 illegal aliens affiliated with MS-13 in FY 2017.  ~Fighting to stop the scourge of illegal drugs at our border.  ~ICE HSI seized more than 980,000 pounds of narcotics in FY 2017, including 2,370 pounds of fentanyl and 6,967 pounds of heroin.  ~ICE HSI dedicated nearly 630,000 investigative hours towards halting the illegal import of fentanyl.  ~ICE HSI made 11,691 narcotics-related arrests in FY 2017.  ~Stop Opioid Abuse and Reduce Drug Supply and Demand introduced new measures to keep dangerous drugs out the United States.  ~Signed the INTERDICT Act into law, enhancing efforts to detect and intercept synthetic opioids.  ~DOJ secured its first-ever indictments against Chinese fentanyl manufacturers.  ~DOJ launched their Joint Criminal Opioid Darknet Enforcement (J-CODE) team, aimed at disrupting online illicit opioid sales.  ~Released an immigration framework that includes the resources required to secure our borders and close legal loopholes, and repeatedly called on Congress to fix our broken immigration laws.  ~Authorized the deployment of the National Guard to help secure the border.  ~Enhanced vetting of individuals entering the U.S. from countries that don’t meet security standards, helping to ensure individuals who pose a threat to our country are identified before they enter.These procedures were upheld in a June 2018 Supreme Court hearing.  ~ICE removed over 226,000 illegal aliens from the United States in 2017.  ~ICE rescued or identified over 500 human trafficking victims and over 900 child exploitation victims in 2017 alone.  ~In 2017, ICE Enforcement and Removal Operations (ERO) arrested more than 127,000 aliens with criminal convictions or charges, responsible for Over 76,000 with dangerous drug offenses. More than 48,000 with assault offenses. More than 11,000 with weapons offenses. More than 5,000 with sexual assault offenses. More than 2,000 with kidnapping offenses. Over 1,800 with homicide offenses.  ~Created the Victims of Immigration Crime Engagement (VOICE) Office in order to support the victims and families affected by illegal alien crime.  ~More than doubled the number of counties participating in the 287(g) program, which allows jails to detain criminal aliens until they are transferred to ICE custody.

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda GriffinHenk 12) Border Security and Immigration  ~Secured $1.6 billion for border wall construction in the March 2018 omnibus bill.  ~Construction of a 14-mile section of border wall began near San Diego.  ~Worked to protect American communities from the threat posed by the vile MS-13 gang.  ~ICE’s Homeland Security Investigations division arrested 796 MS-13 members and associates in FY 2017, an 83 percent increase from the prior year.  ~Justice worked with partners in Central America to secure criminal charges against more than 4,000 MS-13 members.  ~Border Patrol agents arrested 228 illegal aliens affiliated with MS-13 in FY 2017.  ~Fighting to stop the scourge of illegal drugs at our border.  ~ICE HSI seized more than 980,000 pounds of narcotics in FY 2017, including 2,370 pounds of fentanyl and 6,967 pounds of heroin.  ~ICE HSI dedicated nearly 630,000 investigative hours towards halting the illegal import of fentanyl.  ~ICE HSI made 11,691 narcotics-related arrests in FY 2017.  ~Stop Opioid Abuse and Reduce Drug Supply and Demand introduced new measures to keep dangerous drugs out the United States.  ~Signed the INTERDICT Act into law, enhancing efforts to detect and intercept synthetic opioids.  ~DOJ secured its first-ever indictments against Chinese fentanyl manufacturers.  ~DOJ launched their Joint Criminal Opioid Darknet Enforcement (J-CODE) team, aimed at disrupting online illicit opioid sales.  ~Released an immigration framework that includes the resources required to secure our borders and close legal loopholes, and repeatedly called on Congress to fix our broken immigration laws.  ~Authorized the deployment of the National Guard to help secure the border.  ~Enhanced vetting of individuals entering the U.S. from countries that don’t meet security standards, helping to ensure individuals who pose a threat to our country are identified before they enter.These procedures were upheld in a June 2018 Supreme Court hearing.  ~ICE removed over 226,000 illegal aliens from the United States in 2017.  ~ICE rescued or identified over 500 human trafficking victims and over 900 child exploitation victims in 2017 alone.  ~In 2017, ICE Enforcement and Removal Operations (ERO) arrested more than 127,000 aliens with criminal convictions or charges, responsible for Over 76,000 with dangerous drug offenses. More than 48,000 with assault offenses. More than 11,000 with weapons offenses. More than 5,000 with sexual assault offenses. More than 2,000 with kidnapping offenses. Over 1,800 with homicide offenses.  ~Created the Victims of Immigration Crime Engagement (VOICE) Office in order to support the victims and families affected by illegal alien crime.  ~More than doubled the number of counties participating in the 287(g) program, which allows jails to detain criminal aliens until they are transferred to ICE custody.

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda GriffinHenk 12) Border Security and Immigration  ~Secured $1.6 billion for border wall construction in the March 2018 omnibus bill.  ~Construction of a 14-mile section of border wall began near San Diego.  ~Worked to protect American communities from the threat posed by the vile MS-13 gang.  ~ICE’s Homeland Security Investigations division arrested 796 MS-13 members and associates in FY 2017, an 83 percent increase from the prior year.  ~Justice worked with partners in Central America to secure criminal charges against more than 4,000 MS-13 members.  ~Border Patrol agents arrested 228 illegal aliens affiliated with MS-13 in FY 2017.  ~Fighting to stop the scourge of illegal drugs at our border.  ~ICE HSI seized more than 980,000 pounds of narcotics in FY 2017, including 2,370 pounds of fentanyl and 6,967 pounds of heroin.  ~ICE HSI dedicated nearly 630,000 investigative hours towards halting the illegal import of fentanyl.  ~ICE HSI made 11,691 narcotics-related arrests in FY 2017.  ~Stop Opioid Abuse and Reduce Drug Supply and Demand introduced new measures to keep dangerous drugs out the United States.  ~Signed the INTERDICT Act into law, enhancing efforts to detect and intercept synthetic opioids.  ~DOJ secured its first-ever indictments against Chinese fentanyl manufacturers.  ~DOJ launched their Joint Criminal Opioid Darknet Enforcement (J-CODE) team, aimed at disrupting online illicit opioid sales.  ~Released an immigration framework that includes the resources required to secure our borders and close legal loopholes, and repeatedly called on Congress to fix our broken immigration laws.  ~Authorized the deployment of the National Guard to help secure the border.  ~Enhanced vetting of individuals entering the U.S. from countries that don’t meet security standards, helping to ensure individuals who pose a threat to our country are identified before they enter.These procedures were upheld in a June 2018 Supreme Court hearing.  ~ICE removed over 226,000 illegal aliens from the United States in 2017.  ~ICE rescued or identified over 500 human trafficking victims and over 900 child exploitation victims in 2017 alone.  ~In 2017, ICE Enforcement and Removal Operations (ERO) arrested more than 127,000 aliens with criminal convictions or charges, responsible for Over 76,000 with dangerous drug offenses. More than 48,000 with assault offenses. More than 11,000 with weapons offenses. More than 5,000 with sexual assault offenses. More than 2,000 with kidnapping offenses. Over 1,800 with homicide offenses.  ~Created the Victims of Immigration Crime Engagement (VOICE) Office in order to support the victims and families affected by illegal alien crime.  ~More than doubled the number of counties participating in the 287(g) program, which allows jails to detain criminal aliens until they are transferred to ICE custody.

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda GriffinHenk 12) Border Security and Immigration  ~Secured $1.6 billion for border wall construction in the March 2018 omnibus bill.  ~Construction of a 14-mile section of border wall began near San Diego.  ~Worked to protect American communities from the threat posed by the vile MS-13 gang.  ~ICE’s Homeland Security Investigations division arrested 796 MS-13 members and associates in FY 2017, an 83 percent increase from the prior year.  ~Justice worked with partners in Central America to secure criminal charges against more than 4,000 MS-13 members.  ~Border Patrol agents arrested 228 illegal aliens affiliated with MS-13 in FY 2017.  ~Fighting to stop the scourge of illegal drugs at our border.  ~ICE HSI seized more than 980,000 pounds of narcotics in FY 2017, including 2,370 pounds of fentanyl and 6,967 pounds of heroin.  ~ICE HSI dedicated nearly 630,000 investigative hours towards halting the illegal import of fentanyl.  ~ICE HSI made 11,691 narcotics-related arrests in FY 2017.  ~Stop Opioid Abuse and Reduce Drug Supply and Demand introduced new measures to keep dangerous drugs out the United States.  ~Signed the INTERDICT Act into law, enhancing efforts to detect and intercept synthetic opioids.  ~DOJ secured its first-ever indictments against Chinese fentanyl manufacturers.  ~DOJ launched their Joint Criminal Opioid Darknet Enforcement (J-CODE) team, aimed at disrupting online illicit opioid sales.  ~Released an immigration framework that includes the resources required to secure our borders and close legal loopholes, and repeatedly called on Congress to fix our broken immigration laws.  ~Authorized the deployment of the National Guard to help secure the border.  ~Enhanced vetting of individuals entering the U.S. from countries that don’t meet security standards, helping to ensure individuals who pose a threat to our country are identified before they enter.These procedures were upheld in a June 2018 Supreme Court hearing.  ~ICE removed over 226,000 illegal aliens from the United States in 2017.  ~ICE rescued or identified over 500 human trafficking victims and over 900 child exploitation victims in 2017 alone.  ~In 2017, ICE Enforcement and Removal Operations (ERO) arrested more than 127,000 aliens with criminal convictions or charges, responsible for Over 76,000 with dangerous drug offenses. More than 48,000 with assault offenses. More than 11,000 with weapons offenses. More than 5,000 with sexual assault offenses. More than 2,000 with kidnapping offenses. Over 1,800 with homicide offenses.  ~Created the Victims of Immigration Crime Engagement (VOICE) Office in order to support the victims and families affected by illegal alien crime.  ~More than doubled the number of counties participating in the 287(g) program, which allows jails to detain criminal aliens until they are transferred to ICE custody.

I'm in Mexico right now. Every h ilme here has a wall around it, a fence around it and razor wire all along the rop. So if the Mexican families need this ro be safe, then why should we ler MS13 run freely into the U.S.? The democrats say only 6 terrorists caught at the norder. Guess what it only takes ONE TERRORIST to cause a mass casualty!!!

MR PRESIDENT,  PLEASE BUILD THE WALL.   I TELL PEOPLE WHO THINK THAT IT IS USELESS,  TO POST THEIR ADDRESS AND OPEN THEIR DOORS  24/7 SO THAT MS-13 AND OTHERS CAN ENJOY  ALL THAT THEY OWN.

Marcus Rech MS13 is an AMERICAN gang, fyi.

Someone kill this fool trump already. Honestly learn your own fucking history. Ms13 was founded on the streets of L.A when honest migrants fleeing civil war are thrown in with Waring African American gangs. So what was America's solutions you sent them back to  El Salvador. A combination of extreme poverty and the effect's of a long and brutal civil war allowed this group to explode out of control.   Thankfully my parents chose Australia. But your problems have been around for a long time and it's not just Hispanic Americans that are the problem. African Americans have suffered time and time again nothing has gotten better, then we can jump to the real problem in America GUN'S! how many high school shootings have there been now fucking wake up to your self Mr president Karman is coming to bite you in the ass. It might not have been you that made all the problems but you haven't helped them either

The President is a member of ms13

Whem Pres Trump says 4000 undocumented illegals crossed over the southern border, the ICE stats suggest he is right!  ICE says •  Over a 10-year period (2005-2014) ICE arrested approximately 4,000 MS-13 members, leaders, and associates. This represents about 13 percent of all gang members they arrested nationwide (31,000) during that period.  •  92 percent of the MS-13 affiliated aliens arrested were illegal aliens.

Whem Pres Trump says 4000 undocumented illegals crossed over the southern border, the ICE stats suggest he is right!  ICE says •  Over a 10-year period (2005-2014) ICE arrested approximately 4,000 MS-13 members, leaders, and associates. This represents about 13 percent of all gang members they arrested nationwide (31,000) during that period.  •  92 percent of the MS-13 affiliated aliens arrested were illegal aliens.

Yes I have, most of the MS13 are not illegal immigrants. They were born in the USA.

please Nancy ... Explain.. Try real Hard.. Can you tell us why all your windows are Barred? Why at your mansion entrance... there stands an armed Guard? If we try to get past Him.. We would  be feathered and Tarred.... Yes Nancy ..Please.. Tell us again.. How MS-13 thugs are really our Friends..  You say who gets a Wall.. Just Depends.. Just Depends.. You tell us a Wall.. is a thing that offends.. To the rest of the world .. the bad message it Sends.. But Nancy... Explain.. If that were really True.. Why in the world ..is there a wall built around You?

A NATIONAL EMERGENCY WILL BE DECLARED TONIGHT AND MONEY WILL BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE WALL TO SECURE ONCE AND FOR ALL OUR SOUTHERN SICK BORDER. MEXICO 3RD WORLD COUNTRY HAS NOT HELPED US ONE BIT TO SECURE OUR SOUTHERN BORDER. THEY ARE THE PROBLEM. IF THEY WANT TO BECOME AMERICANS, BE VETTED AT OUR PORTS OF ENTRY. NO MORE SNEAKING IN ILLEGALLY AS CRIMINALS.

A wall is not going to stop immigrants all together!!  Let's change the laws.  No more welfare assistance, for the ones that are already here (legally and illegally) are abusing the system by having children and depending on the taxpayer to cover for their children upbringing.  Let's use technology to check all tractor trailers crossing the border full of immigrants like thermal imaging cameras, let's put some device to prevent anyone from digging tunnels.  All the immigrant already in this country, MUST SPEAK THE ENGLISH LANGUAGE, otherwise send them back, THEY MUST PAY TAXES, but most of all, THE IMMIGRANTS WHO ARE INVOLVED IN CRIMINAL ACTS MUST BE DEPORTED TO THE AUTHORITIES IN THEIR COUNTRY!!  Even the immigrants criminals are being supported at the expense of taxpayer.

AND ….. of course you're not doing ANYTHING with murderers and criminals and  here except saying they are very fine people ….. asshole. Daddy forgot to teach you what a heart is? Dunce! People …. white people, have been killing citizens here and a whole lot more than your examples! Timothy killed McVeigh 168 ….. and he was not brown.

All the Dems care about is illegals, invaders and criminals

Amedeo Corey  tear down the wall you say..........we all can put signs with arrows pointing the way to your house. You deal with them. Feed them, care for them for the rest of their lives. Let all the criminals go see you and your family instead. Put your loved ones at risk.  That's how you want it?  If a wall is mideval how come Obama has a wall around his house? Hmmmmmmmm🤔

America does not have a wall in time to chase dangerous criminals to successfully carry out illegal illegal drug dealing, there is a wall of criminals running out of business, we will commit this. finding every way into America, sabotaging America in the next time the LORD will bless America especially for President DONALD J, TRUMP will always be safe .

America does not have a wall in time to chase dangerous criminals to successfully carry out illegal illegal drug dealing, there is a wall of criminals running out of business, we will commit this. finding every way into America, sabotaging America in the next time the LORD will bless America especially for President DONALD J, TRUMP will always be safe .

America is truly a fucked up place. Thousands of Americans are shot by other Americans. You do nothing about gun control but are happy to spend millions to keep a handful of criminals out rather than deal with the ones you’ve already got.

American people will receive a smaller refund this year after filing their income tax returns. The Republican/Trump tax cuts is a big scam that only benefits the rich. That's all Paul Ryan wanted; he got it and ran away.    “Lower tax refunds might hurt the economy. If Americans are getting less money back, that might mean they're going to spend less of their refund.” - Jordan Valinsky  Your (small) refunds will be delayed thanks to President Donald Trump’s shutdown.  "I DIDN’T NEED TO DO THIS." - Donald Trump as he declares a national emergency taking billions of dollars away from our Veterans, and leaving for Florida for the weekend to PLAY GOLF.  “Trump biographer Craig Unger detailed Saturday morning the links between the president’s ties to the Russian mob and the silence of his former campaign manager Paul Manafort. Unger, author of House of Trump, House of Putin, explained on MSNBC’s AM Joy that unlike the Italian mafia, Russia mobsters report to Vladimir Putin — essentially making them “state actors” for the Kremlin. “I found 13 people who have had been in Trump Tower, associated with the Russian mafia,” the author explained, adding that the organized criminals “on and off for 35 years” used the president’s flagship Manhattan building “as a base of operations.” When Donald Trump “over expanded” in Atlantic City and went bankrupt to the tune of $4 billion, “Russian money played a huge, huge role” in his financial bounce-back.” – Noor Al-Sibai  JOIN THE GENERAL STRIKE APRIL 15, 2019. PROTEST THE ILLEGITIMATE CORRUPT CRUEL TRUMP ADMINISTRATION.  EVENT: GENERAL STRIKE TO REMOVE TRUMP FROM OFFICE.  WHEN: APRIL 15, 2019.  TIME: 12:00 AM TO 11:59 PM.  WHERE: THE STREETS AND HIGHWAYS ALL OVER THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA.

Americans kill way more and produce more crime than any other country in the world. We are number 1 in incarceration of criminals. Safe my ass Mexico is just poor and they want to come here for the benefits 95 percent of the immigrants who cross illegally are just trying to survive and 5 percent are what yall are complaining about but like I said U. S has way more criminals

Americans kill way more and produce more crime than any other country in the world. We are number 1 in incarceration of criminals. Safe my ass Mexico is just poor and they want to come here for the benefits 95 percent of the immigrants who cross illegally are just trying to survive and 5 percent are what yall are complaining about but like I said U. S has way more criminals

Americans now issue new compromise proposal.  Screw the Democrats.  No Amnesty.  Have the Military START BUILDING THE WALL, but do not announce it.  We don't give a damn about what the Democrat criminals say.  Build a WALL, not steel slats.  Keep the government shut!  Do not let the pressure off of the Democrat criminals. Start deporting the 11 million ILLEGAL ALIENS brought in through no fault of the American people.  And by the way, its more like 35 million, not 11 million.  This is our final offer.  The next step is to put Chuck and Nancy in prison in Guantanimo.

Americans now issue new compromise proposal.  Screw the Democrats.  No Amnesty.  Have the Military START BUILDING THE WALL, but do not announce it.  We don't give a damn about what the Democrat criminals say.  Build a WALL, not steel slats.  Keep the government shut!  Do not let the pressure off of the Democrat criminals. Start deporting the 11 million ILLEGAL ALIENS brought in through no fault of the American people.  And by the way, its more like 35 million, not 11 million.  This is our final offer.  The next step is to put Chuck and Nancy in prison in Guantanimo.

And Americans don’t drink and drive??   It’s just the brown skin people who aren’t allowed to be criminals. White Americans, can be.

Anyone want to play the Trump drinking game today? The words are: criminals MS-13 Wall Obama Collusion HRC Steel Slats Billions and Billions Terrorists The wall has already been built Mexico will pay for it See through steel Very dangerous southern border Drugs

As the wall is being built, I hope Mr. Trump will take other measures to keep criminals out of our country.  Anyone else feel this way?

Beth Ritchason those people have a right to be here. We don't need to import more criminals! DRUGS poor over that boarder and Americans die.

Build the wall Mr. President..  And to Nancy Pelosi's and your party, You people are looking at papers not reality.. Our President is looking out for us Legal citizens that live in the USA.. Not for the criminals,,, like you.. There is something going on with you Liberal democrats,,  Do you think if you bring in more illegals than allow them to vote you'll be control??  Is that all that matters to you??  You and your own money?? well why don't you pay some of these people that are not getting paid right now.. How much is our government paying illegals,, while we go without.. One illegal on a rampage is to many.. Our people come first.. And You Nancy and your cohorts is what is draining our system and putting the American people in danger..  Or are you just like crooked Hillary if 2 or 3 or 4 people die from illegals and say,, (So What)  !!!  How many people do we know are in these sanctuary cities..  If it is so damn safe here out in the open for us who are legal americans,,  why do the illegals get to go run and hide???  Why is that??  In my own Country..  I feel like I don't get a say.. but illegals do!!  People fleeing from other countries, we take them in,, they get housing, money, food,, vehicles, Dr.s, schools, colleges,  and what does it cost them?? And NO they shouldn't get medicare, for god sake,, I paid in and get 11,000 a year on my own SSDI and you people think I should share it, like I never worked my ass off for it..  I would like to know what you people are illegally so caught up in that you would let the american people be murdered or hurt, or raped, or trafficked by illegals, illegal gangs, drug smugglers,, and your Hate for our President who more than half America loves,,, to keep your control,  or whatever you are doing,, hidden from the truth.. And No most drugs are not coming thru the gates  more reading material have you!!!.. Have you talked to Vice?  Have you talked to the men and women who work those lines?  Have you been on any of the stake outs Nancy?  You don't think the children are a threat ??  they are raised to steal and rob. and knife someone,, and it may be to just survive for them but if you think for one minute any of them come over here and are totally rehabbed as soon as they cross that border you are sadly mistaken and Very Naive, so that's why I think all that matters to your party is control and money..  Not the american people...  And all nationalities come thru there from countries everywhere..  Their not stupid, they know how to do it..  and how many of our kids get picked up from here in our country and are taken back across the border, never to be seen again.. They are coming and going out too with illegal money,, with our children for god sake.. I don't care if the President said Mexico would pay for it... Actually if the government stopped paying illegals here in america for a damn week, we would have the money.. You and your party need to own this for people not getting paid as much as anyone..  all your party ever does is play the blame game and point fingers.. god forbid someone doesn't agree with your party or the Liberals.. Economically India is getting ahead of us, as is other countries,, but lets just keep letting them come and let them live better than we americans do while they are all out there protesting our government yet running away from their own..  Guilt is not Inherited..  Whatever this country did or didn't do 100 years ago and further is NOT todays problem.. why do they come here if they don't like it,, when they just left a hell hole..  Because they can that's why !! And they get rewarded for it instead of just being happy they got out of the hell they just left..  It is not up to us to take care of the world, nor should we.. Don't Guilt me. Don't manipulate me Nancy Pelosi  This is NOT about the american people to you, it's about your money.. None of you so called hard working people have a clue,,  You pay into nothing but your stocks.. But you want to keep taxing us to help illegals to help more , help more, help more.. and to help you..  when are you Democrats and Liberals going to start helping the american people that are already here..  what about our own homeless??  they just keep getting stepped on and pushed out of the way.. You Lie to the american People,,  you are NOT helping the President and haven't since day one.. Help us Nancy,, Help the United states of america and our President keep us safe...  You owe the American people Nancy Pelosi,,  We have done enough.. And the President knows that..   God Bless President Trump and his family..  Oh yay,,  Didn't Obama shut down the government too??  and others..  But it didn't affect you or your cohorts did it??  We seen you were all on vacations,, and making plans for your next dirty move.

Build the wall and start  spearing and displaying the heads of the heinous criminals caught being here and killing our citizens

Build the wall and then deport all criminals.

Build the wall! ALSO institute legislation for immediate death penalty for anyone attempting murder on a police officer! I am sick of seeing the death of our LEOs at the hands of criminals! PLEASE, please put this at the top of your list POTUS.

CALL OUT OUR MILITARY FOR national CRISIS! STOP THIS ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT CRIMINALS WHO ARE COMING HERE KILLING OUR AMERICAN PEOPLE! WE WANT BORDER WALL AND WE WANT IT NOW! THEY HAVE PLAYED GAMES WITH OUR LIVES AND OUR CHILDREN'S LIVES! THIS HAS TO BE DONE! EVERY SINGLE DEMOCRAT IN CONGRESS AND REPUBLICAN MADE THESE STUPID LAW'S ABOUT ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS AND THEY ARE THE CAUSE OF THIS CRAP! THEY ARE THE GUILTY ONE'S THAT HAVE DRAGGED THIS ON FOR YEAR'S AND NOW INSTEAD OF 3 MILLION ILLEGALS WE HAVE 30 MILLION AND MORE CROSSING EVERY DAY! IT'S TIME TO STOP THE LIARS WHO HAVE LIED TO THE AMERICAN VOTERS AND HAVE STOLEN OUR TAXES YEAR AFTER YEAR IN EVERY SINGLE ELECTION! DON'T BELIEVE ANY ONE IN THE DEMOCRATIC PARTY OR ESTABLISHMENT REPUBLICANS!

CONS AND CRIMINALS ! Don't forget what we are dealing with

CRIMINAL'S ARE WANTING TO DESTROY OUR COUNTRY, OUR PEOPLE.  DEALING DEADLY DRUG'S TO ANYONE.  OUR LIVE'S ARE OF NO VALUE TO THEM.  OUR CHILDREN ARE OF NO VALUE TO THEM.  WE MUST HAVE THAT WALL AND CONTROLL WHO ENTER'S.  DO NOT BELIEVE WHAT DEMOCRAT'S LIES THAT THEY FEED TO THE PUBLIC. WE WANT THAT WALL.

CRIMINALS COME IN ALL COLORS.....just saying.

Chad Kienitz Do you know how many AMERICAN BORN KILLERS ARE SITTING ON DEATH ROW EATING THREE MEALS A DAY GETTING MEDICAL ATTENTION.  You will not save this country with a wall period.  DONALD TRUMP "FOLLOWERS" OPEN YOUR EYES AND WIPE YOUR OWN ASS AND THINK FOR YOURSELF AND YOU WILL SEE HOW MANY AMERICANS ARE, ARE CURRENTLY, SUFFERING NOW OVER A WALL. THE HUMAN TRAFFIC SCANDAL IN ARIZONA ALLLLLLLLL AMERICAN BORN POLITICIANS!!! CRIMINALS COME IN ALL NATIONALITIES AND THE BIGGEST CRIMINAL OF ALL IS IN CHARGE OF THIS COUNTRY. DONALD TRUMP DOESN'T CARE WHO HE STEPS ONNNNN!! NOT OVER ON!! This is a political statement.  This wall is the most ridiculous thing ever.  "Followers" who can't wipe their own ass and who are waiting on Donald Trump to tell them when to jump and how high voted for this terrorist because they can't think for themselves.  DONALD TRUMP is a TERRORIST: a person who uses intimidation, especially against civilians, in the pursuit of political aims.

Charlesetta Brown there are tons of crimes by illegals that go unreported by media. And, you make the point for us supporters. We have enough home grown criminals to deal with, without opening the border for criminals from other countries. We have far too much crime as it is, and do not need more. So, your argument just worked against you. Thanks for playing, we'll see next week on the wall has begun

Charlesetta Brown there are tons of crimes by illegals that go unreported by media. And, you make the point for us supporters. We have enough home grown criminals to deal with, without opening the border for criminals from other countries. We have far too much crime as it is, and do not need more. So, your argument just worked against you. Thanks for playing, we'll see next week on the wall has begun

Dave Callender   Regardles of any crimes commitef by them after they get here,It is illegal  to sneak into the country,. When an american citizens break any laws we are held accountable.  They shouldn't be an exception. They  are criminals because they brpke  the law.

Democrat socialists call the invasion of criminals " manufactured". Pelosi said Trump is delusional,there's no crisis. When they're,along with Soros & his buddy are org & paying these caravans of enemies? They are committing treason against Americans while trying to disarm citizens, not criminals. Hitlers.

Democrat socialists call the invasion of criminals " manufactured". Pelosi said Trump is delusional,there's no crisis. When they're,along with Soros & his buddy are org & paying these caravans of enemies? They are committing treason against Americans while trying to disarm citizens, not criminals. Hitlers.

Dems are criminals

Dennis J Sitko they’re our citizens and they will be punished. We don’t need criminals from other countries.

Diane Ohize, That analogy of a wall that separated two countries, one free and the other over a communist dictatorship is typical of the kind of narrative the Democrats sell to the vulnerable and uneducated for many, many year's now!!If criminals from other countries were sneaking into a communist country seeking a better life you could use it however we know it's apple's and orange's so let's just "their you go again" do you remember Regan using that phrase everytime the Democrats would try and slip one through the goalie!!

Did I say import more criminals ? I dont see that in my comment ? But you cant go around blaming immagrants for every bad thing that happens and say nothing when your own does the same.

Dims want THEIR way; don't care about what the people they're supposedly representing want--don't care if we're safe, have jobs, no criminals or drugs in our neighborhoods--they want to be re-elected and need illegal people to fraudently vote for them

Do work on immigration and border security AFTER restarting the government.  This crippling Trump/McConnell Shutdown is causing more harm than the few illegals you claim are criminals and drug dealers.  Shame on you and all who think that any wall is worth this chaos caused by your selfish unwillingness to compromise!

Do you know how many AMERICAN BORN KILLERS ARE SITTING ON DEATH ROW EATING THREE MEALS A DAY GETTING MEDICAL ATTENTION.  You will not save this country with a wall period.  DONALD TRUMP "FOLLOWERS" OPEN YOUR EYES AND WIPE YOUR OWN ASS AND THINK FOR YOURSELF AND YOU WILL SEE HOW MANY AMERICANS ARE, ARE CURRENTLY, SUFFERING NOW OVER A WALL. THE HUMAN TRAFFIC SCANDAL IN ARIZONA ALLLLLLLLL AMERICAN BORN POLITICIANS!!! CRIMINALS COME IN ALL NATIONALITIES AND THE BIGGEST CRIMINAL OF ALL IS IN CHARGE OF THIS COUNTRY. DONALD TRUMP DOESN'T CARE WHO HE STEPS ONNNNN!! NOT OVER ON!! This is a political statement.  This wall is the most ridiculous thing ever.  "Followers" who can't wipe their own ass and who are waiting on Donald Trump to tell them when to jump and how high voted for this terrorist because they can't think for themselves.  DONALD TRUMP is a TERRORIST: a person who uses intimidation, especially against civilians, in the pursuit of political aims.

Don't give in an inch. NEVER bargain with criminals for what is right.

Donald Trump is the best President ever and the democrat communists are the worst criminals ever

Donna Barnes, Are you really trying to compare a home privacy fence or wall with a 2,000 mile 30’ wall that’s supposed to secure our borders ? Besides the fact that Obama does not have a wall around his home it would not stop serious criminals nor would Trumps wall. The wall around the Vatican was built in  the year 848, over 1,150 years ago. Probably was the latest technology at the time. Very silly and childish comparisons.

Emily Neal Americans will never go for it. They are smart enough to know that only the law abiding will turn in guns, leaving them completely defenseless against criminals.

Emily Neal so more gun laws that criminals wont obey, got it

Emily Neal underground weapons🙄 will always make it into the hands of criminals thus we don’t need to make laws making it harder for upstanding citizens with no record to own them!

Especially since we know criminals  and terrorists who come over illegally know they are protected by  the democrats.

Excellent points from Marianne. So sorry for your loss and many other losses due to the criminals that are coming over the Border. The Democrats have destroyed our freedom and our safety because of their selfishness and their lust for money. President Trump is fighting very hard to make things better and safer for us and expose the Democrats for who they really are.... Heartless Liars who just want their power and their money back. Our United States is not their personal piggy bank. We must be strong and safe and United the way we used to be. Many thanks to President Donald Trump! ❤

Fernando B Nava yes we have enough criminals here already. We dont need any more

For more than a century, innumerable studies have confirmed two simple yet powerful truths about the relationship between immigration and crime: immigrants are less likely to commit serious crimes or be behind bars than the native-born, and high rates of immigration are associated with lower rates of violent crime and property crime. This holds true for both legal immigrants and the unauthorized, regardless of their country of origin or level of education. In other words, the overwhelming majority of immigrants are not “criminals” by any commonly accepted definition of the term. For this reason, harsh immigration policies are not effective in fighting crime. Unfortunately, immigration policy is frequently shaped more by fear and stereotype than by empirical evidence. As a result, immigrants have the stigma of “criminality” ascribed to them by an ever-evolving assortment of laws and immigration-enforcement mechanisms. Put differently, immigrants are being defined more and more as threats. Whole new classes of “felonies” have been created which apply only to immigrants, deportation has become a punishment for even minor offenses, and policies aimed at trying to end unauthorized immigration have been made more punitive rather than more rational and practical. In short, immigrants themselves are being criminalized.

Francine, like Prison walls, they won't keep the criminals out :D great metaphor though ;)

Galdamez Robert he never once said Mexico was gonna write a check. Any smart person knows mexico will pay indirectly by tax payers money we save not having to deal with the south American criminals just walking straight into our country unchecked.

Georgiann Gonsalves stop drugs, criminals, and gangs. You don’t live near the border. You seem not to care about citizens dying .

Heart broken story shared by a loving father. We need to remove illegals because no matter what you like to call them, by breaking into our country make them the criminal they are. We need to secure our border and keep those criminals away from our home

Heather Gurtlinger he lied about the 4000 people that were criminals arrested at the southern border, only 12 of those 4000 came from the southern border, he lied to the American people every day he lies to his wives about how many times he cheats on them, then he lies about paying off the whores that he cheated with, he lies about hiring the best people, he hires crooks and that's it. He lies about knowing the most about everything he ever possibly talks about, because he doesn't know a damn thing about anything, except for running businesses and countries into the ground and bankrupting them. He lied about getting a one million dollar loan from his father to start his business because he already had over 8 billion dollars at that point from all the tax fraud him and his father committed. He lied about being a Christian, the only time he's ever been in a church is for a photo op or to try to talk the hypocritical evangelist into supporting him. I could go on and on, but you've obviously drank the kool aid and you're too stupid to realize when you're being lied to, that's why Trump says he loves the poorly educated he likes them stupid, so they believe his lies.

Hey zippy, we don't need to import more criminals we have enough of our own !

How much more is spent on catch and release programs that the dems want to increase more per year than the wall would cost? How much more does it cost for jobs working off the books so taxes don't go where they should go, where the people working off the books get hurt and can't get medical? How much more does it cost for the gangs that, for me, is walking distance from my house, and all the harm they do every single day. There were over reported 1,000 crimes in the town that was my school district's town last year, about four reported crimes a day. On my way to work, depending on the time of day, there are about fifteen day laborers waiting for off the book work in an area, usually two or three groupings of men who are perfectly capable of work, which means they can't legally get work, which means they're criminals or not here legally. These are jobs that would pay better with benefits if it was done right. We need better policies for immigration control, and we need better ways for people to come here legally. In my eyes that means we need a wall with guards, but we also need more agencies out there to speed up the process needed for those who should be here legally to do so. We need what Ellis Island was, but in New York, California, and Texas, with branches set up in each state that reports back to those three places. We need an overhaul. We need a wall. We can fix things from there.

How will you protect us from the thousands of American criminals already inside??😏

I believe in legal immigration but not illegal immigration.  If this continue this country will become a cesspool.  We have enough crime from our own citizens. We don’t need criminals from other countries

I don't see any problem of having a border wall at all, it is important, it is essential and it is necessary to have it. Those illegal immigrants digging a hole under or climbing over  are criminals. If my country has problems other than war do I illegally run away  to the neighboring country ? No.

I figure any American would want security. If anyone wants to come to this country than good let them in. However, do it the right way through a border to be screened. No telling how many people are coming through that are criminals. I feel anyone should be able to come to this country, but why would you want people just coming in waves that have the potential to bring more crime to your city.

I have an idea President Trump, why don't you threaten to tear down the walls at the California and Texas borders.  Then we'll see just how quickly Pelosi (and all the American people that cannot see the value and necessity of having walls and security) realizes that we need them...  Anyone is welcome into our country as long as you are vetted, non-criminals, healthy, and legal.  The same process our grand, great grand, great great grand parents had to go through.  Filled out the proper paper work, quarantined until well, became legal and paid taxes, and turned away if they were criminals.  It is much, much easier for the Cartel and terrorists (from all over the world) to get into our country from Mexico.  This is really scary America!  We need security at our borders, people!

I strongly feel that if Govenors / Senators /  Congressmen & Attorney Generals keep protecting criminals or Illegal immigrants that cause harm & crime to the people of the USA & keep protecting harboring the repeat offenders & aiding & abetting " " Sanctuary Cities or " illegals " regardless of nationality & the criminals & committing treason against the people of the USA... That the people of that State should file a Federal Class Action lawsuit & start a go fund me account to pay for it...  ;) just a thought... ;)   SHARE IT YOU AGREE OR IF YOU FEEL FROGGY...

I strongly feel that if Govenors / Senators /  Congressmen & Attorney Generals keep protecting criminals or Illegal immigrants that cause harm & crime to the people of the USA & keep protecting harboring the repeat offenders & aiding & abetting " " Sanctuary Cities or " illegals " regardless of nationality & the criminals & committing treason against the people of the USA... That the people of that State should file a Federal Class Action lawsuit & start a go fund me account to pay for it...  ;) just a thought... ;)   SHARE IT YOU AGREE OR IF YOU FEEL FROGGY...

I think I am going to answer your question, Mr. President. The Wall issue is not only political but also it is a DO or DIE situation for the Democrats, Sir. They know very well if they allow you to get the $5.7 billion to build the Wall, they will have no chance what so ever to win in 2020. They do not care about 800,000 Federal Employees not having their salaries; they do not care about whether a bunch of Terrorists and Criminals entering our Country; they do not care about the cost of feeding the illegal aliens who are already in our Country, they do not care about the criminal activities and killing innocent citizens, Sir the List is too long to mention. I am sure that We The People and the Federal Employees are aware of this situation; if anyone blames you he/she is totally out their minds! Mr. President, if you give up and go along with these Evil People in the Democratic Party, I do not think that you can win the Election in 2020, Sir! Therefore, you must hang in there, Sir.  If I may make another suggestion, Mr. President, if you could convince Turkish President Erdogan and The Israeli PM Nathanyahu for a sit-Down with you and convince them to reestablish their Friendship; Your problems in the Middle-East would be solved! Kurds can pull back to Northern Iraq to their autonomous republic and eventually have the Independent Republic their own, Turks will have to pull out Syria! They may have10 miles a bumper zone between Syria and their Country! Israel and Saudis in the South and the Turks in the North, with couple thousand American Troops stationed in Incirlik Air Base and Naval support Base in Iskenderun. I do not think anyone in the middle of this SET-UP will create any PROBLEMS! This is MY OPINION, some people may not agree with it!

I thinks it’s funny how people are bitching about this government shutdown when Obama did the exact same thing for freaking Obamacare.  At least a border would help keep criminals, drugs and illegal immigrants out our country.

I totally agree especially here in California where the criminals have more right than the victims.

I want to protect Mexico from the guns flowing in to the cartels’ hands from the US.   Protect little Foreign boy’s and girls from being smuggled north and raped by rich pedophile Hollywood Elites and  other Democrats.  Stop powerful drugs that are being introduced to all races of Americans and wreaking havoc on their lives, their health, and their loved ones.  Stop the unnecessary deaths caused by the lure of an open border, and by the criminals that repeatedly enter illegally and do harm to our citizens and legal residents..  Democrats never opposed a wall as part of border security until they decided that if Patriotic, Constitution loving, law abiding citizens will not support their extremely authoritarian and oppressive agenda, they would create Sanctuaries for illegal aliens to colonize America with people who know how to live under oppression and accept authoritarian rule.

I wish our president would just get his pen out and declare a national emergency! These socialist Democrats are nothing but traitors to the safety of our country!!!! WHATS IT GOING TO TAKE TO ARREST THESE CRIMINALS HIDING IN THE HALLS OF CONGRESS AND THE SENATE..... not to mention the governors!!!!

I won't deny the fact that America has a gun problem, though we can't act like illegal immigration isn't an issue.  While not every immigrant is a threat to society, we cannot deny the fact some of them are, even if they're a minority. Some are even wanted criminals.  Not to mention that if Orange-man were to actually implement stricter firearm control, there would still be a lot of contraband crossing the border because of the lack of immigration control. Not just drugs, but unlicensed weapons as well.  They're basically fuel for the black market which puts unlicensed weapons in the wrong hands. this in itself is valid reason to encourage possession of a firearm to protect one's self against this threat.  I think that fixing (or at least minimizing) the contraband problem is the first step towards implementing a better, more efficient gun control project since the population will feel more secure.  Whether building a wall is the best solution is up for debate. On the surface it looks extreme, but we won't know its efficiency until it's finalized. Until then, people will have a valid argument to defend both the second amendment and the wall. Pierre-Luc Vachon

I would sue Nancy Pelosi and every person that voted against border security. I would sue the sanctuary cities that put these criminals up for refuge. I do NOT support frivolous lawsuits. However, I do not believe this would be a frivolous lawsuit. I believe it would be a wake up call to those who oppose the safety of the American people.

I'm from El Paso , Texas I live in a border city. That wall will work against criminal activity for sure and I'm around those type of people that the government calls criminals. I'm with you Trump build the wall. realDonaldTrump

IM SO SORRY FOR ALL THE PEOPLE WHO HAS LOST THEIR LOVE ONES IN THE HANDS OF A CRIMINALS.  BUT, WE CANNOT BUILD A WALL AROUND ALL THE AMERICANS CITIZENS WHO COMMIT A CRIME AND KILLED OUR LOVE ONES TOO, SO, A WALL, IS NOT THE ANSWER TO THIS PROBLEM.

If criminals use Ports of Entry. Why do they dig so many tunnels along the border?

If it ain't guns they will use bombs go educate yourself. These gun laws don't work for criminals dumb ass

If our borders are not protected then we have more of the criminals, drugs, gangs, killings! I live in Texas as many relatives do!  It is unsafe and we need the protection from the walls!  You democrats who have never been to a border state or know of the dangers are Spewing vitriol just like your fake news and leaders.  Friends in NewMexico and Arizona are going through the same thing! Calif. has become “tent city” and border towns are Wanting the protection also!

If walls worked you dipshit, there wouldn't be any drugs, criminals, human trafficking going on. You're just too stupid to understand that. #Conofthedeals

Illegal drugs killed mine 👺🙈🙊🙉Fake media and uncaring Demolition Dems haters of Justice & citizens & security sanctuary for illegals and homeless & criminals 👹👺🤷‍♀️what can we do these fools are evil

It is not an iligal immigrant, it is an illegal criminal that crossed our boarder. California state government should be charged with harboring these criminals. Take their statehood away and put them back in territory status.

It's because she can't wash away their blood in her hands and very obvious, she has no plan to stop  the illegal aliens from coming into the USA to prevent the same crimes that were committed by these aliens against peaceful American families. It is a Deplorable act of a so-called lawmaker and speaker of Congress. She is not a real speaker for the People of this country. she is a speaker for illegal aliens and criminals getting into the country and providing them safe havens and money.

I’m sorry but all illegal aliens aren’t criminals just look at that white guy yesterday killing five and wounding six. When is the Orange Dotard going to do something about that?

Jackie Lee Collins American prisons are filled with Americans.  And?  You think because we have criminals here we should invite more criminals to come here?     Were you born this stupid or did you have to work at it?

Jackie Lee Collins American prisons are filled with Americans.  And?  You think because we have criminals here we should invite more criminals to come here?     Were you born this stupid or did you have to work at it?

Jeff Tucker Chuck Schumer just a few years ago was calling illegal aliens "criminals," saying that if someone cared "about America" then they would want "fewer illegal immigrants"  When did you stop caring 😂

Jerry Wilcox 60% plus Americans don’t want a wall from sea to shining sea!  What the mojority of Americans want is secure borders! We want modern technology, the same technology that the criminals are using! If we dont step up to the plate and modernize how we secure our borders the drug cartels and the few illegals that try will breach the outdated wall. Please remember walls can be tunneled under, climbed over and in some cases through the walls themselves! Let’s use our heads please!

Jill Nawrocki Dienes drugs get in them too... Prisons are for criminals whom has actually committed a crime.

Jim Plesko, Bill Petenes, Anne Bowey-Petenes, Maggie Anderson, Rosemarie Raz Beasley 🇺🇸🇺🇸  WHY DO WE LET PELOSI, CHUCKY, WATERS and thier Left-Winged Bunch of Demodards KEEP DOING THIS..... Thier hands are covered in legal American Citizens Blood WHILE letting in ILLEGAL CRIMINALS GET INTO OUR COUNTY AND HANDING OUT FREE MEDICAL SERVICES.

Jonathan Schremp God don't bless Corrupt Criminals Bigotic stupid Morons Kidnapper Racists KKK Members and Traitors Liars Bigotic Morons Pussy Grabber and Cheater and Bone Spurse  Proof : Read Bible Low Minded Trumpee  Unbelivable what naive uneducated Brainless People live in USA

Joseph R Phipps no Manafort did things on the campaign as well. Probably at the direction of Trump. He's a very crooked man. You think he was clean and good while runing another criminals campaign. Have you seen his court documents. Hundreds of redactions. Hmmmm....probably nothing to do with your god Trump.  You claim all these things but don't back them up with any sources which leads me to believe you get these tidbits from some crazy conspiracy news. You might want to see a psychatrist for your obsession with Obama. Your constant deflections are getting old.

Just do it do it do it.... Nobody loves crimes and criminals

Just like banning guns wont keep criminals from getting them, a wall won't stop  someone who really wants to from getting in.

Justice for Dominic Durden, Jamiel "Jas" Shaw II, Joshua Wilkerson, Ronil Singh, Sandra Duran, Kathryn Steinle, Nisa Mickens, Kayla Cuevas and all who were killed by illegal immigrant criminals. #EndSanctuaryCities #Buildthewall

Karen Hollis  keeping dangerous criminals ,and drugs out the best we can

Keep the caravan of criminals OUT! #BUILDTHEWALL

Kelly Preiss Wilhelm I never want to see anyone killed period. He does talk about it though.   “It’s criminals which will always have guns “. We could ban all guns in America.   The criminals would still have them.  Gun control only disarms the good ppl.  I’m so sorry you lost someone to this crime invested country.  And we all need to work together to push out the bad.  Not argue.  There’s a lot more good ppl than bad.  Ppl has to stand up to the thugs.  They’re out numbered by far.

Kelly Preiss Wilhelm I never want to see anyone killed period. He does talk about it though.   “It’s criminals which will always have guns “. We could ban all guns in America.   The criminals would still have them.  Gun control only disarms the good ppl.  I’m so sorry you lost someone to this crime invested country.  And we all need to work together to push out the bad.  Not argue.  There’s a lot more good ppl than bad.  Ppl has to stand up to the thugs.  They’re out numbered by far.

Kim Miller  lol lol I love when you idiot say this! I do! So your cure is to take guns away from non criminals so that when criminals Illegally get a gun theLaw abiding citizens can't protect themselves! You definitely are a Dem! Lol No better then Obama care or the new universal health care that your demoRATs want to try AGAIN????

Kim Miller  lol lol I love when you idiot say this! I do! So your cure is to take guns away from non criminals so that when criminals Illegally get a gun theLaw abiding citizens can't protect themselves! You definitely are a Dem! Lol No better then Obama care or the new universal health care that your demoRATs want to try AGAIN????

LET'S IMPORT MORE CRIMINALS!!!- Jesus Ayala

Larry Fields, they are not all criminals just as all Americans are not criminals.  Not allowing those entrance who are seeking refuge or a better life is criminal!  Goodbye!

Larry Fields, they are not all criminals just as all Americans are not criminals.  Not allowing those entrance who are seeking refuge or a better life is criminal!  Goodbye!

Larry Williams Costing Americans 275 billion to pay for illegals. Not right. They are criminals breaking our laws.

Latoryaira Schnell Peoples If you want to keep bury your head in the sand, sure. Here's just one study in Arizona:  "This data do not rely on self-reporting by criminals. Undocumented immigrants are at least 142% more likely to be convicted of a crime than other Arizonans. They also tend to commit more serious crimes and serve 10.5% longer sentences, more likely to be classified as dangerous, and 45% more likely to be gang members than U.S. citizens."  https://crimeresearch.org/2018/01/impact-illegal-aliens-crime-rates/

Let's not forget our broken judicial system, criminals are getting away with murder and with a team of klepto serial killers. Can you believe some criminals go to jail for other criminals crimes and get released years later as planned.

Let's not forget our broken judicial system, criminals are getting away with murder and with a team of klepto serial killers. Can you believe some criminals go to jail for other criminals crimes and get released years later as planned.

Let's not forget our broken judicial system, criminals are getting away with murder and with a team of klepto serial killers. Can you believe some criminals go to jail for other criminals crimes and get released years later as planned.

Liberals care more for illegal invaders and criminals than Americans.  Thank GOD for President Trump!  MAGA

Mary Larkin American people will receive a smaller refund this year after filing their income tax returns. The Republican/Trump tax cuts is a big scam that only benefits the rich. That's all Paul Ryan wanted; he got it and ran away.    “Lower tax refunds might hurt the economy. If Americans are getting less money back, that might mean they're going to spend less of their refund.” - Jordan Valinsky  Your (small) refunds will be delayed thanks to President Donald Trump’s shutdown.  "I DIDN’T NEED TO DO THIS." - Donald Trump as he declares a national emergency taking billions of dollars away from our Veterans, and leaving for Florida for the weekend to PLAY GOLF.  “Trump biographer Craig Unger detailed Saturday morning the links between the president’s ties to the Russian mob and the silence of his former campaign manager Paul Manafort. Unger, author of House of Trump, House of Putin, explained on MSNBC’s AM Joy that unlike the Italian mafia, Russia mobsters report to Vladimir Putin — essentially making them “state actors” for the Kremlin. “I found 13 people who have had been in Trump Tower, associated with the Russian mafia,” the author explained, adding that the organized criminals “on and off for 35 years” used the president’s flagship Manhattan building “as a base of operations.” When Donald Trump “over expanded” in Atlantic City and went bankrupt to the tune of $4 billion, “Russian money played a huge, huge role” in his financial bounce-back.” – Noor Al-Sibai  JOIN THE GENERAL STRIKE APRIL 15, 2019. PROTEST THE ILLEGITIMATE CORRUPT CRUEL TRUMP ADMINISTRATION.  EVENT: GENERAL STRIKE TO REMOVE TRUMP FROM OFFICE.  WHEN: APRIL 15, 2019.  TIME: 12:00 AM TO 11:59 PM.  WHERE: THE STREETS AND HIGHWAYS ALL OVER THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA.

Matt Martine but criminal's dont care about gun laws they go around them but all these gun laws hurt law abiding people guns dont kill people, people kill people.

Maybe if they would take these illigals that do this and execute them, maybe this stuff would stop, their not saposed to. Be hear to bigin with so !!!, but, he's probably in a jail getting free meals at the tax payers expence since we live in a country with BS laws enforced by idiots that beleive in the laws that are made to protect the rich and the criminals

Mitch Haynie just like if Ted Bundy wasn't here right? Just like if Rudolph wasn't here right? The facts are the criminals are a dime a dozen like always. The majority of us are law abiding, and just fucking work to pay bills. You've all got some lazy ass, shitty no good criminals, in all your families as well. Should that label your entire family as criminals, or just the asshat who committed the crime? So entitled you are 🤣👍

Mitch Haynie just like if Ted Bundy wasn't here right? Just like if Rudolph wasn't here right? The facts are the criminals are a dime a dozen like always. The majority of us are law abiding, and just fucking work to pay bills. You've all got some lazy ass, shitty no good criminals, in all your families as well. Should that label your entire family as criminals, or just the asshat who committed the crime? So entitled you are 🤣👍

Mitch Haynie just like if Ted Bundy wasn't here right? Just like if Rudolph wasn't here right? The facts are the criminals are a dime a dozen like always. The majority of us are law abiding, and just fucking work to pay bills. You've all got some lazy ass, shitty no good criminals, in all your families as well. Should that label your entire family as criminals, or just the asshat who committed the crime? So entitled you are 🤣👍

More. Criminals are coming.  Liberals wants all of them. Here.  They protect theirs houses and have extra proteccion. What about. We. The. People. 🤷🏻‍♀️🤷🏻‍♀️🤷🏻‍♀️🤷🏻‍♀️😭

Most criminals don't use a gun that they legally bought FYI

Most of them are CRIMINALS,  so sorry for your loss!

Mr President,  You’ve done an amazing job . But many things still need to be imploded. CAIR must be removed from these shores. They do not have any desire to coexist. Lastly, we must demand they either assimilate or leave. This religion is not one of peace. It is political ideology using a religion to slowly conquer a town, a state, a nation, the world. This is beyond debate.   Education in this country is a straight “build a Marxist sheep” program at every grade level. This is by far is your most important task and perhaps longest  lasting move to ensure the radical leftist globalist never drive the country into the toilet again.   I do trust the plan. I know that where we go one we go all. However, I do believe that many American loving  patriots will totally lose faith in you and our nation if the criminals are not brought to justice in a public and big way. How are we going to prevent American Politicians of the future from becoming Clinton/Obama criminals who hate and destroy America. We must have a visual Nuremberg - A watershed moment where traitors, child killers, and their ilk meet MAGA justice.  Deep state justice is a massive part of the MAGA patriot’s expectation.  Furthermore , pedophiles and child killers should be dealt with as prescribed by the Bible. A rope, a millstone, and a body of water. Those that would harm a child deserve the darkest justice our nation can offer.  You are a master level troll. I suggest you take it up a notch. Education debt is killing this country’s college graduates. Can you imagine how a college graduate’s life might change if they were informed that their eighty thousand debt was reduced to zero? Imagine what that might do for our economy.  But there’s a catch. They must donate two thousand dollars to the building and or maintainance of our southern border wall. If a person is unable to pay that amount then they can pay monthly for five months. Finally, every person who donates to the wall gets 5”x5” sign with their name. They also rescieve a photo of their sign on the wall and its precise mile location.  Many thanks and may God continue to bless and protect you.  Sincerely,  The Garners

Mr President,  You’ve done an amazing job . But many things still need to be imploded. CAIR must be removed from these shores. They do not have any desire to coexist. Lastly, we must demand they either assimilate or leave. This religion is not one of peace. It is political ideology using a religion to slowly conquer a town, a state, a nation, the world. This is beyond debate.   Education in this country is a straight “build a Marxist sheep” program at every grade level. This is by far is your most important task and perhaps longest  lasting move to ensure the radical leftist globalist never drive the country into the toilet again.   I do trust the plan. I know that where we go one we go all. However, I do believe that many American loving  patriots will totally lose faith in you and our nation if the criminals are not brought to justice in a public and big way. How are we going to prevent American Politicians of the future from becoming Clinton/Obama criminals who hate and destroy America. We must have a visual Nuremberg - A watershed moment where traitors, child killers, and their ilk meet MAGA justice.  Deep state justice is a massive part of the MAGA patriot’s expectation.  Furthermore , pedophiles and child killers should be dealt with as prescribed by the Bible. A rope, a millstone, and a body of water. Those that would harm a child deserve the darkest justice our nation can offer.  You are a master level troll. I suggest you take it up a notch. Education debt is killing this country’s college graduates. Can you imagine how a college graduate’s life might change if they were informed that their eighty thousand debt was reduced to zero? Imagine what that might do for our economy.  But there’s a catch. They must donate two thousand dollars to the building and or maintainance of our southern border wall. If a person is unable to pay that amount then they can pay monthly for five months. Finally, every person who donates to the wall gets 5”x5” sign with their name. They also rescieve a photo of their sign on the wall and its precise mile location.  Many thanks and may God continue to bless and protect you.  Sincerely,  The Garners

Mr. President, I feel we should stand together to rise, what’s the root of the problems? I don’t believe in walls but I am not a criminal, I feel that the criminals are protected, & the innocent aren’t so the bad outweighs the good. I believe anything can be fixed, call me country if you want lol

Mr. President, While I agree we DO need a good wall on the Southern border to help BP, the biggest issue with immigrants living here ILLEGALLY is the VISA OVERSTAYERS, that come in & refuse to leave when their time is up, they KNOW when they get that visa that it is a TEMPORARY VISIT but our Gov't has done NOTHING to them for violating U.S. Immigration LAWS! It's been a big problem for DECADES, it's not new & STILL in 2019 thee is no solution to this?? DACA protection will NOT solve anything either! Is it ONLY for those who have it now OR would you continue to grant it to more? Reagan gave the Illegals a path to citizenship & all it did was start the massive problem we have now :( They get welfare & food stamps for the ANCHOR BABIES & some even get SSD for them, we give them FEDERAL TAX ID NUMBERS to work ILLEGALLY in the USA, many "lawmakers" have enacted "Sanctuary Cities" protecting ILLEGAL CRIMINALS, my question is WHY have OUR top Gov't officials done this to Americans? And WHERE DOES IT END? Until ALL these things are addressed & stopped, Americans will continue to suffer & be robbed while those in DC, Governors Mansions, etc. are NOT affected :( SHAME ON ALL WHO LET IT GET THIS OUT OF CONTROL!!!!!

Mr. President, the protection of our beloved nation ALSO comes through an honorable, Constitutional DOJ. Your nominee HAS TESTIFIED THAT HE DOES NOT SUPPORT THE 2ND AMENDMENT!   WE CANNOT AFFORD ANOTHER BAD DOJ! Your time in office is too short and precious!   PLEASE PULL THIS NOMINATION AND GIVE US A STRONG CONSTITUTIONAL DOJ WHO WILL ASSIGN ANOTHER SPECIAL COUNSEL TO INVESTIGATE THE TRUE CORRUPTION OF THE CLINTONS, AND OBAMA, THE FBI AND THE DOJ AND STATE DEPT AND HUD!  WE NEED CRIMINAL PROSECUTION OF ALL OF THESE TREASONOUS CRIMINALS!  AND PLEASE DESTROY THE ILLEGAL DATABASE THAT OBAMA HAS ON US ALL!

My heart is broken for you. It is past time to have this issue addressed and the criminals handled and our American laws enforced!

Mystique, What is your point?  other than we have ENOUGH Legal criminals so why are we IMPORTING them?????

NO-ONE in their right mind, would want Open borders. 8-)   The ONLY ones who want open borders, are Illegals, criminals, and the ones who would profit from foreigners entering America Illegally. :(

Nancy should know better...as a woman looking in these moms eyes and seeing the pain...and many more to come if we dont put up the wall stop letting more criminals in this country we have enough already

No. They don’t.   "Because the people of this country don't want criminals and people that have lots of problems and drugs pouring into our country. So I will take the mantle. I will be the one to shut it down. I'm not going to blame you for it," Trump continued, seemingly oblivious to the fact that he was taking ownership of a potentially costly and unpopular breakdown in federal government operations.

Not all immigrants are committing crime Mr Honourable President arrest criminals and let the children women and men get assistance or build them a city were there can work on the American system and economy

Peasants and criminals, just say no

People don’t realize that these people coming here the wrong way could be criminals. Also they try to bring drugs over in turn kill our loved ones.

People who don't want the wall are for criminals -aka. Democrats. We elected President Trump to fight criminals and we want him to . #BUILDTHEWALL

People who don't want the wall are for criminals -aka. Democrats. We elected President Trump to fight criminals and we want him to . #BUILDTHEWALL

Piper Tunno the shooters are either dead or in prison.  We have criminal citizens who are punished. We don’t need to add illegal criminals from other countries to the ones we already have.

Places that have the strictest gun control measures have the most gun violence making it harder for law abiding citizens to have guns while criminals continue to get them however they please makes zero sense! It makes people less safer!

Please stop listening to anyone but God and yourself!  Hold the line!!  I know they are hammering you but they always have.  Democcults want our nation overrun with criminals and drugs.  Start looking for the money and bank accounts they keep it in for selling our nation and our citizens out and then return it to the American Taxpayers they stole it from!

President Trump, why cannot some of the funds from the Wall come from the money taken by, whoever it was, from the Social Security fund? Why are politicians still being paid when government workers who are doing their jobs are not? Why do politicians even get paid at all when they are not taking care of business? Politicians work for the people that elected them, not for illegals and criminals, and they were not elected to line their own pockets. This Wall is referred to as "Trumps Wall", it is not Trumps Wall it is America's and the American peoples Wall. Why are you getting all the blame when the left is fighting you every step of the way. What happened to all the funds that were allocated for the Wall before you even thought about running for President? Mr. President, what can we, the American people do to help you and ourselves? How do we go about setting term limits for Congress since they continue to pass laws that exclude them from having to buy Obama Care, etc., So many questions, so many problems and issues. What can we do?

Prison walls dont stop criminals what makes yall Republicunts think it will stop illegal immigrants from getting here. Yall are really that dumb

Prosecute EVERY DEM WHO AIDS AND ABETS CRIMINALS COMING ACROSS OUR BORDERS!

Putting criminals behind bars, that would include you. Now sit back as the mass of foriegn tRump bot comment away

Question about any one that believes walls won’t work do prisons deploy walls anyone I’ve ever seen does I surely don’t see criminals running wild

Right, build the wall and throw the trashes out from USA. Then invite the good people to work or to live and make a better place. Say no to Criminals and robbers and killer communities.

Roy Meston do you have a door on your home? Do you lock it?  It’s the same concept as the wall. Keeps out the criminals that want to enter illegally. Nothing wrong with immigration done legally.

SO it's a competition?! I s that  what your point is?! Or are you saying that crime by our own citizens justifies letting illegals border jumpers in?! "Meaningful gun reform?!" Exactly what is that?!  Most of the schools and mass shooters have obtained their weapons LEGALLY, through background checks and "common sense gun controls!" The Florida theatre shooter bought one just for the occasion the day of the shooting! Or then you have those who are criminals like the Aurora shooter of 5 who couldn't get a legal gun so guess what he did, come on Chris, guess what HE DID?! He got one ILLEGALLY!  Not one gun used in a mass shooting in this country was acquired by private sale or transfer either! The UnConstitutional Common sense gun controls we allowed last time with the promise "this will fix the problem" even knowing it would not, have failed miserably and cannot be documented as saving ONE, not ONE American life! You know what has worked, good law abiding citizens who were armed and shot back! You really are a myopic liberal lubricant! #ShallNotBeInfringed!

Same with americans how many terrorists  in jail they are all criminals to

Send all off them back . They are criminals and economic terrorist

So should we just build a wall around the whole country so no one can get in or out? The south border is not the only border. Also, how many criminals from America have traveled across the southern border to live there illegally? It goes both ways. 911 happened because of a man across seas, complete opposite direction. Should I also mention that this land was taken from Indians, not given to our ancestors? There is so much to this that no one is considering because Trump's phony speeches and false promises are trapping you guys into this crap. Our country has been built on white, biblical, supremecy, and anyone who doesn't go by the book or anyone who belongs to a culture they don't like, they are trying to keep them out.

So this situation is made better by allowing illegal dangerous criminals into our country???

So, you would rather the dems  give all the tax monies to illegals instead of to vets?? You aren't making any sense! Trump wants the wall so that illegals will stop bleeding us dry so that veterans get care FIRST instead of criminals

Stan Piznarski Do you know how many AMERICAN BORN KILLERS ARE SITTING ON DEATH ROW EATING THREE MEALS A DAY GETTING MEDICAL ATTENTION.  You will not save this country with a wall period.  DONALD TRUMP "FOLLOWERS" OPEN YOUR EYES AND WIPE YOUR OWN ASS AND THINK FOR YOURSELF AND YOU WILL SEE HOW MANY AMERICANS ARE, ARE CURRENTLY, SUFFERING NOW OVER A WALL. THE HUMAN TRAFFIC SCANDAL IN ARIZONA ALLLLLLLLL AMERICAN BORN POLITICIANS!!! CRIMINALS COME IN ALL NATIONALITIES AND THE BIGGEST CRIMINAL OF ALL IS IN CHARGE OF THIS COUNTRY. DONALD TRUMP DOESN'T CARE WHO HE STEPS ONNNNN!! NOT OVER ON!! This is a political statement.  This wall is the most ridiculous thing ever.  "Followers" who can't wipe their own ass and who are waiting on Donald Trump to tell them when to jump and how high voted for this terrorist because they can't think for themselves.  DONALD TRUMP is a TERRORIST: a person who uses intimidation, especially against civilians, in the pursuit of political aims.

Stan Piznarski, not every American loves Trump and I believe that there are more who dislike him. Trump doesn't care about building America, all he wants to do is build a wall. In the meantime my nighborhood is being ransacked by dangerous criminals who are actually legal American citizens. None of us are really safe and especially our schools. Our factories are not coming(roaring)back, many have moved to Mexico. Imagine that! No, not every American loves Trump and he is the one who is impossible, especially his promises which he cannot keep.

Stand firm President Trump... NEVER forget these same democrats know we need the wall. What they do not want is for you to get credit for doing something to protect America and her children. They are willing to spend billions of our tax dollars to support and encourage criminals... turn a blind eye to drug and human trafficking... hoping you fail and the voters do NOT re-elect you. They fear you because if you succeed as you have done by calling the Korean dictator's bluff and bringing a real chance for peace in Korea or how the economy is positive, unemployment numbers that are at a historic low, and bringing back real family supporting jobs... you will be re-elected. They fear another four years because of the possibility of you appointing another judge or two to our Supreme Court. Their entire effort to destroy America is to stop your success. We are the victims while they lie with cold stone orchestrated words. Your love for America is your foundation President Trump... and those that also love America and her proud history support you... 100%.AS

Start interior enforcement & not just criminals....

Stop begging the criminals and arrest them please

Stop the iligals criminals!!! Build the wall!!!

THANKS FOR SHARING THIS WITH US  WE DO HAVE THE BEST PRESIDENT THAT WE HAVE EVER HAD AND HE IS ONLY LOOKING OUT FOR ALL OF OUR BEST INTERESTS AND  HE DID NOT TURN THE ANGEL'S MOMS AND  FAMILIES AWAY,  HE GREIVED WITH THEM AND AGREED WITH THEM THAT WE NEED THIS WALL OF PROTECTION AGAINST THESE VIOLENT CRIMINALS WHO ARE FLOODING INTO OUR COUNTRY EVERYDAY FOR HARM AND NOT GOOD.  GOD BLESS OUR PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP AND FLOTUS AND FAMILY AND OUR LEADERS AND AMERICA EVERYDAY AND WE NEED TO BE PRAYING FOR ALL OF THEM EVERYDAY,  I DO EVERYDAY BUT HE NEEDS  ALL OF OUR PRAYERS.  SHALOM AND SHABBAT LINDA BAUROTH AND FAMILY AND FRIENDS OF THE SPIRIT AND OF THE ARMY OF GOD.

THE BORDER WALL DOESN'T KEEP OUT CRIMINALS. Do you HONESTLY THINK the criminal stands in line, patiently waiting - for DAYS - to get through a legal entry point? Even YOU cannot be THAT STUPID.

THIS.., is Happening Constantly ! Week after WEEK ! Year after YEAR ! So tell me..., WHY are the Democrats SO STUBBORN on this Issue ? ? ? Why are they SO = "ANTI American" on this ? They TELL US..., that THEY "CARE" More for the ILLEGAL ALIENS...., than they do us LEGAL American "Citizens" ? ? ? And it's NOT just the "THOUSANDS" of Murders committed BY the ILLEGAL ALIENS....., It's the RAPES of our Women ALSO ! ! ! The Democrats have MARCHES ! Marches for Women's RIGHTS ? And YET.., they REFUSE to STOP these ILLEGAL ALIENS who RAPE.., and KILL = "WOMEN" ? Does that make ANY Sense to YOU ? "ANY" ? ? ? And WHAT about the MASSIVE amounts of DRUGS that are "Smuggled" into this Country = "Constantly" ? Do YOU want you KIDS to become Wasted DRUG ADDICTS ? NOT ME ! ! ! And YET..., the Democrat "PARTY" = REFUSE to STOP ALL of these Criminals from FLOODING into YOUR Country ? ? ? There are OVER 350 "Million" of US ! And YET.., WE are letting a FEW.., "Hundred" Democrats PUSH us around ? And ENDANGER our Families ? How does THAT make ANY Sense ? WHAT is WRONG...., with US ?

Thank God we have President who puts America and Americans first 🙏🏼 he puts his country and the feelings of these families first, while the Lunatic left continues to campaign for criminals, illegals and open borders. What the Hell People! How can you Not love this President?🇺🇸

Thank you, President Trump, for trying to pound some sense into Democrats heads. We all know how impossible that is. Thank you also for exposing their anti-American people agenda in favor of illegals. With yet another dangerous caravan of criminals on the way, declaring a  state of emergency is necessary and completely justified to #BUILDTHEWALL

Thanks and THANKS for protecting our country from INVADERS ! ILLEGALS! CRIMINALS , drug dealers and more.GOD BLESS  YOU and YOUR WORK ! ! ! !

The Dem's Credo... Create Jobs by creating criminals, encourage lawlessness and disorder in our society. Think of all the jobs that thrive off of this negative part of society. Figures, lawyers are one of the biggest profiteers, with prisons, law enforcement, criminal justice and reform, healthcare, welfare, all the non-profits that support this system to grow... and the companies that are needed to support them. When a groups whole outlook on life is, let's just mess things up so we can profit by it, is messed up thinking. To say it politely. A lot of Republicans think this same way. Drain The Swamp!

The Democrats are  just like spoiled children they would rather see this country get over run with criminals drug dealers and terrorist then to help the American people .most are so jealous of trump beating Hillary they will do anything and everything to sabotage his presidency including ruining this country just so they can get what they want it' not about helping it's about control

The Election of Trump has pulled the curtain back on The Administrative State (deep state) ...Greatly points to the fact that we don't have a "Justice" system. We have a "Just Us" system (designed to protect criminals like the clintons). I no longer trust any of the alphabet Law Enforcement Agencies including the IRS or the Courts. The whole thing is rigged and corrupt beyond repair. Everybody knows this.  .Democrats are now an adversary of the U.S. and like any enemy of the U.S. they care nothing about National Security and Public Safety..

The Great Hoax of Open border (ILLEGAL) Immigration Policies will be exposed by history as one of the most evil and corrupt actions by our Capitalist Political Establishment. It benefits those with capital who want to employ cheap labor. Our middle-class and low income disproportionately suffer the ill effects and social burden of this sick self serving policy. That’s assuming all illegal immigrants we welcome here aren’t criminals but just good people appreciative of the opportunity to bare racial and economic discrimination for the many opportunities USA provides. Criminals, Gangs, Terrorists, Social misfits and Powerful Transnational Crime Organizations are able to exploit this horrible policy to our detriment, again overwhelmingly disproportionately affecting the middle class and poor. The people who all these lying politicians have been saying for decades they care about and work for. POTUS Trump is working to force common sense immigration reform because he truly does care about Americans and our country. Controlling our borders is essential and the easiest place for him to begin this reform. 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸

The Great Hoax of Open border (ILLEGAL) Immigration Policies will be exposed by history as one of the most evil and corrupt actions by our Capitalist Political Establishment. It benefits those with capital who want to employ cheap labor. Our middle-class and low income disproportionately suffer the ill effects and social burden of this sick self serving policy. That’s assuming all illegal immigrants we welcome here aren’t criminals but just good people appreciative of the opportunity to bare racial and economic discrimination for the many opportunities USA provides. Criminals, Gangs, Terrorists, Social misfits and Powerful Transnational Crime Organizations are able to exploit this horrible policy to our detriment, again overwhelmingly disproportionately affecting the middle class and poor. The people who all these lying politicians have been saying for decades they care about and work for. POTUS Trump is working to force common sense immigration reform because he truly does care about Americans and our country. Controlling our borders is essential and the easiest place for him to begin this reform. 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸

The MSM doesn't report the news any more but years ago the Mexican president released all his criminals from prisons so long as they left the country and went to America.  That explains illegal aliens of Mexico and crime.

The communist agitators are paid by the democrat communists criminals

The democrat communists are criminals and dont care what we think , they dont have no interest in our opinions , they live in fortresses and want to be kings to make us slaves and shut us up once and for all

The law today is still the law TODAY.  I don't care - they are not criminals, terrorists and can SUPPORT THEMSELVES. We need to look at the other side of the coin and realize what is actually coming into this country.  I say NO MORE REFUGEES as well.  Criminalize stepping across this our border if not at a port of entry, and start keeping statistics of those in our prisons that are illegals as well.  Keeping data on just how much these freeloaders are costing us in 'BORROWED' tax funds is essential.  It's our money - we need to see where it goes.

The problem is...Democrats do not give a damn about this country.  Could care less if criminals and drugs come in through the border.  Could care less if Iran got nukes.  Could care less about the economy.  Could care less if America gets screwed in Trade Deals.  Could care less about expanding America's horizons such as space or energy independence.    No, Democrats dont work to make the US great.  That's the last thing on their minds.    Democrats work 100% of the time...to get power or hold on to power.   And the money and perks that come with it.

The real and only acceptable number for the amount of criminals / terrorist to cross the southern boarder and enter into our nation is "ZERO".   That right "0".   So whether it is 4000, 400, 40, 4 or 1 terrorist that illegally cross the southern boarder,  it is unacceptable.   If a southern boarder wall is required to get that number to "0" then so be it.  Hope you are not really mad at this sentence?   The many citizens who could possibly be hurt by this criminal(s) if permitted to freely cross the boarder will be extremely happy that they are safer!

The real and only acceptable number for the amount of criminals / terrorist to cross the southern boarder and enter into our nation is "ZERO".   That right "0".   So whether it is 4000, 400, 40, 4 or 1 terrorist that illegally cross the southern boarder,  it is unacceptable.   If a southern boarder wall is required to get that number to "0" then so be it.  Hope you are not really mad at this sentence?   The many citizens who could possibly be hurt by this criminal(s) if permitted to freely cross the boarder will be extremely happy that they are safer!

The two obstructionists Pelosi and Schumer represent the two largest Sanctuary States in the Country. Where do you think illegals flock to the minute they sneak in? How the hell can anybody in their right mind vote for these two criminals. Elections are definitely corrupt and fixed. Especially in those two States.

There are far more criminals and murderers  that are white Americans ,  not to mention all the other American gangs and criminals than the 0.0132% of illegals that are criminals. Most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!

There are far more criminals and murderers  that are white Americans ,  not to mention all the other American gangs and criminals than the 0.0132% of illegals that are criminals. Most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!

There are far more criminals and murderers  that are white Americans ,  not to mention all the other American gangs and criminals than the 0.0132% of illegals that are criminals. Most drugs come through check points, human bodies, planes, etc. Hell, the drug cartels, can spend an extra couple of hundred dollars to go to Canada first then here. I mean damn...they have submarines and bring them all up and down the coast. You think an ignorant wall will stop them, lmbo! They are laughing at us!

There are many people who should have been raided and in jail and or executed. What happened to lock her up.... what happened to 10 years of Donald John Trump knowing how to fire people and get a job done?  The law is really lawyers and judges in the U.S., and put there on purpose in this wicked system.  The purpose to over through the country and wealth...... if your guilty, think about it... your guilty.   Either one is right or wrong, further the laws of this land are geared towards HARMING GOOD, POOR, AND MIDDLE CLASS FOLKS.  Any real country free of CORRUPTION would have what's called a criminal punishment system and a victim justice system.   We have a criminal justice system that's why criminals get away with everything the justice is geared towards the wicked!! open your goddamn eyes and ears.  PS, the love of money is the root of all evil. DO NOT SELL YOUR SOUL FOR A PAYCHECK.

There are more important things to do in this country than build a fucking wall because that QUACK(Trump) wants to see how much power he has over the pocketbook of America, he better worry about those chains that they are gonna put on his fat ass and his kids when Mueller puts out his report showing that the entire family of hardened Criminals were Traitors to our country, their is way too much to do in this country than build a wall because Putin is making him do it, time for that QUACK to go, specifically speaking to Prison for the rest of his worthless life!!!

There has been more than 1 illegal that is responsible for the death of innocent Americans.  And just yesterday there was a fentanyl bust that could be responsible for 4,000,000 deaths in this country.  Its a combination of problems, criminals, drugs, diseases, burden on our medical and educational systems.

There is no need for a multi billion dollar border wall. There is no need to force the separation of all families at the border.  There is no need to deny unfortunate refugees the opportunity to apply for asylum.  Illegal border crossings are at a 46 year low.  The situation at our southern border is not as dire as Trump's hysterical tweets suggest. Illegal immigration is not an existential crisis. We are in no danger of losing our country.   The Trump Administration has intentionally adopted a policy of cruelty towards immigrants, and they rationalize their policies by relying on unsubstantiated claims that they pose a threat.  Day after day Trump and his allies resort to fearmongering, scapegoating, and demonizing.  Folks at the southern border have been maligned as rapists, murderers, drug dealers, gang members, and criminals who have been infiltrated by terrorists, and are threatening to spread infectious diseases, while they steal jobs from hard working Americans and simultaneously sponge off the social welfare system because they are so lazy.    Scant evidence has been offered to back these claims up, but when your goal is simply to dehumanize people you can't let hard data get in the way.     Early estimates had put the cost of Trump's wet dream border wall at $25 billion, and that's before any unforeseen cost overruns.    The whole thing strikes me as a terrible waste of resources that is sure to excite reactionaries, but does nothing to solve the underlying issues that compel people to immigrate to the US via any available means.    If the US spends billions on a wall, what have we got when it's done?  Just a wall.  That's it.    It won't improve conditions in the regions in the world where people are suffering.  It won't stop the people living in those regions from attempting to enter the US.  It won't reverse the demographic changes underway in America that have so many entitled Caucasians decrying how minorities are destroying the fabric of society.  Why should we persecute people for losing the birthplace lottery?   Why should anything as universal as wanting better opportunities for yourself and your family be considered criminal?  Instead of building walls to divide us, I would prefer inviting those less fortunate to share in the promise America can offer.

There is no such things as "Gun Violence" or "manmade climate change", both are made up crisis! guns do 3 things, they fire, they fail and they rust, hate is in  the heart and you cannot legislate that! Finally it isn't a damned competition you witless troll, illegal border jumpers are not supposed to be her at all, FULL STOP!  By your logic because we have an epidemic of social violence brought on by liberal ideologies, we should let in more criminals?! You really are a special kind of stupid!

They deport illegal criminals and they keep coming back.   You can sure tell who's side the  democrats are on.      Wake up America!

This makes my heart cry! I’m behind building walls everywhere to keep out the gangs, the criminals and all people who enter illegally!

This man's story is tragic.  But securing our borders, making sure that criminals are punished and can't get back in does not translate into a physical wall.  4th century solution to a 21st century problem.

Timothy Kershner So we should import  more criminals illegally? That's a old weak talking point!! You my friend are the one that need to shut up!!

To tell the whole truth, the 1.4 million you mention, 98% are from cop self defense, suicide and good Samaritans saving theirs and others lives. Yep, 2% are all that can be called problem killings by criminals. Ask how many gun deaths France and Britain have. It 8lis far higher because only bad guys have guns.   The bottom line is you do not trust your fellow Americans to have the same power as everyone else. U want to disarm us, so you can control us. This is not your fault. Liberals teach this because they are also afraid. I am sorry you have to spend your life cowering in fear. I am sorry you believe Pelosi and Clinton who are protected by armed guards everywhere they go. What's good for them, you do not deserve because u are their subjects.

To visi protecting illegals and criminals and stealing taxpayers money

Tony Palmer  I but it would prevent massive drug influx and criminals from entering

Tony Rainwater armed guards at schools seems to be working these days, no law abiding gun owner would ever attack a school let alone children, only the crazy CRIMINALS who obtain guns illegally seem to shoot up schools, might wanna go after them...

True but the point is we have more then enough criminals that were born here without importing other countries trash.

Trump shouldn’t have to fight for border security - it is the only decent thing to do. Pelosi is immoral and I believe she drinks too much. She does not serve the people - she only serves the illegals and criminals.

Tudy you beat me to it. You're exactly right. We have enough criminals, we don't need any more.

Very irresponsible statement from liberal media " only 6 criminals were caught at the border" Only one terrorist can cause massive destruction to americans.

Very powerful as are all the other families who have suffered a loss at the hands of a criminal out on bail no matter illegal or not. Unfortunately, we have millions of illegal criminals who kill.

WHO DOES KAMELA HARRIS THINK SHE IS BULLYING OUR SECRETARY OF HOMELAND SECURITY ??? MORE SWAMP CREATURES EVERYDAY THAT PASSES... WHACKY WATER,, AOC,, CHUCKY CHEESE ,, DELERIOUS PELOSI the list is LONG !! GOD BLESS YOU FOR YOUR WORK ETHICS & STRENGTH MR.PRESIDENT ..STAND STRONG AGAINST THESE CRIMINALS WHO WANT TO TAKE THIS AMERICA & ITS PEOPLE DOWN ... THANK YOU ..OH ONE MORE IMPORTANT FACTOR BECAUSE OF WHAT HARRIS IS DOING WHICH IS CALLED "DIVIDING " MLK IS MOST LIKELY TURNING IN HIS GRAVE SHE STANDS FOR & IS PUSHING THE AGENDA OF WHAT HE STOOD AGAINST ,,WHICH IS WHY HE WAS SO LOVED !!! IF JFK & MLK HAVE NOT BEEN ASSASSINATED THIS COUNTRY WOULD HAVE BEEN WONDERFUL I TRULY BELIEVE !! AMEN  R.I.P. TO BOTH OF THOSE PATRIOTS & BRAVE MEN...

Walls do work and we definitely need this wall and congress best stop playing games with our safety and get this wall done or they will be removed by the people once and for all . They should all be locked up for harboring and protecting criminals. Thats what they are doing.

Walls don't work. If they want to deal drugs or do harm their going to find a way to do it.  That's why their called criminals.

Walls work pretty damn well, they served the Romans, the Chinese built one hell of a wall, the wall in Berlin stood longer than it should have, we have been guarding one heck of a wall on the 38th parallel for nearly 70 years, The Sumerians’ Amorite Wall worked great, the Long Walls protected Athens, the  Great Wall of Gorgan known as Alexander the Great’s Wall, Hadrian’s Wall and the Theodosian Walls and Nancy Pelosi’s Manor Wall. Seems walls are a great idea to keep criminals and trash out. Just build some nice gates for green card workers and legal immigrants....

We are tired of these criminal rat lines crossing our border ... drugs, human trafficking, gang members, criminals ... it has cost America and Americans greatly ... It is time to stop the flow ... so many women and children are at risk ... investigate the orgs who sponsor all this chaos ... hold them accountable ...

We as Americans should have an open season on hunting illegals and criminals

We can’t continue to let these criminals come into OUR country. Save lives. Build the wall. With the billions we save supporting these welfare bums we can invest in our veterans, aging adults and children.

We could lose that option.  Our country is being inundated without regard to screening for criminals.

We have criminals on the daily that are citizens including every shooter lately who happens to be a white nazi supremacist that also happens to be extreme supporters of Trump but every once in a while an immigrant commits a crime, big or small, and that's all that matters. Not the REAL crime problem of actual citizens. By no means am I supporting a killer but using it as a political boost is ridiculous.

We have enough problems with our own criminals! We don't need illegal criminals to compound the problem

We have enough problems with our own criminals! We don't need illegal criminals to compound the problem

We live on the border. Its scary at best! The country has no idea of the drugs and criminals and drug runners pouring over the border. BUILD THE WALL. We support the shut down.

We need to simply execute illegal criminals and deport the rest to the middle East!!!

We need to understand that illegal immigrants are mostly coming here for work and are hired and paid cash under the table.  Those are the criminals... I wish Trump would address that issue instead of just building a wall.

We want more than that Mr. President, we want the swamp criminals in DC that have been selling our country out all these years to be prosecuted and incarcerated!

What about all the white me whom kill in schools ...?  This is political propaganda..no all Undocumented people are criminals...

What's more important to the Democrats is to be humanitarian to criminals. How many children suffer when parents are sentenced for crimes. Do we let our humanitarian approach to life remove the penalty for crime.  President Trump desparate times call for desparate measures. Stop the shutdown and play your aces.

Where was the illegal murderer from?  What country?  You know we grow our own criminals in this country.  We’re any of the kids killed inn school shootings?  I believe all of the shooters were born and raised in the United States.

Whittley Guidry Garcia  Because a lot of crime is caused by illegal criminals,

Why can't people see how true this statement is???  We have the best country in the world and people want to come here! But, to keep it great we need to know whose coming here, their background, if they are criminals, killers etc.!!! Other countries have really strict rules who get to come and live in their countries!! We must do the same or we will be overrun and lose what has made our country great!!!

Why don't you build a dome? It would be much safer. Ilegals and criminals can climb a wall or dig tunnels but they can do nothing against a dome. Protect America please! You're are the unique capable of doing so. Stay strong!

Why is the wall so important? Criminals will find away to get in like dig a tunnel. Oh wait they already do that.

Yadira Bornacelli GOD Don't Bless Morons , Liars, Corrupt Criminals, Bone Spurse, Kidnapper, Killer of Children, Mafiosi, Cheater, Blackmailer, Pussy Grabber and destroyer of his Creation the Envirmoent. How dump do you low minded  little sauage of a Human think that God is. God gave roules stay with this roules or dont use the Name of God.

You are correct my President. You need not have porous borders , America must weed out criminals by ensuring the proper procedures are followed while entering.

You are the President of the Nation of Republicans and Democrats in the USA.  Please do not discuss "Democrats' problems" tonight in your speech to the nation.  Please address the need to secure America from drugs, criminals, disease, etc. coming across the Southern border costing Americans much more than $5.6B through building the Wall.  Classifying "Democrats" as the problem only adds fuel to this never- ending fire.  So many support the construction of this Wall, so please emphasize the positive aspects and eliminate the negative (including name calling, etc.)  You will win only by taking the high road on this issue.  Best wishes!

You are trying to keep criminals out and the geat unwashed lefties bitch, piss and moan. Turkey kept people fleeing a WAR out with a wall funded by the E.U and no  one bats an eye. Go figure. 100% behind you Sir.

there are criminals everywhere, some illegals other legals, other born here or anywhere, Timothy McVeigh killed many people and he was not illegal, yet some of his ancestors came  here probably from Europe without the consent of the real Native Americans, the real owners of this land, and this land was taken from them using force, lies and genocide. Immigrants move across the whole word for different reasons, some are bad people, other have PTSD but most of them want a better life. So dont  put things out of context to make your point. all crimes are bad, but  show the data where it say most crimes are committed by illegals.

use  FBI and CIA and Police to stop drug trafficing these criminals break law and commit murder

yes Ricky Wallace. We all want immigrants, but we want them to come in property and go through the proper channels. There’s a reason immigrants sneak into America illegally. It’s because they are criminals or they only want to abuse our Federal Welfare program. Legitimate immigrants will go through the proper process and become very welcome American citizens.

“The president was right to declare our border crisis a national emergency. While the vast majority of illegal immigrants are not violent criminals, they have all violated the laws which are in place to keep the American people safe.” Good editorial. Heartbreaking story. I’m glad Trump is finally making good on his promise to enforce our laws.

All Vile Lib Dem socialist Communists Who Hate Capitalism Freedom and America Feel The Defense of 12 Million Gang Members Millions of Child Molesters PEDOPHILES ROBBERS ILLEGALS RAPISTS KILLERS and Shariah Islam Tists who Kill Gays Transgenders Lesbians their own daughters wives and all women who disobey Maxine Waters BELOVED Shariah Law IS THIER HIGHEST AND MOST IMPORTANT DUTY. FACT !

As it turns out, back in 2011 then-President Barack Obama issued an executive order “blocking property of transnational criminal organizations.” Obama cited his authority as granted through the Constitution to invoke the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, 50 U.S.C. 1701, and the National Emergencies Act, 50 U.S.C. 1601. The latter is the same legislation that Trump is citing to get funding for the wall to achieve his immigration reform goals. That executive order targeted a number of criminal organizations, including the Mexican Los Zetas cartel, an ally of the MS-13 gang President Trump has regularly called out as a danger to Americans.

Dear Mr. President…please bring all of the Angel Families to the State of the Union address. Tell each individual story of horror, sadness and loss of a loved one. Go into detail. Then have the family stand holding the picture. When you are done with all the families, share all of the staggering facts you were told by border security agents. Crossings of people from countries other than Central America, Gang members, drug seizures, deaths from overdose; go into detail because most Americans are not aware of the true numbers. Then ask “if what I just said is true will are brave border patrol officers please stand to affirm those numbers as accurate”. Then on National TV declare the National Emergency and build the damn WALL. We are behind you 110%. Thank You for saving our country and trying to repair the devastating intentional damage caused by the previous administration. God Bless you and your entire family.

Death sneaking into our nation? Even scientists are disciplined  if they dare mention  that disease crosses our border as easily as illegals from all over the world. Disease. Ebola. Banned words.   GenerationalDynamics.com  DOES report   1/20/2019  Ebola outbreak in DR Congo now spreading exponentially faster Local DRC population giving little cooperation to health officials ...........The number of Ebola cases recorded each day in the Democratic Republic of Congo (DRC) has doubled, indicating that it may spread to other regions and other countries. That it will soon travel to Uganda, Rwanda, Burundi, and even South Sudan. The epidemic was originally centered in Beni, with a population of 232,000. But it has spread to Butamben, with a population of over a million, a densely populated trade city near the Uganda border. Further south along the highway from Butembo are the million-plus population cities Goma and Bukusu. The World Health Organization (WHO) has been focusing its efforts on preventing a spread to the latter two cities, since “all bets are off” for stopping the epidemic if it reaches there"""" ................................................................................................,,,,,,,,,,,,,,.. For them to report even this much is unusual. Drudge is the only outlet covering it.  And Ebola does not care if you are black, white, pink, brown, rich, poor, Muslim, Christian, Jew, Hindu, male, female, both, legal, illegal.,......We all die just as easily as those in Africa. IF it spreads, there is going to be an exodus out of Africa. The easiest nation in the world for disappearing? USA. No Borders. No Punishment for breaking in nation.NO punishment for overstaying Visas.  Usually rewarded with citizenship Look at the Dreamers. They have tormented every Republican member in Congress, but they still turn back flips to legalize the  Democrat Activists. And they are not kids. Half are over 30. Few in military. Few graduated college. 40% have gang ties. they can have  3 misdemeanors. ( You try that). Crime rate is 1 1/2 times that of USA Born kids. Legal Immigrants get mixed in with illegal, so truth can be hidden. Legal Immigrants. Law abiding for most part. Good People,  Meaning No Disrespect to anyone, Would  be possible for Don Jr. to replace the Kushners as Senior advisors? Throw  the conservatives a bone? Everyone likes and respects him for standing up for his dad.  Their hearts seem to beat for the same team.  These are scary times. This is HUGE news. It will be reported very little.

Do not BACK DOWN! PLEASE! WE middle class TAXPAYING CITIZENS and Seniors, VETERANS IN NEVADA NEED HELP!!!!!! The state where our GOVERNOR is going to Take YPU  ON MR. PRESIDENT!He us all for open BORDERS! HkusingMs13 gang members! Where d oes that leaves us????.? I worked hard my entire life I have no extra money to SUPPORT them!

Estefania Torres Restrepo California  LARGEST INSANE ASYLUM IN THE WORLD  Interesting that the LA Times did this. All the others are staying away from it. Whether you are a Democrat or Republican, this should be of great interest to you!  Just One State - be sure and read the last part...  try for 3 times.  This is only one State... If this doesn't open your eyes, nothing will!  From the LA. Times:  1. 40% of all workers in LA County (10.2 million people) are working for cash; and not paying taxes. This is because they are predominantly illegal immigrants, working without a green card. (Donald Trump was right)  2. 95 %of warrants for murder in Los Angeles are for illegal aliens.  3. 75% of people on the most wanted list in Los Angeles are illegal aliens.  4. Over 2/3 of all births in Los Angeles County are to illegal alien Mexicans on Medi-Cal, whose births were paid for by taxpayers.  5. Nearly 35% of all inmates in California detention centers are Mexican nationals; they are here illegally.  6. Over 300,000 illegal aliens in Los Angeles County are living in garages.  7. The FBI reports half of all gang members in Los Angeles are most likely illegal aliens from south of the border.  8 Nearly 60% of all occupants of HUD properties are illegal.  9. 21 radio stations in LA are Spanish-speaking.  10. In LA County, 5.1 million people speak English; 3.9 million, speak Spanish. (There are 10.2 million people, in LA County.  (All 10 of the above facts were published in the Los Angeles Times)  Less than 2% of illegal aliens are picking our crops, but 29% are on welfare.  Over 70% of the United States' annual population growth, ( and over 90% of California, Florida, and New York), results from immigration.  Also, 29% of inmates in federal prisons are illegal aliens.  We are fools for letting this continue.  HOW CAN YOU HELP?  Send copies of this letter, to at least two other people.  To 100, would be even better.

Excellent!! Thank you ladies and thank you Mr. President!! The wall will be built,  stay strong and defeat this attempted coup by Pelosi and gang or America will be lost.

F the Democrats! Build the Wall. Pelosi and her gang are looking for a fight, they can have one. Sick of the liberals BS.

Henk Adelbert Lapomarda GriffinHenk 12) Border Security and Immigration  ~Secured $1.6 billion for border wall construction in the March 2018 omnibus bill.  ~Construction of a 14-mile section of border wall began near San Diego.  ~Worked to protect American communities from the threat posed by the vile MS-13 gang.  ~ICE’s Homeland Security Investigations division arrested 796 MS-13 members and associates in FY 2017, an 83 percent increase from the prior year.  ~Justice worked with partners in Central America to secure criminal charges against more than 4,000 MS-13 members.  ~Border Patrol agents arrested 228 illegal aliens affiliated with MS-13 in FY 2017.  ~Fighting to stop the scourge of illegal drugs at our border.  ~ICE HSI seized more than 980,000 pounds of narcotics in FY 2017, including 2,370 pounds of fentanyl and 6,967 pounds of heroin.  ~ICE HSI dedicated nearly 630,000 investigative hours towards halting the illegal import of fentanyl.  ~ICE HSI made 11,691 narcotics-related arrests in FY 2017.  ~Stop Opioid Abuse and Reduce Drug Supply and Demand introduced new measures to keep dangerous drugs out the United States.  ~Signed the INTERDICT Act into law, enhancing efforts to detect and intercept synthetic opioids.  ~DOJ secured its first-ever indictments against Chinese fentanyl manufacturers.  ~DOJ launched their Joint Criminal Opioid Darknet Enforcement (J-CODE) team, aimed at disrupting online illicit opioid sales.  ~Released an immigration framework that includes the resources required to secure our borders and close legal loopholes, and repeatedly called on Congress to fix our broken immigration laws.  ~Authorized the deployment of the National Guard to help secure the border.  ~Enhanced vetting of individuals entering the U.S. from countries that don’t meet security standards, helping to ensure individuals who pose a threat to our country are identified before they enter.These procedures were upheld in a June 2018 Supreme Court hearing.  ~ICE removed over 226,000 illegal aliens from the United States in 2017.  ~ICE rescued or identified over 500 human trafficking victims and over 900 child exploitation victims in 2017 alone.  ~In 2017, ICE Enforcement and Removal Operations (ERO) arrested more than 127,000 aliens with criminal convictions or charges, responsible for Over 76,000 with dangerous drug offenses. More than 48,000 with assault offenses. More than 11,000 with weapons offenses. More than 5,000 with sexual assault offenses. More than 2,000 with kidnapping offenses. Over 1,800 with homicide offenses.  ~Created the Victims of Immigration Crime Engagement (VOICE) Office in order to support the victims and families affected by illegal alien crime.  ~More than doubled the number of counties participating in the 287(g) program, which allows jails to detain criminal aliens until they are transferred to ICE custody.

How can the Democratic Party argue that the wall is immoral honestly the president is trying to protect not only the us but others in creating a wall to end human ,drug , firearm trafficking, potential terrorist and gang assaults In all levels of the word barbaric in addition the democrats say oh that not going to end anything they will just get visas and come in and do it anyways how ironic and yet they don’t want to accept any reform he proposed 🤔I still don’t understand if they are just against anything he says or they could care less about improving national security

How many people died from prescribed medicines? Gun accidents? Vehicle accidents? Spousal abuse? Gang violence? Mental illness? Why are you picking on these families who are just trying to survive when home grown Americans are slaughtering each other and themselves daily?

I can understand someone feeling this way if their child is killed by an illegal. I would feel the same way.   But let’s look at the numbers.   106,000 Americans are killed every year by adverse reactions to prescription drugs. That’s 12 people every hour that could be prevented.  And there’s no crisis or emergency for the families of those victims. This isn’t even on the news.   From all available data, it appears that illegal immigrants (mostly gang members) only kill about 77 people a year in the US. Compare that to 106,000 killed by drugs or 250,000 killed every year by medical mistakes.   https://www.fda.gov/Drugs/DevelopmentApprovalProcess/DevelopmentResources/DrugInteractionsLabeling/ucm110632.htm#ADRs:%20Prevalence%20and%20IncidencePreventable Adverse Drug Reactions: A Focus on Drug Interactionsfda.gov

I was working for an employer who had hired illegal immigrants and didn't notify the staff that had been working there. One of the younger a_ _ holes invited me out to his place for a beverage, the boss's son even said he'd be there so I thought nothing of it (we both were young and he wasn't bad looking) so I kindly accepted the offer (2nd mistake) 1st was even talking to him in the 1st place. We planned a time and he gave me the address, now keep in mind I was currently residing in a smaller town where at this younger age it didn't seem to be an issue to go to someone's place.  Upon arriving I had to go through a cattle gate, house was out in the country, upon arriving to the house, there were more guys out there than I had originally thought there would be. I then decided that MAYBE this just wasn't a good idea and I was trying to leave in my car, never had gotten outside of it. I found out that there were a couple of men outside and they had chain locked the gate closed and I NOT wanting to destruct property, demanded they open the gate. No one would open the gate, one other guy had made his way into my car and forced me over and drove me back to the house where there were 7 maybe 8 illegal immigrants and a 50+ yr old Male who MIGHT have been a U.S. resident. They dragged me into the home where they forced themselves on me, forced liquor down my throat and then proceeded to take me into a bedroom where I continued to fight them off of me, one by one they all took turns, they all were all over me and it then became a group thing, I fought and fought what seemed like hours, once everyone had their fun, I managed to crawl myself into the bathroom, near the bedroom I was in and in there the 50 yr old man put me into the shower, by know the liquor had kicked in and I was pretty much a lump on a log. So I was finished off in a shower with this horrible 50+ yr old and left alone once all were done having there fun. I yelled and screamed I kicked and clawed I threw punches I even tried to bite, by the time I came too I was naked in a cold shower and even though I was still pretty well lit, I was able to get just enough on to get myself out of the house and my keys and get in my car where I was able to then escape any future sexual assaults. I wasn't even sure if I was going to be held longer or released. I tried to file charges, but after that night all men were on the run including the older man himself. So nothing had ever come of it other than me getting counseling. BELIEVE WE HAVE TO BUILD THIS WALL TO PROTECT OUR CHILDREN AND OUR CHILDREN'S CHILDREN.  I would NEVER wish a gang bang on even my worst enemy. I have gone through counseling and I have over come my situation. I have a daughter now, and I fear that she NEVER EVER endures such a HORRIBLE HORROR.  This happened about 12 years ago, but it has only gotten worse  since then with the population of illegals.  Let's protect our future!

I'll keep posting it until these Democrats get it through their thick skull. Technically it's not "his" wall, It is America's wall. I'm not trying to offend you in any way. I'm just trying to explain that the government is designed so that before January the government sits a budget for agencies and proposed bills, the budget has to pass through both branches of government before it will become settled. Okay, since we get that our government is designed this way, many presidents before Trump has shut down the government. Including Bill Clinton twice (Full government shutdowns, not only a partial) & Obama (During 2013, to pass obamacare with even more funding and costs) which was a total disaster and we spent 2 billion dollars on a website for obamacare that still to this day doesn't work. He forced Healthcare down Americans throats or they could be jailed for not having it.Under Obamacare, you must have health insurance or pay a tax penalty. For 2017, the penalty is $695 per adult (up to a family maximum of $2,085), or 2.5% of household income, whichever is greater. HE FORCED IT DOWN OUR THROATS! FORCED IT! He added more debt to the U.S. government through obamacare than any bill in history and and caused the U.S. debt to raise exponentially more than every previous president COMBINED. I want to be clear, the Democrats supported a border wall and border security before 2015 when Donald Trump ran on this issue. They're actually videos of Hillary saying that she supported legislation to build a border-barrier across the southern border to stop illegal immigration. This plan however is being held up by the Democrats because they want to see Donald Trump fail and not get the wall. NOT BECAUSE OF THEIR RHETORIC of walls not working because every wall that has ever been built for illegal immigration including China's border wall built in 1960, helps stop illegal-immigration. In fact, 65% of the world is covered in borders. It's just the way that it works. The border wall that has been proposed by the Republicans requires 5.6 billion. That is 0.1% of the Budget that they have agreed to on funding the government which would have no affect to any Tax-payers because you wouldn't notice a 0.1% increase to the budget.Newly released research by the Institute for Defense Analyses (IDA) done for the Department of Homeland Security indicates that 170,000 illegal immigrants crossed the border successfully without going through a port of entry in 2015. While a significant decline in crossings from a decade ago, it still means that there may be 1.7 million successful crossings in the next decade. If a wall stopped just 9 to 12 percent of these crossings it would pay for itself.DEMOCRATS: -Voted against Kate's Law -Voted to keep Sanctuary Cities -Voted to expand catch and release -Voted against increased vetting on refugees -Voted against legislation to remove gang members -Voted against the deportation of violent criminal aliens. -Voted against funding for a wall and increased border security. It wouldn't affect anything.For the one's who say that "walls don't work" & the ones who say that "We don't have an immigration problem in the United States." Yes, we do. (Yes I have prior knowledge of the Berlin Wall & why it was wrong, the Berlin Wall was constructed to keep people in instead of keeping them out) China has had a border wall next to Hong-Kong since 1960 to keep illegal-immigration under control. In 2015, Hungary built a border barrier on its border with Serbia and Croatia. The fence was constructed during the European migrant crisis. Attempted border entries have fallen since the barrier was constructed. During the month of September 2015 there was a total number of 136,296 migrant entries, and within the first two weeks of November the average daily number of intercepted migrants decreased to only 315, which is a reduction of more than 4,500 each day. Israel cut its illegal immigration rate by "99 percent" by constructing a 143-mile fence along its southern border from illegal immigration about 16-17 thousand apprehensions to only 18 people period, so if you tell me that border walls don't work I'm going to refer to the statistics until you can prove me otherwise

John Gardner California  LARGEST INSANE ASYLUM IN THE WORLD  Interesting that the LA Times did this. All the others are staying away from it. Whether you are a Democrat or Republican, this should be of great interest to you!  Just One State - be sure and read the last part...  try for 3 times.  This is only one State... If this doesn't open your eyes, nothing will!  From the LA. Times:  1. 40% of all workers in LA County (10.2 million people) are working for cash; and not paying taxes. This is because they are predominantly illegal immigrants, working without a green card. (Donald Trump was right)  2. 95 %of warrants for murder in Los Angeles are for illegal aliens.  3. 75% of people on the most wanted list in Los Angeles are illegal aliens.  4. Over 2/3 of all births in Los Angeles County are to illegal alien Mexicans on Medi-Cal, whose births were paid for by taxpayers.  5. Nearly 35% of all inmates in California detention centers are Mexican nationals; they are here illegally.  6. Over 300,000 illegal aliens in Los Angeles County are living in garages.  7. The FBI reports half of all gang members in Los Angeles are most likely illegal aliens from south of the border.  8 Nearly 60% of all occupants of HUD properties are illegal.  9. 21 radio stations in LA are Spanish-speaking.  10. In LA County, 5.1 million people speak English; 3.9 million, speak Spanish. (There are 10.2 million people, in LA County.  (All 10 of the above facts were published in the Los Angeles Times)  Less than 2% of illegal aliens are picking our crops, but 29% are on welfare.  Over 70% of the United States' annual population growth, ( and over 90% of California, Florida, and New York), results from immigration.  Also, 29% of inmates in federal prisons are illegal aliens.  We are fools for letting this continue.  HOW CAN YOU HELP?  Send copies of this letter, to at least two other people.  To 100, would be even better.

Jordan Miller I think there is still outrage but personally I dont see or hear about as many Russians or Ukrainians walking or driving across the desert to illegally gain entry into our sovereign nation. We cant just have wide open deserts without any type of boundary. Its been open for years and our citizens have been having to deal with people illegally crossing borders, no Social Security number, not paying taxes, never go back to court to secure legal status and then get involved in crimes of which the wordt of course is murder whether its from drinking and driving or from gang violence. Either way, at some point we have to have a stopping point. Trump may not be a polished politician but he is the only POTUS so far who has had the balls to secure our borders

Kelly Preiss Wilhelm white, black, asian, latino gang shootings,...you have no clue...take a look at percentages of race to murders.....why just blame white...all races do it....even women

Latoryaira Schnell Peoples If you want to keep bury your head in the sand, sure. Here's just one study in Arizona:  "This data do not rely on self-reporting by criminals. Undocumented immigrants are at least 142% more likely to be convicted of a crime than other Arizonans. They also tend to commit more serious crimes and serve 10.5% longer sentences, more likely to be classified as dangerous, and 45% more likely to be gang members than U.S. citizens."  https://crimeresearch.org/2018/01/impact-illegal-aliens-crime-rates/

Los  Angeles Times  03/04/2008  ""Stanford University called about Jamiel Shaw a week or so ago, intrigued by the slight but speedy running back for Los Angeles High School, the Southern League's most valuable player last year. Rutgers University called a few days later. The Shaw family already had reason to be proud. Jamiel's mother, Army Sgt. Anita Shaw, was on her second tour of duty in Iraq. On Sunday night, it was Jamiel's father on the phone and then his son's girlfriend, Chrystale Miles. Jamiel Sr. called to tell him to hurry home from the mall. The 17-year-old boy was three doors away when someone (Pedro Espinoza ) shot him to death while he was still talking on his cellphone to Chrystale,  Jamiel Sr. heard the shots almost as soon as he hung up. He ran out of the house, raced around the corner and found his son lying on the sidewalk, bleeding."  "Los Angeles police officials described the killing as random and senseless, cutting down a youth who had been doing everything right in his life -- from hitting the books to never missing church to inspiring the Los Angeles High Romans to last year's Southern League title. A police spokeswoman said two Latino men pulled up in a car, jumped out, asked Jamiel if he belonged to a gang, and shot him when he didn't answer. She said Jamiel was not affiliated with a gang". "The youth's football coach, Hardy Williams, was with the family Monday at their 5th Avenue home, where Jamiel's trophies and medals lined the mantel. His 9-year-old brother, Thomas, wore Jamiel's favorite Atlanta Braves cap. Tears flowed. "He was a very special kid," Williams said. "Not only was he an outstanding athlete, he was a good person. I've never seen Jamiel mad. He had such a big smile." The coach described his standout player as "a Houdini on the football field," and the numbers backed it up. As a junior, Jamiel rushed for more than 1,000 yards last year, averaging just over 14 yards per carry. An invitational All-City first-team selection, he scored 11 touchdowns, returned punts and kickoffs, and played defensive back. He also competed in track. Hours before he was shot, Jamiel had spent the day at a football camp at Pasadena City College, Williams said. "Stanford just called me about his transcripts," he said. "Rutgers called a couple of days ago. He was just on track. . . . He was very elated." He is not elated anymore. He is dead. Rotting under six feet of dirt, Donald Trump is his only voice. He speaks for the Dead.

Los  Angeles Times  03/04/2008  ""Stanford University called about Jamiel Shaw a week or so ago, intrigued by the slight but speedy running back for Los Angeles High School, the Southern League's most valuable player last year. Rutgers University called a few days later. The Shaw family already had reason to be proud. Jamiel's mother, Army Sgt. Anita Shaw, was on her second tour of duty in Iraq. On Sunday night, it was Jamiel's father on the phone and then his son's girlfriend, Chrystale Miles. Jamiel Sr. called to tell him to hurry home from the mall. The 17-year-old boy was three doors away when someone (Pedro Espinoza ) shot him to death while he was still talking on his cellphone to Chrystale,  Jamiel Sr. heard the shots almost as soon as he hung up. He ran out of the house, raced around the corner and found his son lying on the sidewalk, bleeding."  "Los Angeles police officials described the killing as random and senseless, cutting down a youth who had been doing everything right in his life -- from hitting the books to never missing church to inspiring the Los Angeles High Romans to last year's Southern League title. A police spokeswoman said two Latino men pulled up in a car, jumped out, asked Jamiel if he belonged to a gang, and shot him when he didn't answer. She said Jamiel was not affiliated with a gang". "The youth's football coach, Hardy Williams, was with the family Monday at their 5th Avenue home, where Jamiel's trophies and medals lined the mantel. His 9-year-old brother, Thomas, wore Jamiel's favorite Atlanta Braves cap. Tears flowed. "He was a very special kid," Williams said. "Not only was he an outstanding athlete, he was a good person. I've never seen Jamiel mad. He had such a big smile." The coach described his standout player as "a Houdini on the football field," and the numbers backed it up. As a junior, Jamiel rushed for more than 1,000 yards last year, averaging just over 14 yards per carry. An invitational All-City first-team selection, he scored 11 touchdowns, returned punts and kickoffs, and played defensive back. He also competed in track. Hours before he was shot, Jamiel had spent the day at a football camp at Pasadena City College, Williams said. "Stanford just called me about his transcripts," he said. "Rutgers called a couple of days ago. He was just on track. . . . He was very elated." He is not elated anymore. He is dead. Rotting under six feet of dirt, Donald Trump is his only voice. He speaks for the Dead.

Marcus Rech MS13 is an AMERICAN gang, fyi.

Maybe , do the unexpected...you give something to the Pelosi gang extend your good intentions first? Then emplore the people?

Mr. President, your pick for Attorney General said he is for these unconstitutional red flag laws. Nobody should have a right to search your house and confiscate your guns without due process. What I mean by that is facing your accuser in court in front of a judge. Anybody that wants to get you in trouble or is just afraid of guns can make up anything. One of my neighbors saw me putting my shotgun in a case in my trunk and approached me and said she doesn’t feel safe because I have guns at my house. If we had red flag laws then I’m convinced she would have called the police and reported me. My gun collection is an investment for me. So if someone falsely accuses me my collection would worth a lot less when I get them back because you know the police aren’t going to take care not to damage them and if you read some of these laws they aren’t responsible for any damage. You promised before the election that “the attack on your 2nd amendment rights is over”. So far you’ve have been worse than Obama in his 8 years in office.  These laws put law enforcement at unneeded risk. I know I won’t let them in my house and I’ve always supported them. We already had one death in Maryland because of this law and I don’t think it will be the last. I was appalled that the democrats made Brett Cavanaugh prove his innocence and this law is doing the same thing to gun owners. I thought in this country that you were innocent until proven guilty not the other way around. The gun owners put you in office on your promises to have our backs and you would fight these anti-gun laws that do nothing other than infringing on the legal gun owners in this country. I don’t see any politician suggest we go after all of the gang violence where most of the shootings occur. The other thing is if you look into a lot of these shootings the person had weapon charges against him or her but they seem to always plea-bargain down to a lesser offense because the prosecutors feel this aren’t that important. I hope you take this to heart because you need us to win in 2020. Thank you and take care.

Our country will go to hell if we don't close our borders.  Nancy Pelosi wanted closed borders back in 2008.  She hates President Trump so much that she will fight him regardless of what he wants.  She has to go along with her gang of idiots.  She doesn't care about us, she only cares about herself and her selfish ways.  How can someone change so much?  She couldn't face the Angel families, why is she embarrassed to face them because she knows what she's doing is wrong.  She's acting like an over privileged spoiled brat.  I have NO respect for her.  She has a WALL around her home for protection, maybe we need to take her WALL down if we can't have our WALL to protect us from illegals.

Prior to Christmas until now, only whining rhetoric from Pelosi, Schumer and gang.  You’re always steps ahead of these political thugs.  Do what must be done for effective Border and National Security🇺🇸

Put the illegal aliens on a chain gang to build the wall they force America to need!

Sally Gillespie Bailey I hope you get gang raped by 6 illegals, then they rob and kill your family lol

Senator Lindsay Graham is now talking about a "coup" by the FBI as well as others !     Yet with a straight face, he's now calling for a hearing, because he's so shocked to hear about all of this ?!   Perhaps its time to remind him ,that he along with the other 7 members of the Gang of 8 were told about  these investigations into Trump and his campaign , PRIOR to his election! Yet, not Graham nor any of the other 3 Republican senators ,or the 4 Democrat senators, with NO OBJECTIONS from ANY of them!!   (Information from  New book by Andrew McCabe) &   PRIOR to the Comey firing!  The Gang of Eight (in 2016) consisted of the following four Democratic and four Republican senators  Sen. Michael Bennet, D-CO  Sen. Dick Durbin, D-IL  Sen. Jeff Flake, R-AZ  Sen. Lindsey Graham, R-SC  Sen. John McCain, R-AZ  Sen. Robert Menendez, D-NJ  Sen. Marco Rubio, R-FL  Sen. Chuck Schumer, D-NY  Is it really any wonder that McCain, knowing this, as well as what Trump was saying about finer examples of Americans then himself, .that McCain didn't want TRUMP at his funeral?!

Senator Lindsay Graham is now talking about a "coup" by the FBI as well as others !     Yet with a straight face, he's now calling for a hearing, because he's so shocked to hear about all of this ?!   Perhaps its time to remind him ,that he along with the other 7 members of the Gang of 8 were told about  these investigations into Trump and his campaign , PRIOR to his election! Yet, not Graham nor any of the other 3 Republican senators ,or the 4 Democrat senators, with NO OBJECTIONS from ANY of them!!   (Information from  New book by Andrew McCabe) &   PRIOR to the Comey firing!  The Gang of Eight (in 2016) consisted of the following four Democratic and four Republican senators  Sen. Michael Bennet, D-CO  Sen. Dick Durbin, D-IL  Sen. Jeff Flake, R-AZ  Sen. Lindsey Graham, R-SC  Sen. John McCain, R-AZ  Sen. Robert Menendez, D-NJ  Sen. Marco Rubio, R-FL  Sen. Chuck Schumer, D-NY  Is it really any wonder that McCain, knowing this, as well as what Trump was saying about finer examples of Americans then himself, .that McCain didn't want TRUMP at his funeral?!

That’s funny when rival gang members came into my back yard and had a shot out with the gang next door I had a wall put up and guess what no one has gotten back on to my property.

That’s funny when rival gang members came into my back yard and had a shot out with the gang next door I had a wall put up and guess what no one has gotten back on to my property.

The Dems..  1. Wish to abolish ICE; 2. Rejected Kate's law; 3. Run 'Sanctuary' cities; 4. Rejected Criminal Gang Removal Act; 5. Reject a Border Wall....  Yet, most Dems live in walled properties which ordinary Americans do not.

There coming threw my buddy's back yard that lives in Texas! 20 miles from any road" As he has witnessed with his hunting cam, Why do not people under stand this? We NEED a boarder WALL' only the week go too the gate' The hard core gang member's cross threw the desert HELLO WAKE UP PEOPLE!!!  Please Help us Mr.  President

There is no need for a multi billion dollar border wall. There is no need to force the separation of all families at the border.  There is no need to deny unfortunate refugees the opportunity to apply for asylum.  Illegal border crossings are at a 46 year low.  The situation at our southern border is not as dire as Trump's hysterical tweets suggest. Illegal immigration is not an existential crisis. We are in no danger of losing our country.   The Trump Administration has intentionally adopted a policy of cruelty towards immigrants, and they rationalize their policies by relying on unsubstantiated claims that they pose a threat.  Day after day Trump and his allies resort to fearmongering, scapegoating, and demonizing.  Folks at the southern border have been maligned as rapists, murderers, drug dealers, gang members, and criminals who have been infiltrated by terrorists, and are threatening to spread infectious diseases, while they steal jobs from hard working Americans and simultaneously sponge off the social welfare system because they are so lazy.    Scant evidence has been offered to back these claims up, but when your goal is simply to dehumanize people you can't let hard data get in the way.     Early estimates had put the cost of Trump's wet dream border wall at $25 billion, and that's before any unforeseen cost overruns.    The whole thing strikes me as a terrible waste of resources that is sure to excite reactionaries, but does nothing to solve the underlying issues that compel people to immigrate to the US via any available means.    If the US spends billions on a wall, what have we got when it's done?  Just a wall.  That's it.    It won't improve conditions in the regions in the world where people are suffering.  It won't stop the people living in those regions from attempting to enter the US.  It won't reverse the demographic changes underway in America that have so many entitled Caucasians decrying how minorities are destroying the fabric of society.  Why should we persecute people for losing the birthplace lottery?   Why should anything as universal as wanting better opportunities for yourself and your family be considered criminal?  Instead of building walls to divide us, I would prefer inviting those less fortunate to share in the promise America can offer.

Those  that  don’t see  the  importance of  a  wall,  I  think  you  should  make  your  address  known  so  these  drug  cartels,  human  traffickers  and  gang  members  can  all  stay  with  you  when  they they sneak  into  our  country

To the democrats every illegal is a family looking for a better life, to the republicans it's a gang banger whose been deported 3 times before, or an ISIS terrorist in disguise. Truth is its both, good people and bad people. But we cannot help the good people until stop the bad people with a wall and make everyone go through at least as much security as at an airport.

Two years of lying ejaculate from Lara’s huge mouth.  She should have saved it for her gang banger boyfriend.

Was he a drug dealer or gang member?

We are tired of these criminal rat lines crossing our border ... drugs, human trafficking, gang members, criminals ... it has cost America and Americans greatly ... It is time to stop the flow ... so many women and children are at risk ... investigate the orgs who sponsor all this chaos ... hold them accountable ...

Whem Pres Trump says 4000 undocumented illegals crossed over the southern border, the ICE stats suggest he is right!  ICE says •  Over a 10-year period (2005-2014) ICE arrested approximately 4,000 MS-13 members, leaders, and associates. This represents about 13 percent of all gang members they arrested nationwide (31,000) during that period.  •  92 percent of the MS-13 affiliated aliens arrested were illegal aliens.

so screw the 99.5% of all working americans????   those govt employees will get back pay - but how bout all the murdered victims? their families? the drug runners gang members conming across the border?  OPEN YOUR EYES

the IDIOT central american GANG member in the photo thinks he can evade detection if he wears an italia shirt. Dumb ILLITERATE ILLEGALS. CA is teeming with these lowlifes. BUILD THAT WALL. DEPORT THEM  ALL.  http://enewspaper.latimes.com/infinity/article_share.aspx?guid=425d841b-a4ca-4f87-86b9-df6c0829b6bf

total: 1208